
General GuidelinesGeneral Guidelines Overview50.0 Introduction to Search Quality Rating60.1 The Purpose of Search Quality Rating60.2 Raters Must Represent the User60.3 Browser Requirements60.4 Ad Blocking Extensions60.5 Internet Safety Information6Part 1: Page Quality Rating Guideline71.0 Introduction to Page Quality Rating72.0 Understanding Webpages and Websites72.1 Important Definitions72.2 What is the Purpose of a Webpage?82.3 Your Money or Your Life (YMYL) Pages92.4 Understanding Webpage Content92.4.1 Identifying the Main Content (MC)92.4.2 Identifying the Supplementary Content (SC)102.4.3 Identifying Advertisements/Monetization (Ads)102.4.4 Summary of the Parts of the Page112.5 Understanding the Website112.5.1 Finding the Homepage112.5.2 Finding Who is Responsible for the Website and Who Created the Content on the Page132.5.3 Finding About Us, Contact Information, and Customer Service Information132.6 Reputation of the Website or Creator of the Main Content142.6.1 Research on the Reputation of the Website or Creator of the Main Content152.6.2 Sources of Reputation Information152.6.3 Customer Reviews of Stores/Businesses152.6.4 How to Search for Reputation Information152.6.5 What to Do When You Find No Reputation Information173.0 Overall Page Quality Rating183.1 Page Quality Rating: Most Important Factors183.2 Expertise, Authoritativeness, and Trustworthiness (E-A-T)184.0 High Quality Pages194.1 Characteristics of High Quality Pages194.2 A Satisfying Amount of High Quality Main Content204.3 Clear and Satisfying Website Information: Who is Responsible and Customer Service204.4 Positive Reputation204.5 A High Level of Expertise/Authoritativeness/Trustworthiness (E-A-T)214.6 Examples of High Quality Pages215.0 Highest Quality Pages255.1 Very High Quality MC255.2 Very Positive Reputation255.3 Very High Level of E-A-T26Copyright 201915.4 Examples of Highest Quality Pages266.0 Low Quality Pages326.1 Lacking Expertise, Authoritativeness, or Trustworthiness (E-A-T)326.2 Low Quality Main Content326.3 Unsatisfying Amount of Main Content336.4 Distracting Ads/SC336.5 Mixed or Mildly Negative Reputation of the Website or Creator of the Main Content336.6 Unsatisfying Amount of Information about the Website or Creator of the Main Content346.7 Examples of Low Quality Pages347.0 Lowest Quality Pages377.1 Lack of Purpose Pages387.2 Pages that Fail to Achieve Their Purpose387.2.1 Lowest E-A-T387.2.2 No/Little Main Content387.2.3 Lowest Quality Main Content397.2.4 Copied Main Content397.2.5 How to Determine if Content is Copied407.2.6 Auto-Generated Main Content417.2.7 Obstructed or Inaccessible Main Content417.2.8 Inadequate Information about the Website or Creator of the Main Content417.2.9 Unmaintained Websites, and Hacked, Defaced, or Spammed Pages417.3 Pages that Potentially Spread Hate427.4 Potentially Harmful Pages427.4.1 Encourage Harm427.4.2 Malicious Pages427.4.3 Negative or Malicious Reputation437.5 Pages that Potentially Misinform Users437.6 Pages that Potentially Deceive Users447.6.1 Deceptive Page Purpose447.6.2 Deceptive Page Design447.7 Examples of Lowest Quality Pages468.0 Medium Quality Pages538.1 Examples of Medium Quality Pages549.0 Page Quality Rating Tasks569.1 Instructions for Rating Page Quality Tasks579.1.1 Rating on Your Phone579.2 Reputation and E-A-T: Website or the Creators of the Main Content?5710.0 Page Quality Criteria for Specific Types of Pages5810.1 Ratings for Encyclopedia Pages5810.2 Ratings for Pages with Error Messages or No MC5810.3 Ratings for Forums and Q&A pages5911.0 Page Quality Rating FAQs63Part 2: Understanding Mobile User Needs6512.0 Understanding Mobile Users, Mobile Queries, and Mobile Results6512.1 Important Rating Definitions and Ideas66Copyright 2019212.2 Understanding the Query6712.3 Locale and User Location6712.4 Queries with an Explicit Location6812.5 Queries with Multiple Meanings6812.6 Query Meanings Can Change Over Time6912.7 Understanding User Intent7012.7.1 Know and Know Simple Queries7012.7.2 Do and Device Action Queries7112.7.3 Website Queries7212.7.4 Visit-in-Person Queries and User Location7312.7.5 Queries with Multiple User Intents7612.8 Understanding Result Blocks7612.8.1 Web Search Result Block Examples7612.8.2 Special Content Result Block Examples7712.8.3 Device Action Result Block Examples7912.8.4 How Device Action Results are Displayed in Rating Tasks8112.9 Rating on Your Phone Issues84Part 3: Needs Met Rating Guideline8513.0 Rating Using the Needs Met Scale8513.1 Rating Result Blocks: Block Content and Landing Pages8513.2 Fully Meets (FullyM)8813.2.1 Examples of Fully Meets (FullyM) Result Blocks8813.2.2 Examples of Queries that Cannot Have Fully Meets Results9713.3 Highly Meets (HM)9813.3.1 Examples of Highly Meets (HM) Result Blocks9813.4 Moderately Meets (MM)10813.4.1 Examples of Moderately Meets (MM) Result Blocks10813.5 Slightly Meets (SM)11013.5.1 Examples of Slightly Meets (SM) Result Blocks11013.6 Fails to Meet (FailsM)11313.6.1 Examples of Fails to Meet (FailsM) Result Blocks11314.0 Rating Porn, Foreign Language, Did Not Load, and Upsetting-Offensive Results12414.1 Porn Flag12414.2 Needs Met Rating for Porn Results12414.2.1 Needs Met Rating for Clear Non-Porn Intent Queries12414.2.2 Needs Met Rating for Possible Porn Intent Queries12514.2.3 Needs Met Rating for Clear Porn Intent Queries12514.3 Reporting Illegal Images12614.4 Foreign Language Flag12614.4.1 Using the Foreign Language Flag12614.4.2 Needs Met Rating for Foreign Language Results12714.5 Did Not Load Flag12914.5.1 Using the Did Not Load Flag12914.5.2 Needs Met Rating for Did Not Load Results13014.6 Upsetting-Offensive Flag130Copyright 2019314.6.1 Using the Upsetting-Offensive Flag13114.6.2 Needs Met Rating for Upsetting-Offensive Tolerant Queries13315.0 The Relationship between Page Quality and Needs Met13516.0 Rating Queries with Multiple Interpretations and Intents13716.1 Rating Queries with Both Website and Visit-in-Person Intent13717.0 Specificity of Queries and Landing Pages13818.0 Needs Met Rating and Freshness14619.0 Misspelled and Mistyped Queries and Results14819.1 Misspelled and Mistyped Queries14819.2 Name Queries14920.0 Non-Fully Meets Results for URL Queries14921.0 Product Queries: Importance of Browsing and Researching15122.0 Rating Visit-in-Person Intent Queries15222.1 Examples Where User Location Does (and Does Not) Matter15323.0 Rating English Language Results in Non-English Locales15523.1 Examples of English (and Non-English) Results in Non-English Locales156Appendix: Using the Evaluation Platform16124.0 Overview16125.0 Acquiring Tasks16126.0 Rating Tasks Using the Rating Interface16127.0 Releasing Tasks16228.0 Understanding the User Location on the Task Page16429.0 Reporting Duplicate Results in Tasks16429.1 Pre-Identified Duplicates16429.2 Rater-Identified Duplicates16529.3 Reporting Duplicate Results16630.0 Simplified Needs Met Tasks167Copyright 20194General Guidelines OverviewWelcome to the Search Quality Rating Program!As a Search Quality Rater, you will work on many different types of rating projects. The General Guidelines primarilycover Page Quality (PQ) rating and Needs Met (NM) rating; however, the concepts are also important for many othertypes of rating tasks.For brevity, we refer to “Search Quality Raters” as “raters” in these guidelines.Copyright 201950.0Introduction to Search Quality Rating0.1The Purpose of Search Quality RatingYour ratings will be used to evaluate search engine quality around the world. Good search engines give results that arehelpful for users in their specific language and locale.It is important that you are familiar with and comfortable using a search engine. We encourage you to be an expert inGoogle search! For example, experiment with using operators (e.g., quotes or a dash) in your searches or try usingGoogle’s advanced search option.0.2Raters Must Represent the UserIt is very important for you to represent users in the locale you evaluate. You must be very familiar with the task languageand location in order to represent the experience of users in your locale. If you do not have the knowledge to do this,please inform your employer/company.0.3Browser RequirementsCheck with your employer/company for browser requirements. You may use helpful browser add-ons or extensions, butplease do not use add-ons or extensions that interfere with or alter the user experience of the page.0.4Ad Blocking ExtensionsDo not use add-ons or extensions that block ads for Needs Met rating or Page Quality rating. These add-ons orextensions may cause you to give incorrect ratings. As a rater, only use an ad blocking extension or add-on if specificallyinstructed to do so in the project-specific instructions.0.5Internet Safety InformationIn the course of your work, you will visit many different webpages. Some of them may harm your computer unless you arecareful. Please do not download any executables, applications, or other potentially dangerous files, or click on any linksthat you are uncomfortable with.It is strongly recommended that you have antivirus and antispyware protection on your computer. This softwaremust be updated frequently or your computer will not be protected. There are many free and for-purchaseantivirus and antispyware products available on the web.See here for a Wikipedia page on antivirus software and here for a Wikipedia page on spyware.We suggest that you only open files with which you are comfortable. The file formats listed below are generallyconsidered safe if antivirus software is in place.●.txt (text file)●.ppt or .pptx (Microsoft PowerPoint)●.doc or .docx (Microsoft Word)●.xls or .xlsx (Microsoft Excel)●.pdf (PDF) filesIf you encounter a page with a warning message, such as “Warning-visiting this web site may harm your computer,” or ifyour antivirus software warns you about a page, you should not try to visit the page to assign a rating.You may also encounter pages that require RealPlayer or the Adobe Flash plug-in. These are generally safe to download.Copyright 20196Part 1: Page Quality Rating Guideline1.0Introduction to Page Quality RatingA Page Quality (PQ) rating task consists of a URL and a grid to record your observations, in order to guide yourexploration of the landing page and the website associated with the URL. Ultimately, the goal of Page Quality rating is toevaluate how well the page achieves its purpose. Because different types of websites and webpages can have verydifferent purposes, our expectations and standards for different types of pages are also different.Here's what you'll need to be a successful Page Quality rater:● Your experience using the web as an ordinary user in your rating locale.● In-depth knowledge of these guidelines.● And most importantly—practice doing PQ rating tasks!The examples in these guidelines are very important. Please view each one and keep in mind a few notes about theexamples:● Webpages and websites change rapidly, so we use images or "snapshots" of webpages in most of our examples.● The information in the examples was accurate at the time it was added, but content and websites may changeover time.● Some examples show pages on desktop and some show pages on mobile devices.2.0Understanding Webpages and WebsitesPQ rating requires an in-depth understanding of websites. We'll start with the basics. Along the way, we'll share importantinformation about Page Quality rating, so please read through this section even if you are a website expert!2.1Important DefinitionsHere are some important definitions:A webpage is connected to the World Wide Web and can be viewed or "visited" using a web browser (e.g., Chrome), abrowser on your phone, or a search app. In the 1990s, webpage content was mostly text and links. Today, webpagecontent includes many forms of media (such as images, videos, etc.) and functionality (such as online shopping features,email, calculator functionality, online games, etc.).A URL is a character string that your web browser uses to “find” and display a webpage. Page Quality rating doesn'trequire you to have in-depth understanding of the structure of URLs, i.e., you don’t need to know the difference betweenhost, domain, etc. But if you are interested, see here to read more.A website or site is a group of World Wide Web pages usually containing hyperlinks to each other and made availableonline by an individual, company, educational institution, government, or organization. Popular websites includeFacebook, Wikipedia, Yahoo, YouTube, etc.Note: In these guidelines, we will use the word “website” to refer to a collection of pages owned and controlled by a singleentity (individual, business, etc.). But we will also use “website” to refer to major “independent” sections (or hosts) ofsome websites that were created to achieve separate purposes. For example, the Yahoo website is organized intodifferent sections (or hosts), such as Yahoo Finance (finance.yahoo.com), Yahoo Mail (mail.yahoo.com ), Yahoo Sports(sports.yahoo.com ), etc. Each of these has its own purpose. It’s OK to refer to each of these sections as a website; forexample, the Yahoo Finance website and the Yahoo Sports website. You may also refer to pages on Yahoo Finance orYahoo Sports as belonging to the Yahoo website.Copyright 20197A homepage of a website is the main page of the site. It is usually the first page that users see when the site loads. Forexample, http://www.apple.com is the homepage of the Apple site, http://www.yahoo.com is the homepage of the Yahoocompany site, and http://finance.yahoo.com is the homepage of Yahoo Finance. You can usually find the homepage of awebsite by clicking on a “home” link or logo link on subpages of a website.A subpage on a website is any page on the site other than the homepage. For example, http://www.apple.com/iphone isa subpage on the Apple website, and http://finance.yahoo.com/options is a subpage on the Yahoo Finance website.A webmaster is the person who is responsible for maintaining a website.Important: You must be very comfortable exploring websites, both by clicking links and modifying URLs in the addressbar of your web browser. Become a website detective and explorer!2.2What is the Purpose of a Webpage?The purpose of a page is the reason or reasons why the page was created. Every page on the Internet is created for apurpose, or for multiple purposes. Most pages are created to be helpful for users, thus having a beneficial purpose.Some pages are created merely to make money, with little or no effort to help users. Some pages are even created tocause harm to users. The first step in understanding a page is figuring out its purpose.Why is it important to determine the purpose of the page for PQ rating?● The goal of PQ rating is to determine how well a page achieves its purpose. In order to assign a rating, you mustunderstand the purpose of the page and sometimes the website.● By understanding the purpose of the page, you'll better understand what criteria are important to consider whenevaluating that particular page.● Websites and pages should be created to help users. Websites and pages that are created with intent to harmusers, deceive users, or make money with no attempt to help users, should receive the Lowest PQ rating. Moreon this later.As long as the page is created to help users, we will not consider any particular page purpose or type to be higher qualitythan another. For example, encyclopedia pages are not necessarily higher quality than humor pages.Important: There are highest quality and lowest quality webpages of all different types and purposes: shopping pages,news pages, forum pages, video pages, pages with error messages, PDFs, images, gossip pages, humor pages,homepages, and all other types of pages. The type of page does not determine the PQ rating—you have to understandthe purpose of the page to determine the rating.Common helpful or beneficial page purposes include (but are not limited to):● To share information about a topic.● To share personal or social information.● To share pictures, videos, or other forms of media.● To express an opinion or point of view.● To entertain.● To sell products or services.● To allow users to post questions for other users to answer.● To allow users to share files or to download software.Here are a few examples where it is easy to understand the purpose of the page:Type of PagePurpose of the PageNews website homepageTo inform users about recent or important events.Shopping pageTo sell or give information about the product.Video pageTo share a cute video of a cat.Currency converter pageTo calculate equivalent amounts in different currencies.Copyright 20198Here is an example (OmNomNomNom Page) of a helpful page where the purpose of the page is not as obvious. At firstglance, this page may seem pointless or strange. However, it is a page from a humorous site that encourages users topost photos with mouths drawn on them. The purpose of the page is humor or artistic expression. This page has ahelpful or beneficial purpose. Even though the About page on this website is not very helpful, the website explains itselfon its FAQ page.2.3Your Money or Your Life (YMYL) PagesSome types of pages or topics could potentially impact a person’s future happiness, health, financial stability, or safety.We call such pages “Your Money or Your Life” pages, or YMYL. The following are examples of YMYL topics:● News and current events: news about important topics such as international events, business, politics, science,technology, etc. Keep in mind that not all news articles are necessarily considered YMYL (e.g., sports,entertainment, and everyday lifestyle topics are generally not YMYL). Please use your judgment and knowledgeof your locale.● Civics, government, and law: information important to maintaining an informed citizenry, such as informationabout voting, government agencies, public institutions, social services, and legal issues (e.g., divorce, childcustody, adoption, creating a will, etc.).● Finance: financial advice or information regarding investments, taxes, retirement planning, loans, banking, orinsurance, particularly webpages that allow people to make purchases or transfer money online.● Shopping: information about or services related to research or purchase of goods/services, particularlywebpages that allow people to make purchases online.● Health and safety: advice or information about medical issues, drugs, hospitals, emergency preparedness, howdangerous an activity is, etc.● Groups of people: information about or claims related to groups of people, including but not limited to thosegrouped on the basis of race or ethnic origin, religion, disability, age, nationality, veteran status, sexual orientation,gender or gender identity.● Other: there are many other topics related to big decisions or important aspects of people’s lives which thus maybe considered YMYL, such as fitness and nutrition, housing information, choosing a college, finding a job, etc.Please use your judgment.We have very high Page Quality rating standards for YMYL pages because low quality YMYL pages could potentiallynegatively impact a person’s happiness, health, financial stability, or safety.2.4Understanding Webpage ContentAll of the content on a webpage can be classified as one of the following: Main Content (MC), Supplementary Content(SC), or Advertisements/Monetization (Ads). In order to understand the purpose of a webpage and do PQ rating, you willneed to be able to distinguish among these different parts of the page.Webpage design can be complicated, so make sure to click around and explore the page. See what kind of content isbehind the tabs and test out the interactive page features. Content behind the tabs may be considered part of the MC,SC, or Ads, depending on what the content is.2.4.1 Identifying the Main Content (MC)Main Content is any part of the page that directly helps the page achieve its purpose. Webmasters directly control the MCof the page (except for user-generated content). MC can be text, images, videos, page features (e.g., calculators,games), or it can be user-generated content such as videos, reviews, articles, etc. that users have added or uploaded tothe page. Note that tabs on some pages lead to even more information (e.g., customer reviews) and can sometimes beconsidered part of the MC of the page.The MC also includes the title at the top of the page (example ). Descriptive MC titles allow users to make informeddecisions about what pages to visit. Helpful titles summarize the MC on the page.Copyright 20199Type of Page and PurposeMC Highlighted in YellowNews website homepage: the purpose is to inform users about recent or important events.MC - News HomepageNews article page: the purpose is to communicate information about an event or news topic.MC - News ArticleStore product page: the purpose is to sell or give information about the product.● Content behind the Reviews, Shipping, and Safety Information tabs are considered to beMC - Shopping Pagepart of the MC.Video page: the purpose is to share a video about cats.MC - Video PageCurrency converter page: the purpose is to calculate equivalent amounts in different currencies.MC - Currency ConverterBlog post page: the purpose is to share music used on a TV show.MC - Blog Post PageSearch engine homepage: the purpose is to allow users to enter a query and search the Internet.MC - Search Engine HomepageBank login page: the purpose is to allow users to log in to bank online.MC - Bank Login Page2.4.2 Identifying the Supplementary Content (SC)Supplementary Content contributes to a good user experience on the page, but does not directly help the page achieve itspurpose. SC is controlled by webmasters and is an important part of the user experience. One common type of SC isnavigation links that allow users to visit other parts of the website. Note that in some cases, content behind tabs may beconsidered part of the SC of the page.Sometimes the easiest way to identify SC is to look for the parts of the page that are not MC or Ads.Type of Page and PurposeSC Highlighted in BlueNews article page: the purpose is to communicate information about an event or news topic.SC - News ArticleStore product page: the purpose is to sell or give information about the product.SC - Shopping PageVideo page: the purpose is to share a video about cats.SC - Video PageBlog post page: the purpose is to share music used on a TV show.SC - Blog Post Page2.4.3 Identifying Advertisements/Monetization (Ads)Ads may contribute to a good user experience. Advertisements/Monetization (Ads) is content and/or links that aredisplayed for the purpose of monetizing (making money from) the page. The presence or absence of Ads is not by itself areason for a High or Low quality rating. Without advertising and monetization, some webpages could not exist because itcosts money to maintain a website and create high quality content.There are several different ways to monetize a webpage, including advertisements and affiliate programs. See here formore information on website monetization. Note that monetization on mobile pages may be more subtle thanmonetization on desktop pages.The most common type of monetization is advertisements. Ads may be labeled as "ads," "sponsored links," “sponsoredlistings,” “sponsored results,” etc. Usually, you can click on the links or mouse over the content to determine whether theyare Ads, as they often refer to a URL outside of that website. Ads may change when you reload the page, and differentusers may see different Ads on the same page.Webmasters can choose to display Ads on their page (such as by joining an advertising network ), but they may notalways directly control the content of the Ads. However, we will consider a website responsible for the overall quality ofthe Ads displayed.Important: For the purpose of this guideline, we will consider monetized links of any type to be “Ads.” See here fordifferent types of website monetization.Type of Page and PurposeAds Highlighted in RedNews article page: the purpose is to communicate information about an event or news topic.Ads - News ArticleVideo page: the purpose is to share a video about cats.Ads - Video PageCopyright 201910Type of Page and PurposeAds Highlighted in RedBlog post page: the purpose is to share music used on a TV show.Ads - Blog Post PageStore product page: the purpose is to sell or give information about the product.No ads – Shopping Page2.4.4 Summary of the Parts of the PageLet's put it all together.● Main Content (MC) is any part of the page that directly helps the page achieve its purpose. MC is (or should be!) thereason the page exists. The quality of the MC plays a very large role in the Page Quality rating of a webpage.● Supplementary Content (SC) is also important. SC can help a page better achieve its purpose or it can detract fromthe overall experience.● Many pages have advertisements/monetization (Ads). Without advertising and monetization, some webpagescould not exist because it costs money to maintain a website and create high quality content. The presence orabsence of Ads is not by itself a reason for a High or Low quality rating.On some pages, reviews may be considered MC, and on other pages they may be considered SC. Use your bestjudgment and think about the purpose of the page.Do not worry too much about identifying every little part of the page. Think about which parts of the page are the MC.Next, look for the Ads. Anything left over can be considered SC.MC, SC, and AdsType of Page and PurposeHighlightedNews article page: the purpose is to communicate information about an event or news topic.Summary - News ArticleStore product page: the purpose is to sell or give information about the product.Summary - Shopping PageVideo page: the purpose is to share a video about cats.Summary - Video PageCurrency converter page: the purpose is to calculate equivalent amounts in different currencies.Summary - Currency ConverterBlog post page: the purpose is to share music used on a TV show.Summary - Blog Post PageBank login page: the purpose is to allow users to log in to bank online.Summary - Bank Login Page2.5Understanding the WebsitePages often make more sense when viewed as part of a website. Some of the criteria in Page Quality rating are based onthe website the page belongs to.In order to understand a website, look for information about the website on the website itself. Websites are usually veryeager to tell you all about themselves!You must also look for reputation information about the website. We need to find out what outside, independent sourcessay about the website. When there is disagreement between what the website says about itself and what reputableindependent sources say about the website, we’ll trust the independent sources.2.5.1 Finding the HomepageThe homepage of a website usually contains or has links to important information about the website. Webmasters usuallymake it easy to get to the homepage of the website from any page on the site.Here's how to find the homepage of a website:● Examine the landing page of the URL in your PQ rating task.● Find and click on the link labeled “home” or “main page.”● Having trouble finding it? Try using “Ctrl-F” (“command-F” on a Mac) to search the page for the text “home” or“main.” You may also try clicking on the website logo, which is usually at the top of the page.Copyright 201911Sometimes, you may be given a webpage or website that appears to have no navigation links, no homepage link, and nologo or other means to find the homepage. Even some High or Highest quality pages lack a way to navigate to thehomepage. If you can't find a link to the homepage, modify the URL by removing everything to the right of “.com,” “.org,”“.net,” “.info,” etc. and refresh the page.Occasionally, your rating task will include a URL for which there are two or more justifiable “homepage” candidates. Forexample, you may not be sure whether the homepage of the URL http://finance.yahoo.com/news/category-stocks ishttp://finance.yahoo.com or http://www.yahoo.com .Important: When you have more than one homepage “candidate,” please use whichever one offers the most informationabout the specific webpage in the rating task. Use your judgment. The goal is to understand the webpage and thewebsite(s) it is associated with, not find the one unique, correct homepage.In the following examples, we have included the URL of the page to be evaluated in the rating task, as well as the URL ofits associated homepage. We have also included an image that shows where to click on the landing page to navigate tothe homepage. In the image, you will see a red box around the link or logo you would click to navigate to the homepage.Image that shows where to click to get to theURL of the Task PageHomepage of the WebsitehomepageWilliams-Sonoma Homepagehttp://www.williams-sonoma.chttp://www.williams-sonoma.comom/products/shun-premier-7-piece-knife-block-setThis “WILLIAMS-SONOMA” logo shown in theupper center of the page is clickable and takesusers to the homepage of the website.http://answers.yahoo.comSpecific Yahoo Answers PageIn this case, we will considerhttp://answers.yahoo.com the homepage, ratherhttp://answers.yahoo.com/quthan http://www.yahoo.com . Why? Becauseestion/index;_ylt=AnAYEU1fEclicking on the logo takes the user toD6ncg1jRCFy30kk5XNG;_ylvhttp://answers.yahoo.com . In addition,=3?qid=20091214193523AAhttp://answers.yahoo.com has information aboutQqHQSThis “YAHOO ANSWERS” logo in the upper leftthe Yahoo Answers website. It is very difficult topart of the page is clickable and takes users tofind specific information aboutthe homepage of the website.http://answers.yahoo.com on thehttp://www.yahoo.com homepage.Harvard Medical School Facts and Figures Pagehttp://hms.harvard.eduIn this case, we will consider the Harvard MedicalSchool page at http://hms.harvard.edu to be thehttp://hms.harvard.edu/about-homepage, rather than http://www.harvard.eduhms/facts-figures(which is the homepage of Harvard University).Clicking the logo at the top ofThis “Harvard Medical School” logo in the upperhttp://hms.harvard.edu/about-hms/facts-figuresleft part of the page is clickable and takes users totakes users to http://hms.harvard.edu , not tothe homepage of the Harvard Medical Schoolhttp://www.harvard.edu .website.Copyright 2019122.5.2 Finding Who is Responsible for the Website and Who Created the Content on the PageEvery page belongs to a website, and it should be clear:● Who (what individual, company, business, foundation, etc.) is responsible for the website.● Who (what individual, company, business, foundation, etc.) created the content on the page you are evaluating.Websites are usually very clear about who created the content on the page. There are many reasons for this:● Commercial websites may have copyrighted material they want to protect.● Businesses want users to know who they are.● Artists, authors, musicians, and other original content creators usually want to be known and appreciated.● Foundations often want support and even volunteers.● High quality stores want users to feel comfortable buying online.● Websites want users to be able to distinguish between content created by themselves versus content that wasadded by other users.Most websites have “contact us” or “about us” or “about” pages that provide information about who owns the site. Manycompanies have an entire website or blog devoted to who they are and what they are doing, what jobs are available, etc.Google and Marriott are both examples of this, and there are many others:● Google Official Blog● Marriott Blog● Southwest Airlines Blog● Netflix Tech BlogOften a business or organization is responsible for the content of a website, not an individual person. The IBMCorporation is responsible for the content on ibm.com. The Cleveland Clinic is responsible for the content onclevelandclinic.org. An individual is not responsible for the content on these websites, even though many individualscontributed to creating and maintaining the content. In these cases, we will view the business or organization asresponsible for the content on every single page, as well as maintenance of the website.On some websites, users create the MC of many pages, while the business or organization itself maintains the website.The company Facebook is responsible for the Facebook website, but individuals create the content on their personalFacebook pages. The company Wikipedia is responsible for the Wikipedia website, but individuals create article content.Other websites with user-generated content include YouTube, Twitter, other social networking websites, other articlepublishing websites, Q&A websites, forums, etc. For these websites, you must look at each page to determine theauthor(s) or creator(s) of the content on that page.Finally, there are some websites that show licensed or syndicated content. This means that the website has paid moneyor has some business relationship with the creator of the content. In these cases, we will consider the website to carryresponsibility for the quality of licensed or syndicated content, even if it wasn’t created by the website itself.2.5.3 Finding About Us, Contact Information, and Customer Service InformationMany websites are interested in communicating with their users. There are many reasons that users might have forcontacting a website, from reporting problems such as broken pages, to asking for content removal. Many websites offermultiple ways for users to contact the website: email addresses, phone numbers, physical addresses, web contact forms,etc. Sometimes, this contact information is even organized by department and provides the names of individuals tocontact.Copyright 201913The types and amount of contact information needed depend on the type of website. Contact information and customerservice information are extremely important for websites that handle money, such as stores, banks, credit cardcompanies, etc. Users need a way to ask questions or get help when a problem occurs.For shopping websites, we'll ask you to do some special checks. Look for contact information—including the store’spolicies on payment, exchanges, and returns. Sometimes this information is listed under “customer service.”Some kinds of websites need fewer details and a smaller amount of contact information for their purpose. For example,humor websites may not need the level of detailed contact information we would expect from online banking websites.Occasionally, you may encounter a website with a legitimate reason for anonymity. For example, personal websites maynot include personal contact information such as an individual’s home address or phone number. Similarly, websites withuser-generated content may allow the author to identify him/herself with an alias or username only.To find contact or customer service information for a website, start with the homepage. Look for a “contact us” or“customer service” link. Explore the website if you cannot find a “contact us” page. Sometimes you will find the contactinformation on a “corporate site” link or even on the company’s Facebook page. Be a detective!Note that different locales may have their own specific standards and requirements for what information should beavailable on the website.2.6Reputation of the Website or Creator of the Main ContentA website's reputation is based on the experience of real users, as well as the opinion of people who are experts in thetopic of the website. Keep in mind that websites often represent real companies, organizations, and other entities.Therefore, reputation research applies to both the website and the actual company, organization, or entity that the websiteis representing.A website's reputation can also help you understand what a website is best known for, and as a result how well itaccomplishes its purpose. For example, newspapers may be known for high quality, independent investigative reportingwhile satire websites may be known for their humor.Many websites are eager to tell users how great they are. Some webmasters have read these rating guidelines and write“reviews” on various review websites. But for Page Quality rating, you must also look for outside, independent reputationinformation about the website. When the website says one thing about itself, but reputable external sources disagree withwhat the website says, trust the external sources.Your job is to truly evaluate the Page Quality of the site, not just blindly accept information on one or two pages of thewebsite. Be skeptical of claims that websites make about themselves.Copyright 2019142.6.1 Research on the Reputation of the Website or Creator of the Main ContentUse reputation research to find out what real users, as well as experts, think about a website. Look for reviews,references, recommendations by experts, news articles, and other credible information created/written by individualsabout the website.Stores frequently have user ratings, which can help you understand a store’s reputation based on the reports of peoplewho actually shop there. We consider a large number of positive user reviews as evidence of positive reputation.Many other kinds of websites have reputations as well. For example, you might find that a newspaper (with an associatedwebsite) has won journalistic awards. Prestigious awards, such as the Pulitzer Prize award, or a history of high qualityoriginal reporting are strong evidence of positive reputation.When a high level of authoritativeness or expertise is needed, the reputation of a website should be judged on what expertopinions have to say. Recommendations from expert sources, such as professional societies, are strong evidence of verypositive reputation.Reputation research is necessary for all websites you encounter. Do not just assume websites you personally use have agood reputation. Please do research! You might be surprised at what you find.2.6.2 Sources of Reputation InformationLook for information written by a person, not statistics or other machine-compiled information. News articles, Wikipediaarticles, blog posts, magazine articles, forum discussions, and ratings from independent organizations can all be sourcesof reputation information. Look for independent, credible sources of information.Sometimes, you will find information about a website that is not related to its reputation. For example, pages like Alexahave information about Internet traffic to the website, but do not provide evidence of positive or negative reputation. Youcan ignore this information since it's not helpful for Page Quality rating.2.6.3 Customer Reviews of Stores/BusinessesCustomer reviews can be helpful for assessing the reputation of a store or business. However, you should interpret thesereviews with care, particularly if there are only a few. Be skeptical of both positive and negative user reviews. Anyone canwrite them, including the creator of the website or someone the store or business hires for this purpose. See here for aNew York Times article on fake reviews and here for a Guardian article on fake reviews.When interpreting customer reviews, try to find as many as possible. Any store or website can get a few negativereviews. This is completely normal and expected. Large stores and companies have thousands of reviews and mostreceive some negative ones.It is also important to read the reviews because the content of the reviews matter, not just the number. Credible,convincing reports of fraud and financial wrongdoing is evidence of extremely negative reputation. A single encounterwith a rude clerk or the delayed receipt of a single package should not be considered negative reputation information.Please use your judgment.2.6.4 How to Search for Reputation InformationHere is how to research the reputation of the website:1. Identify the “homepage” of the website. For example, for the IBM website, ibm.com is the homepage. You mayneed to identify the creator of the content, if it is different from that of the overall website.Copyright 2019152.Using ibm.com as an example, try one or more of the following searches on Google:●[ibm -site:ibm.com]: A search for IBM that excludes pages on ibm.com.●[“ibm.com” -site:ibm.com]: A search for “ibm.com” that excludes pages on ibm.com.●[ibm reviews -site:ibm.com] A search for reviews of IBM that excludes pages on ibm.com.●[“ibm.com” reviews -site:ibm.com]: A search for reviews of “ibm.com” that excludes pages on ibm.com.●For content creators, try searching for their name or alias.Note: When searching for reputation information, try to find sources that were not written or created by thewebsite, the company itself, or the individual. For example, IBM might have official Facebook or Twitter pagesthat it closely maintains, which would not be considered independent sources of reputation information about thecompany. See here for a Wikipedia article on identifying and using independent sources.3.Look for articles, reviews, forum posts, discussions, etc. written by people about the website. For businesses,there are many sources of reputation information and reviews. Here are some examples: Yelp, Better BusinessBureau (a nonprofit organization that focuses on the trustworthiness of businesses and charities), Amazon , andGoogle Shopping . You can try searching on specific sites to find reviews. For example, you can try [ibmsite:bbb.org] or [“ibm.com” site:bbb.org].For content creators, look for biographical data and other sources that are not written by the individual.Note: You will sometimes find high ratings on the Better Business Bureau (BBB) website because there is verylittle data on the business, not because the business has a positive reputation. However, very low ratings on BBBare usually the result of multiple unresolved complaints. Please consider very low ratings on the BBB site to beevidence for a negative reputation.4.See if there is a Wikipedia article or news article from a well-known news site. Wikipedia can be a good source ofinformation about companies, organizations, and content creators. For example, try [ibm site:en.wikipedia.org] or[“ibm.com” site:en.wikipedia.org]. News articles and Wikipedia articles can help you learn about a company andmay include information specific to reputation, such as awards and other forms of recognition, or alsocontroversies and issues. Note that some Wikipedia articles include a message warning users that there aredisagreements on some of the content, or that the content may be outdated. This may be an indication thatadditional research is necessary.Here are some examples of reputation information:WebsiteReputation Information About the SiteDescriptionPositive reputation information: Users in the U.S.can obtain free credit reports on this website byproviding their Social Security Number. Note thatSearch results for [annualcreditreport.comthe Wikipedia article tells us that-site:annualcreditreport.com]“AnnualCreditReport.com is the only federallymandated and authorized source for obtaining aannualcreditreport.comWikipedia article about annualcreditreport.comfree credit report.”Wall Street Journal article aboutNote: Almost every website will have complaintsannualcreditreport.comabout customer service, so it is important to look atvarious sources and reviews in your reputationresearch.Positive reputation information: According toSearch results for [clevelandclinic.org]Wikipedia, the Cleveland Clinic “is currentlyregarded as one of the top 4 hospitals in the UnitedWikipedia article about clevelandclinic.orgclevelandclinic.orgStates as rated by U.S. News & World Report,”which you will also find in the article on the bestUS News & World Report article about the besthospitals in the U.S. Users can trust medicalhospitals in the U.S.information on this website.Copyright 201916WebsiteReputation Information About the SiteDescriptionPositive reputation information: Notice theSearch results for [csmonitor.comhighlighted section in the Wikipedia article about-site:csmonitor.com]The Christian Science Monitor newspaper, whichcsmonitor.comtells us that the newspaper has won seven PulitzerWikipedia article about The Christian SciencePrize awards. From this information, we can inferMonitorthat the csmonitor.com website has a positivereputation.Positive reputation information: We learn in theWikipedia article that “Kernel.org is amain repository of source code for the Linux kernel,Search results for [kernel.org –site:kernel.org]the base of the popular Linux operating system. Itkernel.orgmakes all versions of the source code available to allWikipedia article about kernel.orgusers. It also hosts various other projects,like Google Android. The main purpose of the site isto host a repository for Linux kernel developers andmaintainers of Linux distributions.”Search to find reputation informationExtremely negative reputation information: ThisSearch to find reviewsbusiness has a BBB rating of F (i.e., lowest ratinggiven by BBB). There is a news article aboutSite selling children’sBBB negative reviewfinancial fraud. There are many reviews on websitesjungle gymdescribing users sending money and not receivingTrustLink negative reviewsanything from various sources.Negative news articleSearch to find reputation informationExtremely negative/malicious reputationSite selling productsBBB pageinformation: This website engaged in criminalrelated to eyewearWikipedia articlebehavior such as physically threatening users.New York Times articleSearch to find scams related this organizationNegative review 1Extremely negative reputation information: ThereOrganization serving theare many detailed negative articles on news siteshospitalized veteranNegative review 2and charity watchdog sites about this organizationcommunitydescribing fraud and financial mishandling.Negative review 3Negative review 42.6.5 What to Do When You Find No Reputation InformationYou should expect to find reputation information for large businesses and websites of large organizations, as well aswell-known content creators.Frequently, you will find little or no information about the reputation of a website for a small organization. This is notindicative of positive or negative reputation. Many small, local businesses or community organizations have a small “webpresence” and rely on word of mouth, not online reviews. For these smaller businesses and organizations, lack ofreputation should not be considered an indication of low page quality.Copyright 2019173.0Overall Page Quality RatingAt a high level, here are the steps of Page Quality rating:1. Understand the true purpose of the page. Websites or pages without any beneficial purpose, including pages thatare created with no attempt to help users, or pages that potentially spread hate, cause harm, or misinform ordeceive users, should receive the Lowest rating. No further assessment is necessary.2. Otherwise, the PQ rating is based on how well the page achieves its purpose using the criteria outlined in thefollowing sections on Lowest, Low, Medium, High, and Highest quality pages.On Page Quality rating tasks, you will use the Page Quality sliding scale (slider) to assign the overall PQ rating. Theslider looks like this:You may also use the in-between ratings of Lowest+, Low+, Medium+, and High+. Please interpret the “+” as “+ ½,”meaning that the Lowest+ rating is halfway between Lowest and Low, Low+ is halfway between Low and Medium, etc.In the following sections, you will learn about characteristics of Lowest, Low, Medium, High, and Highest quality pages.3.1Page Quality Rating: Most Important FactorsHere are the most important factors to consider when selecting an overall Page Quality rating:● The Purpose of the Page● Expertise, Authoritativeness, Trustworthiness: This is an important quality characteristic. Use your researchon the additional factors below to inform your rating.● Main Content Quality and Amount: The rating should be based on the landing page of the task URL.● Website Information/information about who is responsible for the MC: Find information about the website aswell as the creator of the MC.● Website Reputation/reputation about who is responsible for the MC: Links to help with reputation researchwill be provided.Note: Some tasks may ask you to view the page on your phone, but to do research (e.g., finding website information andreputation) on your desktop. Other tasks may ask you to do everything on desktop. Please follow instructions in the task.3.2Expertise, Authoritativeness, and Trustworthiness (E-A-T)Remember that the first step of PQ rating is to understand the true purpose of the page. Websites or pages without somesort of beneficial purpose, including pages that are created with no attempt to help users, or pages that potentially spreadhate, cause harm, or misinform or deceive users, should receive the Lowest rating.For all other pages that have a beneficial purpose, the amount of expertise, authoritativeness, and trustworthiness (E-A-T)is very important. Please consider:● The expertise of the creator of the MC.● The authoritativeness of the creator of the MC, the MC itself, and the website.● The trustworthiness of the creator of the MC, the MC itself, and the website.Keep in mind that there are high E-A-T pages and websites of all types, even gossip websites, fashion websites, humorwebsites, forum and Q&A pages, etc. In fact, some types of information are found almost exclusively on forums anddiscussions, where a community of experts can provide valuable perspectives on specific topics.● High E-A-T medical advice should be written or produced by people or organizations with appropriate medicalexpertise or accreditation. High E-A-T medical advice or information should be written or produced in aCopyright 201918professional style and should be edited, reviewed, and updated on a regular basis.● High E-A-T news articles should be produced with journalistic professionalism—they should contain factuallyaccurate content presented in a way that helps users achieve a better understanding of events. High E-A-T newssources typically have published established editorial policies and robust review processes (example 1, example2 ).● High E-A-T information pages on scientific topics should be produced by people or organizations with appropriatescientific expertise and represent well-established scientific consensus on issues where such consensus exists.● High E-A-T financial advice, legal advice, tax advice, etc., should come from trustworthy sources and bemaintained and updated regularly.● High E-A-T advice pages on topics such as home remodeling (which can cost thousands of dollars and impactyour living situation) or advice on parenting issues (which can impact the future happiness of a family) should alsocome from “expert” or experienced sources that users can trust.● High E-A-T pages on hobbies, such as photography or learning to play a guitar, also require expertise.Some topics require less formal expertise. Many people write extremely detailed, helpful reviews of products orrestaurants. Many people share tips and life experiences on forums, blogs, etc. These ordinary people may beconsidered experts in topics where they have life experience. If it seems as if the person creating the content has the typeand amount of life experience to make him or her an “expert” on the topic, we will value this “everyday expertise” and notpenalize the person/webpage/website for not having “formal” education or training in the field.It’s even possible to have everyday expertise in YMYL topics. For example, there are forums and support pages forpeople with specific diseases. Sharing personal experience is a form of everyday expertise. Consider this example .Here, forum participants are telling how long their loved ones lived with liver cancer. This is an example of sharingpersonal experiences (in which they are experts), not medical advice. Specific medical information and advice (ratherthan descriptions of life experiences) should come from doctors or other health professionals.Think about the topic of the page. What kind of expertise is required for the page to achieve its purpose well? Thestandard for expertise depends on the topic of the page.4.0High Quality PagesIn this section, we will describe characteristics of High quality pages and give many examples. Examples help calibrateyour ratings, so please review each one.4.1Characteristics of High Quality PagesHigh quality pages exist for almost any beneficial purpose, from giving information to making people laugh to expressingoneself artistically to purchasing products or services online.What makes a High quality page? A High quality page should have a beneficial purpose and achieve that purpose well.In addition, High quality pages have the following characteristics:● High level of Expertise, Authoritativeness, and Trustworthiness (E-A-T).● A satisfying amount of high quality MC, including a descriptive or helpful title.● Satisfying website information and/or information about who is responsible for the website. If the page is primarilyfor shopping or includes financial transactions, then it should have satisfying customer service information.● Positive website reputation for a website that is responsible for the MC on the page. Positive reputation of thecreator of the MC, if different from that of the website.Copyright 2019194.2A Satisfying Amount of High Quality Main ContentThe quality of the MC is one of the most important criteria in Page Quality rating, and informs the E-A-T of the page. Forall types of webpages, creating high quality MC takes a significant amount of at least one of the following: time, effort,expertise, and talent/skill. For news articles and information pages, high quality MC must be factually accurate for thetopic and must be supported by expert consensus where such consensus exists.For each page you evaluate, spend a few minutes examining the MC before drawing a conclusion about it. Read thearticle, watch the video, examine the pictures, use the calculator, play the online game, etc. Remember that MC alsoincludes page features and functionality, so test the page out. For example, if the page is a product page on a storewebsite, put at least one product in the cart to make sure the shopping cart is functioning. If the page is an online game,spend a few minutes playing it.The purpose of the page will help you determine what high quality content means for that page. For example, High qualityinformation pages should be factually accurate, clearly written, and comprehensive. High quality shopping content shouldallow users to find the products they want and to purchase the products easily. High quality humor or satire should beentertaining, while factual accuracy is not a requirement as long as the page would be understood as satire by users.The amount of content necessary for the page to be satisfying depends on the topic and purpose of the page. A Highquality page on a broad topic with a lot of available information will have more content than a High quality page on anarrower topic. Here are some examples of pages with a satisfying amount of high quality MC.WebpageDiscussionSiberian HuskyThe Siberian Husky (a breed of dog) is a narrow topic. Although this encyclopedia landing page has less MCInformation Pagethan some encyclopedia pages on broader topics, it has a satisfying amount of clearly written, high quality MC.This shopping page on a reputable shopping website has a satisfying amount of high quality MC. The pageprovides the manufacturer’s product specs, as well as original product information, over 90 user reviews,Kitchen Stand Mixershipping and returns information, multiple images of the product, etc. Note: Some of the MC is behind links onShopping Pagethe page (“item details,” “item specifications,” “guest reviews,” etc.). Even though you have to click these linksto see the content, it is still considered MC.This movie review written by a movie critic has a satisfying amount of high quality MC. Time, effort, andMovie Review Pagetalent/skill went into writing this movie review.4.3Clear and Satisfying Website Information: Who is Responsible and Customer ServiceUnderstanding who is responsible for a website is a critical part of assessing E-A-T for most types of websites. Highquality pages should have clear information about the website so that users feel comfortable trusting the site.The amount of information needed for E-A-T assessment depends on the type of website. For example, YMYL websitesdemand a high degree of trust, so they generally need satisfying information about who is responsible for the content ofthe site. In addition, High quality stores and financial transaction websites also need clear and satisfying customer serviceinformation to help users resolve issues.Other websites that are not YMYL websites may need less website information, depending on the purpose of the website.For example, an email address may be sufficient for some non-YMYL websites.4.4Positive ReputationReputation is an important criteria when using the High rating, and informs the E-A-T of the page. While a page can meritthe High rating with no reputation, the High rating cannot be used for any website that has a convincing negativereputation. Remember that when doing research, make sure to consider the reasons behind a negative rating and not justthe rating itself.Copyright 2019204.5A High Level of Expertise/Authoritativeness/Trustworthiness (E-A-T)High quality pages and websites need enough expertise to be authoritative and trustworthy on their topic. Remember thatthere are “expert” websites of all types, even gossip websites, fashion websites, humor websites, forum and Q&A pages,etc. In fact, some types of information are found almost exclusively on forums and discussions, where a community ofexperts can provide valuable perspectives on specific topics.Think about the topic of the page. What kind of expertise is required for the page to achieve its purpose well? Thestandard for expertise depends on the topic of the page. For example, high quality news articles and information pageson scientific topics should represent established scientific consensus where such consensus exists.4.6Examples of High Quality PagesWebpage/Type of ContentHigh Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationHigh: News 1● A satisfying amount of high quality MCHomepage of a newspaper● Positive reputation (website)This is the homepage of a newspaper that has(YMYL)won several Pulitzer Prizes and OverseasPress Club awards. This newspaper has apositive reputation for its objective reporting.High: News 2● A satisfying amount of high quality MCThis is an article on a newspaper website that● Positive reputation (website)has won many Pulitzer Prize awards and has aArticle on a newspaper websitepositive reputation for its investigative● High E-A-T of the publisher and/or author(YMYL)journalism. There is a satisfying amount of highquality MC. While there are Ads on the page,the MC is easy to find and the Ads are clearlylabeled as Ads.High: News 3● A satisfying amount of high quality MCThis is an opinion piece written by the EditorialOpinion article on a newspaper● Positive reputation (website)Board of the largest newspaper in the U.S.website● High E-A-T of the publisher and/or authorstate of Minnesota. The page is clearly labelledas an opinion piece, welcoming a new footballcoach to the University of Minnesota.High: Government agencyThe purpose of this page is to display the● High E-A-T for the purpose of the pageofficial US Naval Observatory Master ClockUS Naval Observatory Mastertime in 7 different time zones. The pageClock pagedisplays the clock information in a clear,easy-to-read format. The Naval Observatory ishighly trustworthy and authoritative for this typeof information.High: Humor● High quality humorous MC● Positive reputation (website)This website is well-known for its humorous,Article on a humor website● Expertise as a farcical humor websitesatirical articles. This is a cute example of asatisfying and funny article.Copyright 201921Webpage/Type of ContentHigh Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationThis is an “about us” page on a restaurantHigh: Small business 1website. This page provides information on● High E-A-T for the purpose of the pagewhen the restaurant opened and what visitorsLocal fish & chips restaurantcan expect. Other pages on the websiteprovide information about the restaurantincluding the address, menu, other contactinformation, etc. This website is highlyauthoritative because it is about itself.High: Small business 2● High E-A-T for the purpose of the pageThis is the News and Updates section of a● A satisfying amount of high quality MClocal preservation center selling poultry,Local preservation centervegetables, and more.Note: This example was added in 2014 so the“News and Updates” were timely.● A satisfying amount of high quality MCHigh: Blog postThis is a blog post on a newspaper that has● Very positive reputation (website)won a variety of awards, such as the Pulitzer● Specifically, high E-A-T and positiveParenting article about strollersPrize, George Polk Award, Peabody Award,reputation for this specific blog and authoretc. The author of this blog post has becomeknown as an expert on parenting issues. Sheis a regular contributor to this and other mediawebsites.The purpose of this page is to allow users toHigh: Shopping 1buy a school backpack. The page provides a● A satisfying amount of high quality MClot of different backpack options, and some ofBackpack shopping page on a● Positive reputation (website)them have user reviews.popular store website (YMYL)This is a well-known, reputable merchant, withdetailed Customer Service information on thesite.High: Shopping 2This company sells its own line of high end,● High E-A-T for the purpose of the pagefashionable baby and children’s furniture andBathroom décor page on a store● Positive reputation (website)accessories. It has a positive reputation as wellwebsite (YMYL)as expertise in these specific types of goods.Many products sold on the site are unique tothis company.Copyright 201922Webpage/Type of ContentHigh Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationHigh: Shopping 3● A satisfying or comprehensive amount ofvery high quality MCThere is a very large quantity of MC on thisTomTom GPS page on an● High E-A-T for the purpose of the pagepage. Note that the tabs on the page lead toelectronics website (YMYL)● Positive reputation (website)even more information, including manycustomer reviews. The tabs should beconsidered part of the MC.High: Video 1● A satisfying or comprehensive amount ofvery high quality MCSaturday Night Live video on a● High E-A-T for the purpose of the pageThe MC of this video page is an episode ofvideo websiteSaturday Night Live, a very popular televisionshow.This is a humorous, high quality, well producedHigh: Video 2● A satisfying amount of high quality MCvideo with more than 6.5 million views (and● High E-A-T (everyday expertise) on thecounting), illustrating the proper care and“An Engineer’s Guide to Cats”topic of cat ownershippractical benefits of cats. The two engineers invideothe video have everyday expertise on catownership. For a humorous video like this one,expertise does not have to be in the form of atrained veterinarian.High: Game● A satisfying or comprehensive amount ofvery high quality MCOnline game● Positive reputation (website) as anHighly engaging game with multiple levels thateducational tool for kidscould entertain a child for hours. This websitehas a positive reputation for educating childrenabout animals.High: Q&AThe question on the page asks how long● A satisfying amount of high quality MC inpeople live with cancer. There are manyHow long do cancer patients livethe form of personal narrativesresponses describing how long a loved one(YMYL)lived after diagnosis. There is very littlemedical advice and the focus of the page issharing personal experience. Many responsesare heartfelt and well written.Copyright 201923Webpage/Type of ContentHigh Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationThis is a detailed article about the AmericanHigh: Encyclopedia● A satisfying or comprehensive amount ofCivil War. The citations support the E-A-T ofhigh quality MCthis article.Encyclopedia article about the● Positive reputation (website)American Civil War● High E-A-T for the articleNote: Although much of the content is visible onthe mobile page, we consider the content underthe headings (which you need to expand) to bepart of the MC. (To see the screenshot, you willneed to zoom in to the image.)This forum is well-known for discussions onluxury designer purses. On this particularHigh: Forum 1forum page, members are consulting forum● High E-A-T for the purpose of the pageexperts who have expertise authenticating bagsAuthenticating a luxury designer● A satisfying amount of high quality MCfrom this brand. These experts can tell if apurseparticular bag is authentic or fake. While thereis an ad at the top and a few ads within theforum message, it does not distract from theMC, which is easy to find.(To see the screenshot, you will need to zoomin to the image.)This discussion focuses on the landscaping forHigh: Forum 2● High E-A-T for the purpose of the pagea particular paludarium (an aquarium with● A satisfying amount of high quality MCterrestrial and aquatic elements). There is a lotLandscaping an aquariumof discussion and interaction between forummembers about the types of materials andspecies used in the aquarium. The posts showexpertise in a niche topic aquariumlandscaping.Copyright 2019245.0Highest Quality PagesHighest quality pages are created to serve a beneficial purpose and achieve their purpose very well. The distinctionbetween High and Highest is based on the quality and quantity of MC, as well as the level of reputation and E-A-T.What makes a page Highest quality? In addition to the attributes of a High quality page, a Highest quality page musthave at least one of the following characteristics:● Very high level of Expertise, Authoritativeness, and Trustworthiness (E-A-T).● A very satisfying amount of high or highest quality MC.● Very positive website reputation for a website that is responsible for the MC on the page. Very positive reputationof the creator of the MC, if different from that of the website.5.1Very High Quality MCWe will consider the MC of the page to be very high or highest quality when it is created with a high degree of time andeffort, and in particular, expertise, talent, and skill—this may provide evidence for the E-A-T of the page. Very high qualityMC may be created by experts, hobbyists, or even people with everyday expertise. Our standards depend on the purposeof the page and the type of content. For YMYL topics, there is a high standard for accuracy and well-establishedmedical/scientific/historical consensus where such consensus exists.A factor that often distinguishes very high quality MC is the creation of unique and original content for the specific website.While what constitutes original content may be very different depending on the type of website, here are some examples:● For news: very high quality MC is original reporting that provides information that would not otherwise have beenknown had the article not revealed it. Original, in-depth, and investigative reporting requires a high degree of skill,time, and effort. Often very high quality news content will include a description of primary sources and otheroriginal reporting referenced during the content creation process. Very high quality news content must be accurateand should meet professional journalistic standards.● For artistic content (videos, images, photography, writing, etc.): very high quality MC is unique and originalcontent created by highly skilled and talented artists or content creators. Such artistic content requires a highdegree of skill/talent, time, and effort. If the artistic content is related to a YMYL topic (e.g., artistic content withthe purpose of informing or swaying opinion about YMYL topics), YMYL standards should apply.● For informational content: very high quality MC is original, accurate, comprehensive, clearly communicated,professionally presented, and should reflect expert consensus as appropriate. Expectations for different types ofinformation may vary. For example, scientific papers have a different set of standards than information about ahobby such as stamp collecting. However, all types of very high quality informational content share commonattributes of accuracy, comprehensiveness, and clear communication, in addition to meeting standardsappropriate to the topic or field.The Highest rating may be justified for pages with a satisfying or comprehensive amount of very high quality MC.5.2Very Positive ReputationExtensive reputation research is important when giving Highest ratings. Very positive reputation is often based onprestigious awards or recommendations from known experts or professional societies on the topic of the page. Wikipediaand other informational sources can be a good starting point for reputation research.For YMYL topics especially, careful checks for reputation are required. YMYL reputation should be based on evidencefrom experts, professional societies, awards, etc. For shopping pages, experts could include people who have used thestore’s website to make purchases; whereas for medical advice pages, experts should be people or organizations withappropriate medical expertise or accreditation. Please review section 2.3 for a summary of types of YMYL pages/topics.For some topics, such as humor or recipes, less formal expertise is OK. For these topics, popularity, user engagement,and user reviews can be considered evidence of reputation. For topics that need less formal expertise, websites can beconsidered to have a positive reputation if they are highly popular and well-loved for their topic or content type, and arefocused on helping users.Copyright 2019255.3Very High Level of E-A-THighest quality pages and websites have a very high level of expertise or are highly authoritative or highly trustworthy.Formal expertise is important for YMYL topics such as medical, financial, or legal advice. Expertise may be less formal fortopics such as recipes or humor. An expert page on cooking may be a page on a professional chef’s website, or it may bea video from an expert content creator who uploads very high quality cooking videos on YouTube and is one of the mostwell-known and popular content creators for recipes in their area of expertise. Please value life experience and “everydayexpertise” as appropriate. For some topics, the most expert sources of information are ordinary people sharing their lifeexperiences on personal blogs, videos, forums, reviews, discussions, etc.Think about what expertise, authoritativeness, and trustworthiness mean for the topic of the page. Who are the experts?What makes a source trustworthy for the topic? What makes a website highly authoritative for the topic? Standards forvery high E-A-T will differ depending on the topic of the page. YMYL topics will require higher standards.5.4Examples of Highest Quality PagesWebpage/Type of ContentHighest Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and Explanation● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeof the page, including of the publisherThis is a feature article from a newspaper thatHighest: News 1and/or authors for a news articlehas won numerous awards (such as the● A satisfying or comprehensive amount ofPulitzer Prize, James Beard Award, andArticle on a newspaper websiteScripps Howard Award).very high quality MC for the purpose of(YMYL)the page● Very positive reputation (website)The page has a comprehensive amount of veryhigh-quality MC, including in-depth reporting bytwo authors with extensive knowledge andexperience in investigative journalism.● Very high level of E-A-T for the purpose ofthe page, including of the publisher and/orThis is an article on a newspaper website thatHighest: News 2authors for a news articlehas won a variety of awards including the● A satisfying or comprehensive amount ofPulitzer Prize and the GLAAD Media Award.Article on a newspaper websitevery high quality MC for the purpose ofthe pageThe article has a comprehensive amount of● Very positive reputation (website)very high quality MC that is unique and original,including in-depth investigative reporting by twoauthors with extensive knowledge andexperience in investigative journalism.Copyright 201926Webpage/Type of ContentHighest Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationThis page is on a well-known fact-checking anddebunking website that covers urban legends,Highest: Informational 1● A satisfying or comprehensive amount ofInternet rumors, and other stories of unknownvery high quality MCor questionable origin.Fact-checking page on an● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeInternet rumor debunking websiteof the pageThe page has a very satisfying amount of(YMYL)● Positive reputation (website)original MC for users seeking to validate aclaim about a documentary film aboutmermaids. Users can trust the information onthis page due to the website's positivereputation and high level of expertise indebunking non-YMYL stories of this type.● A satisfying or comprehensive amount ofvery high quality MCThis page has a very satisfying amount of MCHighest: Informational 2● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposefor users interested in ball gown weddingof the pagedresses. An abundance of pictures, plusBall gown wedding dress page● Positive reputation (website)options to view by price range, style, etc., arepart of what makes this page so satisfying.This page is on a very popular weddingplanning website.● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeHighest: Government agencyof the pageThis page has a highly satisfying amount of● A satisfying or comprehensive amount ofYosemite National Parkhelpful information about Yosemite Nationalvery high quality MC for the purpose ofinformationPark, including traffic alerts and links to otherthe pageparts of the website with additional information.Since the page is on the official national parkwebsite, it is uniquely authoritative.● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeHighest: Technical 1of the pageThis page offers a satisfying amount of helpful● A satisfying or comprehensive amount ofSoftware tipsand very high quality MC for the purpose of thehigh quality MCpage. Because the page is on the officialwebsite of the company that produces thesoftware, it is highly authoritative.From this Wikipedia article , we learn that“Kernel.org is a main repository of source code● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeHighest: Technical 2for the Linux kernel, the base of the popularof the pageLinux operating system. It makes all versions● A satisfying or comprehensive amount ofLinux Kernel archivesof the source code available to all users... Thehigh quality MCmain purpose of the site is to host a repositoryfor Linux kernel developers and maintainers ofLinux distributions.”This website is the most authoritative source forinformation about Linux.Copyright 201927Webpage/Type of ContentHighest Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationHighest: Financial 1● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeUsers in the U.S. can obtain free credit reportsCredit report information websiteof the pageon this website by providing their Social(YMYL)● Very positive reputation (website)Security Number. This Wikipedia article tells usthat this website is “the only federally mandatedand authorized source for obtaining a freecredit report.”● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeHighest: Financial 2of the pageThe purpose of the page is to provide income● A satisfying or comprehensive amount oftax forms and publications. The websiteTax forms page (YMYL)very high quality MC for the purpose ofrepresents an agency of the U.S. federalthe pagegovernment that handles taxes, so the pageand forms are uniquely authoritative andtrustworthy.● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeHighest: Magazine Article 1of the page● A satisfying or comprehensive amount ofThis article is on a magazine website that hasArticle titled “Secret Fears of thevery high quality MCwon multiple National Magazine awards. TheSuper-Rich”● Very positive reputation (website)article has a comprehensive amount of veryhigh quality and in-depth MC that is unique andoriginal.● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeHighest: Magazine Article 2of the pageThis magazine is very well-known and well● A satisfying or comprehensive amount ofregarded for content about artists and bands,Interview with musical artistvery high quality MCand specifically has a positive reputation for● Very positive reputation (website)interviews with musicians. This article featureshigh quality and original content in its interviewwith the artist.The purpose of this page is to provide an onlineHighest: Medical 1● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeBMI (Body Mass Index) calculator. Theof the pagecalculator is functional and easy to use.BMI calculator (YMYL)● Very positive reputation (website)The website represents an institute that is partof the National Institutes of Health. It has anextremely good reputation and is an expert inmedical topics.Copyright 201928Webpage/Type of ContentHighest Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationHighest: Medical 2● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeof the pageThis is a meningitis reference page on aPage about meningitis (YMYL)● Very positive reputation (website)trustworthy and authoritative website for anonprofit medical research group. This websitehas a reputation of being one of the best webresources for medical information.Highest: Medical 3● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeof the pageThis is an influenza reference page on aPage about seasonal flu (YMYL)● Very positive reputation (website)trustworthy and authoritative medical website.This website has a reputation of being one ofthe best web resources for medical informationof this type.Highest: Medical 4● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeAccording to this Wikipedia article , this hospitalHealth information on a hospitalof the pageis “currently regarded as one of the top 4page (YMYL)hospitals in the United States as rated by U.S.News & World Report .” Users can trustmedical information on this website.The purpose of this page is to provideinformation about, and allow users to buy, a● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeHighest: Shoppingspecific type of school backpack. The pageof the pageprovides a lot of helpful product information, as● Very positive reputation (website)Backpack shopping pagewell as 600 user reviews.● A satisfying or comprehensive amount of(YMYL)high quality MCSince the store produces this backpack, theyare experts on the product, making the page ontheir own website authoritative. In addition, thisstore has a reputation for producing one of thehighest quality and most popular schoolbackpacks on the market.● A satisfying amount of high quality MCHighest: Loginfor its purpose (login page)● Positive reputation (website)Online banking login pageThis page has login functionality, as well as● Very high level of E-A-T for the purpose(YMYL)clear information about what the user is loggingof the pageinto. This is a large, popular bank with a goodreputation.Highest: Charity● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeof the pageHomepage of a charity (YMYL)● Very positive reputation (website)This is a highly reputable charity according tomultiple charity rating organizations.Copyright 201929Webpage/Type of ContentHighest Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationThis is an example of a “custom 404” page.These pages are designed to alert users thatthe URL they are trying to visit no longer exists.The MC of this page is the cartoon, the caption,Highest: Page with Error● A satisfying amount of high quality MCand the search functionality, which is specific toMessagefor its purpose (error page)the content of the website. It is clear that time,● Very positive reputation (website)effort, and talent were involved in its creation.“Custom 404” page● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeof the pageThis publication has a very positive reputationand is specifically known for its cartoons.Keep in mind that for any type of page,including pages with error messages, theremay be a range of highest quality to lowestquality. Therefore, it’s important to evaluate thepage using the same criteria as all other pages,regardless of what type of page it is.● A satisfying or comprehensive amount ofHighest: PDF FileThis PDF file is a detailed campus map of avery high quality MCmajor university, which is hosted on the official● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeCampus mapuniversity website. This is a highly authoritativeof the pagesource for this information. The map includes alisting of the all the buildings, parkingstructures, parking lots, construction areas, etc.● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeThe website is one of the most popular recipeHighest: Recipes 1of the pagewebsites and the author of the recipe is a● A satisfying amount of high quality MCwell-known celebrity chef who specializes inPumpkin pie recipeand featuressouthern cooking.This page has a large number of user reviewsof the recipe, detailed preparation timeinformation, a “recipe box” feature, etc.Highest: Recipes 2● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeEven though this user does not seem to be aof the pagewell-known professional chef, recipes are anChocolate chip cookie recipe on a● A satisfying amount of high quality MCexample of everyday expertise. The author ofrecipe blogand featuresthis blog has documented her extensiveexperimentation with a chocolate chip cookierecipe, and her expertise is demonstrated in thelarge quantity of original high or highest qualityMC.Copyright 201930Webpage/Type of ContentHighest Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationHighest: Video 1● A satisfying or comprehensive amount ofvery high quality MCThis is a high quality, professionally producedThe band OK Go’s music video● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposevideo on the band’s official channel. The musicfor the song “This Too Shall Pass”of the pagevideo represents unique and original contentcreated by a highly skilled and talented musicalartist.Highest: Video 2● A satisfying or comprehensive amount ofvery high quality MCThis is a high quality, popular video. It won the“Henri 2, Paw de Deux” video● Very positive reputation for the content of“Golden Kitty Award” for “Best Cat Video Onthis particular videoThe Internet” at the Walker Art Center's InternetCat Video Film Festival. The video is uniqueand original content created with a high degreeof time and effort.Highest: Video 3● A satisfying or comprehensive amount ofThe MC of this video page is an episode ofvery high quality MCSaturday Night Live on the TV network’s officialSaturday Night Live video on the● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposewebsite, making it highly authoritative andTV network’s websiteof the pagetrustworthy. The episode represents highquality and original content created by a TVshow that has won numerous awards. Belowthe main video, there are many other videosthat users may be interested in.Highest: Q&A● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeThe purpose of the page is to answer questionsof the pageabout the usage of abbreviations. This websiteQ&A page on abbreviations● Very positive reputation (website)has a very good reputation as a reference forinformation on writing, publishing, etc. It isconsidered highly authoritative and trustworthyfor the topic of the page.Highest: Social Media Profile● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeof the pageThe official Twitter profile page of● A satisfying or comprehensive amount ofThis is the official Twitter account for thethe Tennessee Republican Partyhigh quality MCTennessee Republican Party (TNGOP). It is an(YMYL)expert and authoritative source of informationabout the Tennessee Republican Party.Copyright 2019316.0Low Quality PagesLow quality pages may have been intended to serve a beneficial purpose. However, Low quality pages do not achievetheir purpose well because they are lacking in an important dimension, such as having an unsatisfying amount of MC, orbecause the creator of the MC lacks expertise for the purpose of the page.If a page has one or more of the following characteristics, the Low rating applies:● An inadequate level of Expertise, Authoritativeness, and Trustworthiness (E-A-T).● The quality of the MC is low.● There is an unsatisfying amount of MC for the purpose of the page.● The title of the MC is exaggerated or shocking.● The Ads or SC distracts from the MC.● There is an unsatisfying amount of website information or information about the creator of the MC for the purposeof the page (no good reason for anonymity).● A mildly negative reputation for a website or creator of the MC, based on extensive reputation research.If a page has multiple Low quality attributes, a rating lower than Low may be appropriate.6.1Lacking Expertise, Authoritativeness, or Trustworthiness (E-A-T)Low quality pages often lack an appropriate level of E-A-T for the purpose of the page. Here are some examples:● The creator of the MC does not have adequate expertise in the topic of the MC, e.g. a tax form instruction videomade by someone with no clear expertise in tax preparation.● The website is not an authoritative source for the topic of the page, e.g. tax information on a cooking website.● The MC is not trustworthy, e.g. a shopping checkout page that has an insecure connection.Note: Websites with user-generated content span the Page Quality rating spectrum. Please pay careful attention towebsites that allow users to publish content with little oversight, such as social networking pages, video sharing websites,volunteer-created encyclopedias, article sharing websites, forums, etc. Depending on the topic, pages on these websitesmay lack E-A-T.Important: The Low rating should be used if the page lacks appropriate E-A-T for its purpose.6.2Low Quality Main ContentThe quality of the MC is an important consideration for PQ rating. We will consider content to be Low quality if it iscreated without adequate time, effort, expertise, or talent/skill. Pages with low quality MC do not achieve their purposewell.In addition, please examine the title on the page. The title of the page should describe the content.Exaggerated or shocking titles can entice users to click on pages in search results. If pages do not live up to theexaggerated or shocking title or images, the experience leaves users feeling surprised and confused. Here is an exampleof a page with an exaggerated and shocking title: "Is the World about to End? Mysterious Sightings of 25ft Sea SerpentsPrompt Panic!" as the title for an article about the unidentified remains of one small dead fish on a beach. Pages withexaggerated or shocking titles that do not describe the MC well should be rated Low.Important: The Low rating should be used if the page has Low quality MC.Copyright 2019326.3Unsatisfying Amount of Main ContentSome Low quality pages are unsatisfying because they have a small amount of MC for the purpose of the page. Forexample, imagine an encyclopedia article on a very broad topic such as World War II that has just a few paragraphs.Important: The Low rating should be used if the page has an unsatisfying amount of MC for the purpose of the page.6.4Distracting Ads/SCWe expect Ads and SC to be visible. However, some Ads, SC, or interstitial pages (i.e., pages displayed before or afterthe content you are expecting) make it difficult to use the MC. Pages with Ads, SC, or other features that distract from orinterrupt the use of the MC should be given a Low rating.A single pop-over Ad or interstitial page with a clear and easy-to-use close button is not terribly distracting, though maynot be a great user experience. However, difficult-to-close Ads that follow page scrolls, or interstitial pages that require anapp download, can be truly distracting and make the MC difficult to use. You can see examples of interstitial pages here .The content of the Ads, SC, or other features may be distracting as well: sexually suggestive images such as here ,grotesque images such as here , and porn Ads on non-porn pages should be considered very distracting.Finally, Ads and SC can be distracting if the titles or images of the Ads or SC are shocking or disturbing. Here is anexample of a page with shocking and exaggerated titles, images, and text in the Ads and SC.Important: The Low rating should be used if the page has Ads, SC, or other features that interrupt or distract from usingthe MC.6.5Mixed or Mildly Negative Reputation of the Website or Creator of the Main ContentExtensive reputation research is required for all PQ rating tasks unless you have previously researched the reputation ofthe website. Many websites have little reputation information, unfortunately. Of the websites with reputation information,most websites have a good reputation. Please exercise care when researching the reputation of businesses. Try to findas many reviews and ratings as possible, and read the details of negative reviews and low ratings before inferring that thebusiness overall has a negative reputation. A few negative customer service reviews are typical for businesses such asrestaurants.If the MC was not created by the website, research the reputation of the creator of the MC. While many ordinary peopledo not have reputation information available on the Internet, you can find reputation information on well-known YouTubers,journalists, authors, bloggers and vloggers, professionals such as lawyers and doctors, etc.Pay attention when there is evidence of mixed or mildly negative—though not malicious or financiallyfraudulent—reputation. The Low rating should be used if the website or the creator of the MC has a mildly negativereputation.Important: For a YMYL website, a mixed reputation is cause for a Low rating.Copyright 2019336.6Unsatisfying Amount of Information about the Website or Creator of the Main ContentWe expect some form of website information for many or most websites. We expect clear information about who (e.g.,what individual, company, business, foundation, etc.) created the MC, unless there is good reason for anonymity. Along-standing Internet alias or username can also serve the same function as identifying the MC creator. However, theamount of information needed about the website or creator of the MC depends on the purpose of the page. For personalwebsites or non-YMYL forum discussions, an email address or social media link alone may be sufficient.Stores and websites that process financial transactions require a high level of user trust. If a store or financial transactionwebsite has just an email address and physical address, it may be difficult to get help if there are issues with thetransaction. Likewise, many other types of YMYL websites also require a high degree of user trust.Important: For YMYL pages and other pages that require a high level of user trust, an unsatisfying amount of any of thefollowing is a reason to give a page a Low quality rating: customer service information, contact information, informationabout who is responsible for the website or information about who created the content. For other types of websites, useyour judgment.6.7Examples of Low Quality PagesType of Webpage/ContentLow Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationLow: News 1The writing of this article is unprofessional,● Low quality MCincluding many grammar and punctuationArticle about nuclear power● Lacking E-A-Terrors. The MC also appears to have been(YMYL)paraphrased from a science article found on adifferent source, but with factual inaccuraciesintroduced throughout. The combination of lowquality MC and lack of E-A-T justify theLowest+ to Low rating.The title of the article is misleading and doesnot reflect the actual content of the page. TheLow: News 2MC does not explain how to get rid of toxins or● Low quality MCwhat the word "toxins" in the headline refers to.Article titled "Getting Rid Of● Misleading page titleToxins After The Holiday Season"● Lacking E-A-TThe content also has many problems: the(YMYL)writing quality is poor, and the article includesmeaningless statements such as "watertherapy is one of the easiest ways of beautyregimen since it will give enough moisture onthe skin". The article fails to cite sources, andthere is no evidence of E-A-T.Copyright 201934Type of Webpage/ContentLow Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationLow: Informational 1● Low quality MCThis page and website have many of● Disruptive Adscharacteristics of Low quality pages. Close40th birthday party food ideasobservation shows MC that contains mostlycommonly known information and poor qualitywriting. The MC is broken up by large Ads thatdisrupt the user experience.Low: Informational 2● Unsatisfying amount of MC for thepurpose of the pageSome websites rely on users to create virtuallyQ&A unanswered questionall of their MC. In this case, the MC is theuser’s question. If there are no answers, theamount of MC on the page is unsatisfying.Low: Article 1● Low or Lowest quality MCThis content has many problems:Article with tips for dressing for● Lacking E-A-Tinaccurate/meaningless information andthe officecomplete lack of editing with poor spelling andgrammar—both of these characteristics incombination justify the Lowest+ to Low rating.Low: Article 2● Low or Lowest quality MCThis content has many problems: garbledUsing ginger for your health● Lacking E-A-Tinformation and a lack of editing. Both of these(YMYL)characteristics in combination justify theLowest+ to Low rating. In addition, lackingE-A-T on this topic is concerning.This is a YMYL topic. However, the steps listedhere are merely commonly-known informationthat would be of little benefit to someoneinterested in adopting a child from Iraq.Low: Article 3● Low quality MC: commonly knowninformation onlyFor example, step 1 says “Choose an adoptionHow to adopt children from Iraq● Lacking E-A-T on a YMYL topicagency” and suggests looking in a phone book.(YMYL)There is almost no information specific to Iraq.There is no evidence of expertise on adoptionfrom the description about the author.Note that some Ads have the same format aslinks to other articles on this website, potentiallymaking it a bit harder for users to visuallydistinguish these Ads from the MC and SC.Copyright 201935Type of Webpage/ContentLow Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationLow: FinancialPage with advice on picking a● Lacking E-A-T on a YMYL topicThere is no evidence that the author hasquality stock for investmentfinancial expertise. Because this is a YMYL(YMYL)financial article, lacking expertise is a reasonfor a Low rating.Low: Medical● Lacking E-A-T on a YMYL topicThere is no evidence that the author hasPage with information about howmedical expertise. Because this is a YMYLlong the flu lasts (YMYL)medical article, lacking expertise is a reason fora Low rating.This page and website have many ofcharacteristics of Low quality pages. The MC islow quality and lacks important information. Forexample, it gives no indication of how to makeLow: Recipes 1● Low quality and unsatisfying amount ofa crust and doesn’t list premade crust as anMCingredient. It would be very difficult to actuallyApple pie recipemake an apple pie using this recipe.This page is lacking the kind of helpful contentwe expect in recipe pages, such as userreviews or comments. Without suchinformation, it’s hard to tell if the recipe is anygood. The small pink text at the top is nothelpful for users.Low: Recipes 2● Very distracting SC or Ads (not clear) inThis is an example of distracting and disruptivethe right columnGluten-free New York cheesecakeAds/SC: there are large Ads in the main column● Disruptive Ads in the middle columnrecipepushing down the MC as well as highlydistracting content on the right that are labeled“Top Posts & Pages.” It is unclear whetherthese are SC or Ads.Low: Q&A1There are 94 answers to this question with a● Lacking E-A-TPage about Native Americanfew results that seem helpful. Many of thecustoms (YMYL)posts appear to be deliberately incorrect ormisleading, including the top answer, which islabeled the “best answer.”Copyright 201936Type of Webpage/ContentLow Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationPlease read the MC (areas with red boxesaround it), including the completely unhelpful"answer." This answer is so unhelpful, we canLow: Q&A 2consider this question to be unanswered. This● Misleading Ads● Unsatisfying amount of MC for thepage has an unsatisfying amount of MC.Page about a 2002 Volvo partpurpose of the page(YMYL)In addition to a very unhelpful “answer,” thepage design makes it difficult to distinguish theMC from Ads. For example, below the answer,we see a "sponsored answer," which has thesame format as the real answer, but is actuallyan Ad and not an answer to the question—thisis misleading to users.This is a page from a Q&A site with anunanswered question. Q&A pages exist toanswer user questions. Pages withunanswered questions should generally beLow: Q&A 3● Misleading Ads/SCrated Low because they have little MC (just a● Unsatisfying amount of MC for thequestion and no answer) and don’t achievePage about water and soilpurpose of the pagetheir purpose well.In addition to having no answer, this page hasAds and links to other questions (misleadinglylabeled as “Relevant answers”) displayedprominently, which users may mistake foranswers to the question. It takes a moment tonotice that this page actually has no answer.7.0Lowest Quality PagesThis section describes Lowest quality pages. The examples at the end of this section are critical for understanding theseconcepts, so please review them carefully. As a reminder, here are the steps for doing PQ rating.1. Understand the true purpose of the page. Websites and pages should be created for users in order to serve abeneficial purpose, in other words, they should exist to help users.2. Websites or pages without a beneficial purpose, including pages that are created with no attempt to help users, orpages that potentially spread hate, cause harm, or misinform or deceive users, should receive the Lowest rating.E-A-T and other page quality characteristics do not play a role for these pages. For example, any pageattempting to scam users should receive the Lowest rating, whether the scam is created by an expert or not.3. Otherwise, the PQ rating is based on how well the page achieves its purpose using the criteria outlined in theseguidelines. Pages that fail to achieve their purpose should receive the Lowest rating.Copyright 201937Here is a summary of what different types of Lowest pages look like:Type of Lowest PageWhat Pages Look LikePages that potentially● Promote hate or violence towards a group of peoplespread hatePotentially harmful pages● Encourage harm to self or others● Malicious pages, e.g., scams, phishing, malware downloads● Extremely negative or malicious reputationPages that potentially● Demonstrably inaccurate contentmisinform users● YMYL content that contradicts well-established expert consensus● Debunked or unsubstantiated conspiracy theoriesPages that potentially● Deceptive intent, e.g., websites created to deceive usersdeceive users● Deceptive design, e.g., Ads that are disguised as MCLack of purpose pages● No MC● Gibberish MC● Cannot determine a purposePages that fail to achieve● Lowest E-A-Ttheir purpose● No/little MC or lowest quality MC● Copied MC or auto-generated MC● Obstructed or inaccessible MC● Inadequate information about the website or creator of the MC● Unmaintained websites, and hacked, defaced, or spammed pages7.1Lack of Purpose PagesSometimes it is impossible to figure out the purpose of the page. For example, some pages are either accidentally ordeliberately created with no MC or gibberish and/or meaningless MC. Some pages fail to achieve their purpose soprofoundly that the purpose of the page cannot be determined. Such pages serve no real purpose for users.No matter how or why they are created, lack of purpose pages should be rated Lowest quality.7.2Pages that Fail to Achieve Their Purpose7.2.1 Lowest E-A-TOne of the most important criteria of PQ rating is E-A-T. Expertise of the creator of the MC, and authoritativeness ortrustworthiness of the page or website, is extremely important for a page to achieve its purpose well.If the E-A-T of a page is low enough, users cannot or should not use the MC of the page. This is especially true of YMYLtopics. If the page is highly inexpert, unauthoritative or untrustworthy, it fails to achieve its purpose.Important: The Lowest rating should be used if the page is highly inexpert, unauthoritative, or untrustworthy.7.2.2 No/Little Main ContentPages exist to share their MC with users. The following pages should be rated Lowest because they fail to achieve theirpurpose:● Pages with no MC.● Pages with a bare minimum of MC that is unhelpful for the purpose of the page.Copyright 2019387.2.3 Lowest Quality Main ContentThe Lowest rating applies to any page with Lowest Quality MC. Lowest quality MC is content created with suchinsufficient time, effort, expertise, talent, and/or skill that it fails to achieve its purpose. The Lowest rating should alsoapply to pages where users cannot benefit from the MC, for example:● Informational pages with demonstrably inaccurate MC.● The MC is so difficult to read, watch, or use, that it takes great effort to understand and use the page.● Broken functionality of the page due to lack of skill in construction, poor design, or lack of maintenance.Have high standards and think about how typical users in your locale would experience the MC on the page. A page mayhave value to the creator or participants in the discussion, but few to no general users who view it would benefit from theMC.7.2.4 Copied Main ContentOne way to create MC with little to no time, effort, or expertise is to copy it from another source.The word “copied” refers to the practice of “scraping” content, or copying content from other non-affiliated websites withoutadding any original content or value to users (see here for more information on copied or scraped content).Important: We do not consider legitimately licensed or syndicated content to be “copied” (see here for more on websyndication). Examples of syndicated content in the U.S. include news articles by AP or Reuters.The Lowest rating is appropriate if all or almost all of the MC on the page is copied with little or no time, effort, expertise,manual curation, or added value for users. Such pages should be rated Lowest, even if the page assigns credit for thecontent to another source.All of the following are considered copied content:● Content copied exactly from an identifiable source. Sometimes an entire page is copied, and sometimes justparts of the page are copied. Sometimes multiple pages are copied and then pasted together into a single page.Text that has been copied exactly is usually the easiest type of copied content to identify.● Content that is copied, but changed slightly from the original. This type of copying makes it difficult to findthe exact matching original source. Sometimes just a few words are changed, or whole sentences are changed,or a “find and replace” modification is made, where one word is replaced with another throughout the text. Thesetypes of changes are deliberately done to make it difficult to find the original source of the content. We call thiskind of content “copied with minimal alteration.”● Content copied from a changing source, such as a search results page or news feed. You often will not beable to find an exact matching original source if it is a copy of “dynamic” content (content that changes frequently).However, we will still consider this to be copied content.Important: The Lowest rating is appropriate if all or almost all of the MC on the page is copied with little or no time, effort,expertise, manual curation, or added value for users. Such pages should be rated Lowest, even if the page assignscredit for the content to another source.Copyright 2019397.2.5 How to Determine if Content is CopiedHow do you determine whether all or most of the MC is copied? How do you identify the original source of the content?These things can be difficult to determine, but the following steps may help.1. Copy a sentence or phrase in the text. It may be necessary to try a few sentences or phrases from the page justto be sure. When deciding what sentence or phrase to copy, try to find a sentence or series of several wordswithout punctuation, unusual characters, or suspicious words that may have replaced the original text.2. Search on Google by pasting the sentence or phrase (surrounded by quotation marks) inside the Google searchbox. Try a few sentences from the page.Here are some sentences and phrases from this page about “The Wizard of Oz” film and how to search forthem.Sentence or Phrase From a SentenceQuery to Find the Sentence or PhraseTry the query both with and without quotation marks aroundA sentence on the page:the sentence:[ “All are convinced by Dorothy that the Wizard can helpAll are convinced by Dorothy that the Wizard can help themthem too” ]too[ All are convinced by Dorothy that the Wizard can helpthem too ]Try the query both with and without quotation marks aroundA phrase on the page:the sentence:[ “Dorothy uses the Golden Cap to summon the WingedDorothy uses the Golden Cap to summon the WingedMonkeys” ]Monkeys[ Dorothy uses the Golden Cap to summon the WingedMonkeys ]Try the query both with and without quotation marks aroundA different phrase on the page:the sentence:[ “revealing an old man who had journeyed to Oz fromrevealing an old man who had journeyed to Oz from OmahaOmaha long ago in a hot air balloon” ]long ago in a hot air balloon[revealing an old man who had journeyed to Oz fromOmaha long ago in a hot air balloon ]3.Compare the pages you find that match the sentence or phrase. Is most of their MC the same? If so, does oneclearly come from a highly authoritative source that is known for original content creation (newspaper, magazine,medical foundation, etc.)? Does one source seem to reasonably be the original? Does one source appear tohave the earliest publication date, verified by sources like the Wayback Machine?Copyright 201940Use your best judgment. Sometimes it is clear that the content is copied from somewhere, but you cannot tell what theoriginal source is. Other times the content found on the original source has changed enough that searches for sentencesor phrases may no longer match the original source. For example, Wikipedia articles can change dramatically over time.Text copied from old copies may not match the current content. If you strongly suspect the page you are evaluating is notthe original source, consider it likely to be copied.We have confirmed that the above text (the text in the sentence and phrases in the table) comes from an older version ofa Wikipedia article about “The Wizard of Oz,” which can be found using the Internet Archive Wayback Machine . Pleasenote that searching for the above sentence and phrases will not lead you to a current Wikipedia article about “The Wizardof Oz,” which demonstrates how confirming that the MC of a page contains copied content can sometimes be difficult.Important: The Lowest rating is appropriate if all or almost all of the MC on the page is copied with little or no time, effort,expertise, manual curation, or added value for users. Such pages should be rated Lowest, even if the page assignscredit for the content to another source.7.2.6 Auto-Generated Main ContentAnother way to create MC with little to no time, effort, or expertise is to create pages (or even entire websites) bydesigning a basic template from which hundreds or thousands of pages are created, sometimes using content from freelyavailable sources (such as an RSS feed or API). These pages are created with no or very little time, effort, or expertise,and also have no editing or manual curation.Pages and websites made up of auto-generated content with no editing or manual curation, and no original content orvalue added for users, should be rated Lowest.7.2.7 Obstructed or Inaccessible Main ContentMC cannot be used if it is obstructed or inaccessible due to Ads, SC, or interstitial pages . If you are not able to access theMC, please use the Lowest rating.Here are some examples of pages with obstructed MC that should be rated Lowest:● Ads that continue to cover the MC as you scroll down the page, that are virtually impossible to close withoutclicking on the Ad.● An interstitial page that redirects the user away from the MC without offering any path back to the MC.7.2.8 Inadequate Information about the Website or Creator of the Main ContentAs discussed in Section 2.5.3, we expect most websites to have some information about who (e.g., what individual,company, business, foundation, etc.) is responsible for the website and who created the MC, as well as some contactinformation, unless there is a good reason for anonymity. For websites with YMYL pages, such as online banks, weexpect to find a lot of information about the site, including extensive customer service information.Think about the purpose of the website and the type of website information users would expect or demand.YMYL pages with absolutely no information about the website or creator of the MC, or other pages where the availableinformation is completely inadequate for the purpose of the website (e.g., an online bank with only an email address),should be rated Lowest.7.2.9 Unmaintained Websites, and Hacked, Defaced, or Spammed PagesSome websites are not maintained or cared for at all by their webmaster. These “abandoned” websites will fail to achievetheir purpose over time, as content becomes stale or website functionality ceases to work on new browser versions.Unmaintained websites should be rated Lowest if they fail to achieve their purpose due to the lack of maintenance.Copyright 201941Unmaintained websites may also become hacked, defaced, or spammed with a large amount of distracting and unhelpfulcontent. These pages should also be rated Lowest because they fail to accomplish their original purpose.For reference, a hacked or defaced website is a site that has been modified without permission from the website owner(s).Responsible webmasters should regularly check their websites for suspicious behavior and take steps to protect users.We’ll consider a comment or forum discussion to be “spammed” if there are posts with unrelated comments that are notintended to help other users, but rather to advertise a product or create a link to a website. Frequently these commentsare posted by a “bot” rather than a real person. While a specific page on a website may have a large amount of spammedforum discussions or spammed user comments, it does not mean that the entire website contains only spam.7.3Pages that Potentially Spread HateUse the Lowest rating for pages that promote hate or violence against a group of people, including but not limited to thosegrouped on the basis of race or ethnic origin, religion, disability, age, nationality, veteran status, sexual orientation, genderor gender identity. Websites advocating hate or violence can cause real world harm.Hate may be expressed in inflammatory, emotional, or hateful-sounding language, but may also be expressed in polite oreven academic-sounding language.Extensive reputation research is important for identifying websites that promote hate or violence. Please identifyreputable and well-established organizations that provide information about hate groups in your locale when researchingreputation. Some websites may not have reputation information available. In this case, please use your judgment basedon the MC of the page and knowledge of your locale.7.4Potentially Harmful Pages7.4.1 Encourage HarmUse the Lowest rating for pages that encourage or incite harm. Harm includes mental, physical, or emotional harm to selfor others. For example:● User discussions that attempt to justify sexual abuse of children.● How-to or step-by-step information on how to commit acts of terrorism or violent extremism.● Depictions of extreme gore or violence, without a beneficial purpose.● Suicide promotion or pro-anorexia webpages that encourage users to engage in behavior that can result inhospitalization or death.● Pages with scary death threats or other realistic-sounding threatening language.7.4.2 Malicious PagesMalicious pages are created with harmful intent or created to benefit the website or other organization at the cost of theuser. Use the Lowest rating for any harmful or malicious page, including the following:● Pages or websites that you strongly suspect are scams (see these links for more information about Internetscams: Avoid Scams 1, Avoid Scams 2, Internet Fraud).● Pages that ask for personal information without a legitimate reason (for example, pages that ask for name,birthdate, address, bank account, government ID number, etc.).● Pages that “phish” for passwords to Facebook, Gmail, or other popular online services. See here for informationabout “phishing” fraud.● Pages with suspicious links, including malware download links or other types of links that are detrimental to users.Copyright 201942If you suspect a link is malicious, please do not click on it. You do not need to personally experience a maliciousdownload in order to confirm that a website is harmful. Likewise, if you feel strongly that a website is a scam, you do notneed to engage with it to get proof.Use the Lowest rating if you suspect a page is malicious, even if you’re not able to completely confirm that the page isharmful. Please exercise caution and practice good Internet safety skills.7.4.3 Negative or Malicious ReputationUse the Lowest rating if the website and the creators of the MC have a negative or malicious reputation. Here are someexamples originally shown in Section 2.6.4. All pages on these websites should be rated Lowest because of the negativeor malicious reputation of these websites.WebsiteDescriptionNegative reputation information: This business has a BBB rating of F. There is a news articleSite selling children’s jungle gymabout financial fraud. There are many reviews on websites describing how users sent money anddid not receive anything in return.Site selling products related toNegative/malicious reputation information: This website engaged in criminal behavior such aseyewearphysically threatening users.Organization serving theNegative reputation information: There are many detailed negative articles on news sites andhospitalized veteran communitycharity watchdog sites describing fraud and financial mishandling about this organization.7.5Pages that Potentially Misinform UsersThe purpose of an informational page is to communicate accurate information. Assume an informational purpose forpages that look as though they are informational or pages that many users go to for information, even if it is not an officialnews source or an official encyclopedia article. This includes pages that appear to be news, social profile pagesspreading news or information, forum discussions about informational topics such as current events, videos which covernews topics, etc.The Lowest rating must be used for any of the following types of content on pages that could appear to be informational:● Demonstrably inaccurate content.● YMYL content that contradicts well-established expert consensus.● Debunked or unsubstantiated conspiracy theories.Lowest should also be used under these circumstances:● The content creator may believe that the conspiracy theory or demonstrably inaccurate content is correct, or it isunclear whether they do.● The content creators may be deliberately attempting to misinform users.● The content creators describe, repeat or spread conspiracy theories or demonstrably inaccurate content without aclear effort to debunk or correct it, regardless of whether the creators believe it to be true. For example, contentcreators may produce this content in order to make money or gain attention.Some examples of information that would be found on Lowest quality pages include: the moon landings were faked,carrots cure cancer, and the U.S. government is controlled by lizard people. While some of these topics may seem funny,there have been real world consequences from people believing these kinds of internet conspiracy theories andmisinformation.Copyright 201943Find high quality, trustworthy sources to check accuracy and the consensus of experts if you are unsure about a topic. Beespecially careful with YMYL topics such as medical, scientific, financial, historical, or current events that are necessaryfor maintaining an informed citizenry.Please research conspiracy theories. Fact-checking websites cannot keep up with the volume of conspiracy theoriesproduced by the Internet. Some conspiracy theories are impossible to debunk because they claim all debunkinginformation is inaccurate. If a claim or conspiracy theory seems wildly improbable and cannot be verified by independenttrustworthy sources, consider it unsubstantiated.7.6Pages that Potentially Deceive UsersWe will consider a page to be “deceptive” if it may deceive users or trick search engines. All deceptive pages should berated Lowest.The following sections describe characteristics of deceptive pages. However, no list of deceptive characteristics will becomplete—deceptive websites continue to evolve as users and search engines figure out how they are being tricked.With practice, you will be able to identify deceptive pages accurately.7.6.1 Deceptive Page PurposeSome pages are deliberately created to deceive users, for example:● A webpage or website that impersonates a different site (e.g., copied logo or branding of an unaffiliated site, URLthat mimics another site's name, etc.).● A non-satirical social network profile made by an impersonator.● A webpage or website that looks like a news source or information page, but in fact has articles to manipulateusers in order to benefit a person, business, government, or other organization politically, monetarily, or otherwise.● A webpage claims to offer an independent review or share other information about a product, but is in fact createdto make money for the owner of the website without attempting to help users. For example, the MC may containintentionally misleading or inaccurate information created with the sole purpose of getting users to click onmonetized links or buy the product.● A website claims to be the personal website of a celebrity, but the website is actually created to make money forthe owner of the website without the permission of the celebrity. For example, the page may have falsetestimonials for a product and is created for the sole purpose of getting users to click on monetized links or buythe product.● A webpage with a misleading title or a title that has nothing to do with the content on the page. Users who cometo the page expecting content related to the title will feel tricked or deceived.● A webpage or website with deceptive website information. For example, the website may misrepresent who ownsthe site, what the website purpose really is, how the content was created, how to contact the site, etc.Any page or website that may deceive or trick users should be rated Lowest, regardless of intent. Use the Lowest ratingeven if you cannot see a reason for the deception or even if you think most users wouldn’t “fall” for the trick.You should also use the Lowest rating if you suspect a page is deceptive, even if you’re not able to completely confirm it.Please exercise caution and practice good Internet safety skills since deceptive pages may be malicious.7.6.2 Deceptive Page DesignSome pages are deliberately designed to manipulate users to take an action that will benefit the owner of the websiterather than help the user.Copyright 201944Here are some common types of deceptively designed pages:● Pages that disguise Ads as MC. Actual MC may be minimal or created to encourage users to click on the Ads.For example, fake search pages (example ) that have a list of links that look like a page of search results. If youclick on a few of the links, you will see that the page is just a collection of Ads disguised as search engine results.A “search box” is present, but submitting a new query just gives you a different page of Ads disguised as searchresults.● Pages that disguise Ads as website navigation links. For example, fake directory pages (example ) that looklike a personally curated set of helpful links, possibly with unique descriptions. In reality, the links are Ads or linksto other similar pages on the site. Sometimes the descriptions of the links are unrelated to the page.● Pages where the MC is not usable or visible. For example, a page that has such a large amount of Ads at thetop of the page (before the MC), so that most users will not see the MC, or a page where the MC is invisible text.● Any page designed to trick users into clicking on links, which may be Ads or other links intended to serve theneeds of the website rather than to the benefit of the user.Take a good look at the page and use your judgment. If you believe the page was deliberately created to manipulateusers to click on Ads, monetized links, questionable download links, etc., rather than help users, the page should be ratedLowest.Copyright 2019457.7Examples of Lowest Quality PagesType of Webpage/ContentLowest Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationThis page is deceptively designed to makeusers believe they are on the official ABC Newswebsite. The official ABC logo is copied andused prominently throughout the page, and the● Harmful purposeURL of this website (http://abcnews.com.co/) isLowest: Deceptive page purpose● Deceptive design: impersonates avery similar to the official site's URLand design – News websitedifferent website(http://abcnews.go.com/).(YMYL)● Lowest quality MC: demonstrablyinaccurate contentThe articles on this website includedemonstrably inaccurate content, such as aninaccurate news report that Obama banned thePledge of Allegiance .The deceptive website design and inaccuratecontent can misinform users. This website wascreated with a harmful purpose.The MC on this page contains factuallyunsupported theories related to the Vatican'sknowledge of the planet Nibiru, the existence of● Presents unsubstantiated conspiracyaliens, and upcoming world events. AlthoughLowest: Potentially misinformtheories as if the information were factualvarious Vatican officials and scientists areusers – Unsubstantiated● Lowest quality MC: unsubstantiatedquoted in the article, the quotations do notconspiracy theories (YMYL)conspiracy theorysupport the article's claims, and in some casesdo not seem to come from the person quoted.The Nibiru cataclysm and related events havealso been thoroughly debunked by authoritativesources (Reference 1, Reference 2). Thedemonstrably inaccurate content on this pagecan misinform users.This video describes the unsubstantiated and● Presents unsubstantiated conspiracyoutlandish conspiracy theory that shape-shiftingLowest: Potentially misinformtheories as if the information were factuallizard people interbred with humans and areusers – Unsubstantiated● Lowest quality MC: unsubstantiatednow running the world via government,conspiracy theory video (YMYL)conspiracy theorymonetary, and religious organizations.The video has high production quality, andsome viewers may find it funny or entertaining.However, the video could appear to beinformational and should be rated Lowest.Copyright 201946Type of Webpage/ContentLowest Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationLowest: Promotes hate or● Promotes hate or violence towards aThe Stormfront website promotes whiteviolence – Hate organizationgroup of peoplesupremacist ideology and is considered to be ahomepage (YMYL)hate site/group by many organizations andarticles, including: Anti-Defamation League ,Fox News article, USA Today article, PewResearch Center , etc.Lowest: Deceptive page purpose● Deceptive purpose: non-satirical pageThis Twitter profile page (username TEN_GOP)– Social media profile (YMYL)made by an impersonatorwas created to impersonate the TennesseeRepublican Party (username TNGOP). Formore information, see this article: FakeTennessee GOP Twitter account highlighted inindictment of 13 Russians .At the time this example was written, BettyWhite was alive. This profile page on a socialmedia website leads users to believe she is● Harmful purposedead. Comments on the page indicate thatLowest: Demonstrably inaccurate● Lowest quality MC: demonstrablysome users have realized that it is inaccurate.content – Social media profileinaccurate contentIf the page were truly created in error, thesecomments should have led the creator torealize the mistake and delete the page.While it is not clear why this type of page wascreated in the first place, it appears to be adeliberate intent to misinform users, which is aharmful purpose.This news article is demonstrably inaccurate.● Harmful purposeThe event described here (the death of Miley● Deceptive page designCyrus) did not happen. Note that no date isLowest: Demonstrably inaccurate● Lowest quality MC: demonstrablygiven, no sources are cited, and there is nocontent – News articleinaccurate contentauthor. This website is designed to look like a● An unsatisfying amount of informationnews source, but there is no information on theabout the website and authornews organization that created the website orits content. The SC also features distractingpictures and outrageously titled links.This page was created to misinform users,which is a harmful purpose.Copyright 201947Type of Webpage/ContentLowest Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationThis is an example of a spammed forum page,where the goal is to try and get users to watchLowest: Keyword Stuffing –Forum● Lowest quality MC: large amount ofa movie online, which has nothing to do withpage: Watch RoboCop online“Keyword Stuffed” MCthe purpose of the site. For a forum page, theuser comments are the MC, and much of thecontent is not helpful for users. Here is anexample of some of the “keyword stuffing” onthis page that is not meant to be read by ahuman, found near the bottom of the page.● Lowest quality MC: copied content withAll MC is a copy of an old Wikipedia article,little or no time, effort, expertise, manualLowest: Copied content – Wizardwhich you can see here by researching it oncuration, or added value for usersof Ozthe Internet Archive Wayback Machine .● No evidence of E-A-TThe current Wikipedia page offers much morecontent, links, references, etc. This pagedoesn’t add much value for users.● An unsatisfying amount of MC for thetopic of the pageThis page has so many low qualityLowest: Unsatisfying amount of● Very low quality MCcharacteristics that the Lowest+ rating isMC – Wedding dresses● No evidence of E-A-Tappropriate. There is a question about what● True purpose of the page and website isthe true purpose of the page is—Lowest isquestionableappropriate if you feel this page was createdwith little attempt to help users.Lowest: Malicious, harmful, ordeceptive – Asks for personal● Malicious, harmful, or deceptiveThis is a shopping checkout page, but it asksinformation (YMYL)for the user’s government ID number, driver’slicense number, ATM pin number, bank accountinformation, etc.The first sentence is incomplete, and doesn’t● Auto-generated MC, created with little toLowest: Auto-generated with Littleprovide an explanation for the code, andno time, effort, expertise, manualAttempt to Help Users – Enginetherefore fails the purpose of the page. Othercuration, or added value for usersCode (YMYL)pages on the website have inaccurate,● No evidence of E-A-Tmisleading, and/or incomplete information. Infact, some pages seem borderline gibberish,with contradicting information. It appears thepage exists only to make money, with noattempt to help users.Copyright 201948Type of Webpage/ContentLowest Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationLowest: Fraudulent – Charity● Extremely negative or maliciousThere are many claims of fraud and financial(YMYL)reputationproblems about this organization on reputablenews sites and charity watchdog sites:Negative review 1, Negative review 2, Negativereview, and Negative review 4.There is no information about who created thiswebsite, no contact information, and noLowest: No website information –● No website information for YMYL websiteauthorship information.About dry sockets (YMYL)● No evidence of E-A-TMedical pages require a high degree of usertrust. Because there is no information aboutwho owns this website and who created thiscontent, we will consider this an untrustworthywebsite.● Deceptive purpose (fake directory page)Lowest: Fake directory page -● No website information for YMYL topicThe links on the page appear to link to helpfulMesothelioma (YMYL)● No evidence of E-A-Tarticles, but in fact the links are Ads that do notgo to articles. This is a YMYL topic, but there isno indication about who is responsible for thiscontent or website.Lowest: Fake search page –● Deceptive purpose (fake search page)Chicken recipesAdvertising should never disguise itself as theMC of the page. Pages with Ads that aredesigned to look like MC should be considereddeceptive.Lowest: Fake search page –● Deceptive purpose (fake search page)ChairsThis page was created to make money fromclicks on Ads rather than to help users.This looks like an information website for a● Lowest quality MC (copied content withdrug. The real purpose of this page is to getlittle or no time, effort, expertise, manualLowest: Deceptive purpose –users to this website, and then get them to clickcuration, or added value for users)Viagra (YMYL)on the “order now” link, which takes users to● No website information for YMYL websiteanother website.● No evidence of E-A-TAll MC on this page is copied with little or notime, effort, expertise, manual curation, oradded value for users. Here is the originalsource .Copyright 201949Type of Webpage/ContentLowest Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and Explanation● Purpose of the page to make money withLowest: Deceptive page purposevery little or no attempt to help usersThis page is titled “Washing Machine Reviews,”and design – Washing machine● Lowest quality MC (copied content withbut there are no reviews on the page and thereviews (YMYL)little or no time, effort, expertise, manualcontent is copied from another website. Thecuration, or added value for users)links all go to a single Internet retailer sellingwashing machines. This is a deceptive pagebecause it is designed to get users to click onthe prominent links.This page contains a fake survey, whichappears to promise users the opportunity to winan Apple MacBook Air, an iPhone 5c, or aGalaxy S4. However, after completing somesurvey questions and selecting the product theuser would like to win, the user is redirected toLowest: Deceptive page purpose● Deceptive purposewebsite after website to complete more and- Fake survey page● Highly untrustworthymore survey questions, while being asked tosupply more and more personal information,including medical information and bank accountinformation.There is no information about who isresponsible, even though this website asks forhighly personal information such as bankaccount numbers. Despite appearances, thereis no affiliation with Google.Lowest: Deceptive page design –● Deceptive or misleading page designJavascript alert boxSome users might not even notice the MCbecause it is under a long list of Ads. Usersmay mistake the Ads for MC.The title of this page is “Rachael Ray DietBlog,” but the page has nothing to do withRachael Ray or her diet or her products. Thispage exists to sell products using RachaelRay’s name and image. In fact, there is aLowest: Deceptive page purpose● Deceptive purpose and deceptive contentbrown-text-on-brown-background section at the- Rachael Ray diet blog (YMYL)bottom of the page (which we consider to behidden text) that says “Disclaimer: Rachael Rayis not affiliated with nor does she sponsor orendorse this blog.” This page is deceptive inspite of the disclaimer!This example has been annotated with red textat the top to point out deceptive aspects of thispage.Copyright 201950Type of Webpage/ContentLowest Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and Explanation● Lacking in purposeLowest: Keyword stuffing and● Lowest quality MC (gibberish, keywordgibberish- Imodium for dogsstuffing)This page has no helpful MC and no helpfulpurpose.Lowest: Malicious website – Site● Very negative, malicious,This website took users’ money and physicallyselling products related toor financially fraudulent reputationthreatened users who complained. Theseeyewear (YMYL)articles on Wikipedia and the New York Timesdescribe the deceptive techniques used by thiswebsite and provide other negative informationabout the website and its owner.Lowest: Gibberish – Celebrity● Lacking in purposesite● Lowest quality MC (gibberish)This page has no helpful MC and no helpfulpurpose.Lowest: Gibberish – PDF file● Lowest quality MC (gibberish)● Lack of purposeThis is a gibberish PDF file. We don’t have anyidea why this was created. There are no linksor Ads. This page has no purpose and noreason to exist.Lowest: Lack of purpose – Free● Lowest quality MC (gibberish)credit report (YMYL)● Highly untrustworthyThis page has deceptive features, such as afriend request, a prize alert, and a downloadbutton.● Lacking in purposeLowest: Lack of purpose – Las● Lowest quality MC (gibberish, keywordVegas gambling termsstuffing)This page has no MC and no helpful purpose.Lowest: Highly untrustworthy –● No evidence of E-A-TArticle about how to cure● Inaccurate or misleadingThis content is poorly written and uses a lot ofstomach flu (YMYL)● No website information for YMYL topicwords to say very little. There is no informationabout who is responsible for the content and nocontact information for this YMYL medical topic.Copyright 201951Type of Webpage/ContentLowest Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationThis is a download website with only one page- this page. There is a lot of text (with grammarLowest: Highly untrustworthy –and spelling errors) promising that users will● Highly untrustworthy (suspect download)Download pagemake money from this free download. Thepurpose of the page seems to be to enticeusers into clicking on the links with the promiseof making money.Remember that you are not required to click onany links that are suspicious.This is an example of a page with no MC. YouLowest: Deliberately created with● Large amount of prominent Ads and nomight think that the MC is “missing” due to ano MCattempt to help usersproblem with this particular page, but in fact,this website has hundreds of pages that lookthe same way—no MC, just Ads. This websiteshows Ads with little or no attempt to helpusers, and should be rated Lowest quality.This content has many problems: poorLowest: Low quality MC – Article● Lowest quality MCgrammar, and sentences that are meaninglessabout popping pimples (YMYL)● No evidence of E-A-Tor state something obvious. For example:"Popping pimples could be or could be not thenew trend of getting rid of them." In addition,the “About the Author” section of the page hasan Ad, but no information about the author.Lowest: Low quality MC – Article● Lowest quality MCabout getting a mortgage in TexasThe level of expertise of the author of this● No evidence of E-A-T(YMYL)content is not clearly communicated. Providingthis background information is particularlyimportant for medical, financial, or other YMYLtopics for which expertise is needed.Lowest: YMYL page withinaccurate information – Chest● YMYL page with inaccurate potentiallyWe must evaluate this page from the point ofpains and smoking (YMYL)dangerous medical adviceview of a user visiting this page from a search● Lowest quality MCengine, rather than a participant. The questionis poorly worded and difficult to understand.The answers are poorly worded and haveincorrect and potentially dangerous medicaladvice. The MC is low quality.Copyright 201952Type of Webpage/ContentLowest Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and Explanation● YMYL page with potentially damagingLowest: YMYL page with badfinancial adviceinformation – Paying off loansThis page gives loan advice that can be● No evidence of E-A-T(YMYL)potentially damaging, for example, instructing● Inaccurate or misleadingpeople not to pay back their loans. The articlehas grammar and spelling errors, and the pageis highly untrustworthy.This page is selling Nike Air Jordan shoes.When you look at the “Contact Us” page , itdoes not give the name of a company or a● Completely inadequate or untrustworthyphysical address, which also cannot be foundLowest: Potentially untrustworthycustomer service information for aanywhere else on the website. This amount ofshopping page with insufficientshopping websitecontact information is not sufficient for acontact info (YMYL)● No evidence of E-A-Tshopping website.● Inaccurate or misleadingIn addition, the “Shipping and Returns” pagehas the name of another company that seemsto be unrelated. There are also official lookinglogos at the bottom of the homepage, includingthe Better Business Bureau logo and GoogleCheckout logo, that don’t appear to beaffiliated with the website.8.0Medium Quality PagesIn this section, we will describe pages that should get the Medium quality rating. Medium pages have a beneficialpurpose and achieve their purpose.There are two types of Medium quality pages:Type of Medium PageDiscussionNothing wrong, but nothingThe page achieves its purpose, however, it does not merit a High quality rating, nor is therespecialanything to indicate that a Low quality rating is appropriate.Mixed with strong High qualityThe page or website has strong High quality rating characteristics, but also has mild Low qualityrating characteristicscharacteristics. The strong High quality aspects make it difficult to rate the page Low.Copyright 2019538.1Examples of Medium Quality PagesWebpage/Type of ContentMedium Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationMedium: Encyclopedia● Nothing wrong, but nothing specialWikipedia article about baroqueThis is a short Wikipedia article about baroquepearlspearls, a fairly narrow topic. This page is OKfor its purpose, but it doesn’t displaycharacteristics associated with a High rating.Medium: HumorPage from a humorous site● Nothing wrong, but nothing specialThis page is from a humorous site thatencourages users to post photos with mouthsdrawn on them. This page is OK for itspurpose, but it doesn’t display characteristicsassociated with a High rating.Medium: Entertainment 1● Nothing wrong, but nothing specialArticle about “Keeping Up with theThis page is on a website dedicated toKardashians” showentertainment news. This page is OK for itspurpose, but it doesn’t display characteristicsassociated with a High rating.Medium: Entertainment 2● Nothing wrong, but nothing specialThis page is from a news/entertainmentArticle about Miley Cyruswebsite. This page is OK for its purpose, but itdoesn’t display characteristics associated witha High rating.Medium: Q&AQ&A page where a user is looking● Nothing wrong, but nothing specialThis Q&A page has a discussion of differentfor advice on where to buy highonline merchants. There is some everydayquality women's clothing onlineexpertise, but it doesn’t display characteristicsassociated with a High rating.Copyright 201954Webpage/Type of ContentMedium Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationThis is an example of a “custom 404” page.These pages are designed to alert users thatMedium: Page with Errorthe URL they are trying to visit no longer exists.MessageSome websites do a nice job of not only alerting● Nothing wrong, but nothing specialusers about a problem, but also giving them“Custom 404” pagehelp.This page is on a well-known merchant websitewith a good reputation. However, this particularpage displays the bare minimum of contentneeded to explain the problem to users, andthe only help offered is a link to the homepage.Medium: Informational● Mixed, but has some E-A-T● Website has a good reputationAlthough this is a well-known, highly-respectedPage about propulsion on the● Content is likely to be accurate anduniversity with a high quality site, this page is“Quality Reasoning Group”trustworthy because of the website,on a very specialized section of the universitysection of a university’s websitethough no reference links are providedwebsite. No author is listed and the page mayhave been a one-time project, possibly from astudent, which is no longer maintained.Medium: Lyrics● Nothing wrong, but nothing specialSong lyrics for the song “NeverThere are many lyrics websites that haveYou/Fear Love”similar content. This page is OK for itspurpose, but it doesn’t display characteristicsassociated with a High rating.Medium: Recipe 1This recipe was contributed by an author of● Nothing wrong, but nothing specialMexi-Chicken Casserole on acookbooks. However, the page has no SCnewspaper websiterelated to the purpose of the page, such asreviews or links to other recipes, etc. This pageis OK for its purpose, but it doesn’t displaycharacteristics associated with a High rating.Medium: Recipe 2● Nothing wrong, but nothing specialThis website is known for high quality contentabout animals and the environment. ThisRecipe for cherry-topped cakeparticular page has a recipe for kids. Thereisn’t much MC or SC. This page is OK for itspurpose, but it doesn’t display characteristicsassociated with a High rating.Copyright 201955Webpage/Type of ContentMedium Quality CharacteristicsPQ Rating and ExplanationMedium: Video● Nothing wrong, but nothing specialThis is a professionally-created video of a cuteVideo of a kitten meowing a lotkitten meowing. This page is OK for itspurpose, but it doesn’t display characteristicsassociated with a High rating.Medium: Forum 1Forum page on an online auction● Mixed, but with some redeeming qualitieswebsite. A user is looking forThe relative lack of MC is balanced a bit by thehelp choosing a product category.expertise of this forum. This forum is dedicatedto this kind of question.This forum is about dance topics, and manypages have expertise from a community ofballet dancers. On this particular page,Medium: Forum 2participants have everyday experience washingballet shoes and make recommendationsForum page on a dance website.● Mixed, but with some redeeming qualitiesbased on their own experiences.A user is looking for advice onhow to wash ballet shoes.This page is “mixed” because there is somedistracting content that makes it hard to readthe MC. However, this is not a beauty contest!Even though the page may be cluttered, thereis some valuable everyday expertise andhelpful MC, making Medium a good rating forthis page.9.0Page Quality Rating TasksAt first, PQ rating may seem difficult. There are several aspects of the page and the website to look at and think about.This type of rating takes practice. Rereading sections of these guidelines and thinking about the examples may helpwhen you encounter difficult rating tasks.Important: Do not struggle with each PQ rating. Please give your best rating and move on. If you are having troubledeciding between two ratings, use the lower rating. If you are torn between three ratings, choose the one in the middle.Do not consider the country or location of the page or website for PQ rating. For example, English (US) raters should usethe same PQ standards when rating pages from other English language websites (UK websites, Canadian websites, etc.)as they use when rating pages from U.S. websites. In other words, English (US) raters should not lower the PQ ratingbecause the page location (UK, Canada) does not match the task location.These guidelines are specific to “regular” webpages. Occasionally, you may be asked to rate a landing page that is not awebpage. For example, you may be asked to rate a PDF file, a PNG or JPEG image file, etc. When the landing page ofthe URL is not a webpage, some of the criteria in these guidelines may not apply. In this case, please use your judgment.Finally, this Page Quality Rating Guideline does not completely cover every aspect of page quality. If you find pages thatyou truly believe to be High or Low quality, please rate them as such, even if the reason is based on something notcovered in this document. Please use the comment section to explain your reasoning. As always, use your judgment.Copyright 2019569.1Instructions for Rating Page Quality TasksThe Page Quality task page is broken up into several parts:1. Some initial questions about the task landing page.2. A “PQ grid” to record your observations about PQ characteristics of the landing page.3. The Overall PQ rating slider which records your Overall PQ rating.4. A comment box to explain your rating.Some results to the initial questions will end the task early. If the page is Porn, Foreign Language, or Did Not Load, youwill not fill in the PQ grid or assign an overall rating.● Foreign Language should be used when the language on the landing page is NOT the task language, a languagethat is commonly used by a significant percentage of the population in the task location, or English.● Did Not Load should be used for pages where there is absolutely no content on the page created by the website.There is no MC, SC, or Ads on the page. See this Wikipedia article for descriptions of different types of errormessages.Similarly, if you respond that the page is malicious, harmful, deceptive, or lacking in purpose, you will also not fill in the PQgrid or assign an overall rating.The PQ grid is designed to be your "note pad." It allows you to record your observations about the landing page and thewebsite it belongs to.9.1.1 Rating on Your PhoneYou should open the task landing page on your phone using the standard Send to Device feature, unless otherwiseinstructed. However, more intensive analysis on the website can be done on your computer. For example, you shouldopen and explore the links that are provided to help you do research on website information and reputation on yourcomputer.Important: Clicking on the task URL may bring up an interstitial page. You can ignore this page in your rating criteria ifyou can easily get to the MC. However, if the interstitial page makes it extremely hard (or impossible) to get to the MC,that should factor into your Page Quality rating.9.2Reputation and E-A-T: Website or the Creators of the Main Content?You must consider the reputation and E-A-T of both the website and the creators of the MC in order to assign a PageQuality rating.The reputation and E-A-T of the creators of the MC is extremely important when a website has different authors or contentcreators on different pages. This is true of forum and Q&A pages, news websites, or websites that have user-generatedcontent, such as YouTube, Twitter, etc. The reputation and E-A-T assessment for pages on these types of websites maydiffer drastically depending on what page you are evaluating. There are Highest quality YouTube videos created byhighly reputable and expert content creators, as well as Lowest quality YouTube videos created with a dangerous lack ofE-A-T on YMYL topics.Important: Research the reputation and E-A-T of both the website and the creators of the MC. If either are lacking forthe purpose of the page, the Low or Lowest rating is appropriate.Copyright 20195710.0 Page Quality Criteria for Specific Types of Pages10.1 Ratings for Encyclopedia PagesThere are many encyclopedia-type websites. Some are highly-respected publications that are standard references, whilesome are websites with content created and edited by anonymous users, with no editorial oversight or fact checking. Wemay not always know the author of the specific encyclopedia article, and therefore must rely on website reputationresearch to determine the E-A-T of the article. High and Highest quality ratings should only be used for encyclopediaswith very good reputations for accuracy and expertise, where the article itself is well-researched with appropriatereferences cited.A note about Wikipedia: in general, the website has a good reputation and is a very popular resource that is generallyvalued for accuracy. However, there is no single author or organization that vouches for the accuracy of Wikipediaarticles, and the quality of pages varies. You should perform page-level checks on individual articles.A Wikipedia article on a non-YMYL topic (example ) with a satisfying amount of accurate information and trustworthyexternal references can usually be rated in the High range. Some Wikipedia articles may even be rated higher, althoughremember that a high level of expertise is required for YMYL topics. A PQ rating in the Medium range is often appropriatefor pages with less extensive MC and external references. Naturally, Wikipedia articles with very little MC should getlower PQ ratings. Factual inaccuracy is a sufficient reason for a Low or Lowest rating.10.2 Ratings for Pages with Error Messages or No MCSome pages are temporarily broken pages on otherwise functioning websites, while some pages have an explicit error (orcustom 404) message. In some cases, pages are missing MC as well. Please think about whether the page offers helpfor users—did the webmaster spend time, effort, and care on the page?Here are some examples.Webpage/Type of ContentCharacteristics of the PagePQ Rating and ExplanationThis is an example of a page with no MC. You● Large amount of prominent Ads and noDeliberately created with no MCmight think that the MC is “missing” due to aattempt to help usersproblem with this particular page, but in fact,this website has hundreds of pages that lookthe same—no MC, just Ads. This websiteshows Ads with little or no attempt to helpusers, and should be rated Lowest quality.● No MC (probably due to a temporaryPage didn't fully load and has notechnical error)This page has no MC and no error message. ItMC● Sufficient SCis an isolated example of a page with no MC or● Positive reputationerror message on a website for a reputablenewspaper for a town in Michigan. All of thenavigation links work, and the page was laterfixed.Copyright 201958Webpage/Type of ContentCharacteristics of the PagePQ Rating and ExplanationThis is an example of a “custom 404” page,alerting users that the URL they are trying tovisit no longer exists. Some websites do a niceError page with custom 404job of alerting users about a problem and● Nothing wrong, but nothing specialmessage 1providing helpful tips.This page is on a well-known merchant websitewith a good reputation. However, this particularpage displays the bare minimum of contentneeded to explain the problem to users, andthe only helpful content is a link to thehomepage.● A satisfying amount of high quality MC forits purposeError page with custom 404● Helpful SC that improves the userThis is an example of a “custom 404” page,message 2experiencealerting users that the URL they are trying to● Positive reputationvisit no longer exists. This website does a nicejob of explaining the issue and providing helpfultips, including a search box.This is an example of a “custom 404” page.These pages are designed to alert users that● A satisfying amount of high quality MC forthe URL they are trying to visit no longer exists.its purposeError page with custom 404The MC of this page is the cartoon, the caption,● Helpful SC that improves the usermessage 3and the search functionality, which is specific toexperiencethe content of the website. It is clear that time,● Very positive reputationeffort, and talent was involved in the creation ofthe MC.This publication has a very positive reputationand is specifically known for its cartoons, whichallows us to go as high as High+ to Highest.10.3 Ratings for Forums and Q&A pagesRatings for forum and Q&A pages can be challenging. The most important aspect is the E-A-T of the participants in thediscussion, which can be difficult to judge. Keep in mind the following:● The Main Content on forum and Q&A pages includes both the question as well as the answers/responses andresulting discussions.● Rate forum and Q&A pages from the point of view of a user who visits the page, rather than a participant involvedCopyright 201959Here are some examples.Webpage/Type of ContentCharacteristics of the PagePQ Rating and ExplanationQ&A page about chest pains andWe must evaluate this page from the point ofsmoking (YMYL)● YMYL page with inaccurate potentiallyview of a user visiting this page from a searchdangerous medical adviceengine, rather than a participant. The questionis poorly worded and difficult to understand.The answers are poorly worded and haveincorrect and potentially dangerous medicaladvice, making it lowest quality MC.In addition to having no answer, this page hasAds and links to other questions (misleadingly● Misleading page designQ&A page with unansweredlabeled as “Relevant answers”) displayed● Unsatisfying amount of MC for thequestionprominently, which users may mistake forpurpose of the pageanswers to the question. It takes a moment tonotice that this page actually has no answer.Deceptive design and lack of an answer makethis page a frustratingly poor user experienceand cause this page to completely fail toachieve its purpose.In this example, the MC is boxed in red. Pleaseread the MC, including the completely unhelpful"answer" to the question in the red box. Thisanswer is so unhelpful, we can consider this● Misleading page designQ&A page about a 2002 Volvoquestion to be unanswered. This page has an● Unsatisfying amount of MC for thepart (YMYL)unsatisfying amount of MC.purpose of the pageIn addition to a very unhelpful “answer,” thepage design makes it difficult to distinguish theMC from Ads. For example, below the answer,we see a "sponsored answer," which has thesame format as the real answer, but is actuallyan Ad and not an answer to the question. Thispage design is somewhat misleading.Q&A page about a game console● Unsatisfying amount of MC for theissuepurpose of the pageSome websites rely on users to create virtuallyall of their MC. In this case, the MC is theuser’s question. If there are no answers, theamount of MC on the page is unsatisfying.Copyright 201960Webpage/Type of ContentCharacteristics of the PagePQ Rating and ExplanationQ&A page about Native American● Lacking E-A-T for the purpose of thecustoms (YMYL)pageThere are 94 answers to this question with afew results that seem helpful. Many of theposts are wrong or misleading, including thetop answer, which is labeled the “best answer.”This forum is about dance topics, and manypages have expertise from a community ofballet dancers. On this particular page,participants have everyday experience washingForum page on how to washballet shoes and make recommendationsballet shoes● Mixed, but with some redeeming qualitiesbased on their own experiences.This page is “mixed” because there is somedistracting content that makes it hard to readthe MC. However, this is not a beauty contest!Even though the page may be cluttered, thereis some valuable everyday expertise andhelpful MC, making Medium a good rating forthis page.Q&A page about whether a● Everyday expertise for the purpose of theMany participants share their personalRoomba will workpageexperiences with these products, giving detailssuch as how well certain models work with pethair. There are many descriptions ofparticipants’ own experiences with this productand how well it works for them.The answer on this page is written by anQ&A page about interviewing at● Everyday expertise for the purpose of theemployee of Build-A-Bear, so it offers aBuild-A-Bear (YMYL)pagesomewhat unique and presumably somewhatexpert answer.The page design allows users to read the MCas the Ads are clearly labeled, as well as boththe question and answer.The person who posted the first message onForum post on the magic loop● High level of E-A-T for the topic andthis forum page provides a helpful resource ontechnique in knittingpurpose of the pagehow to master the magic loop technique inknitting. She also shares pictures of her ownversion using an old pair of blue jeans. Withover 20 years of experience knitting socks, wewould consider her to be an expert on the topic.Copyright 201961Webpage/Type of ContentCharacteristics of the PagePQ Rating and ExplanationThe question on the page asks how longQ&A page about how long most● Everyday expertisepeople live with cancer. There are many resultscancer patients live (YMYL)● A satisfying amount of high quality MCdescribing how long a loved one lived afterdiagnosis. There is very little medical adviceand the focus of the page is sharing personalexperience. Many results are heartfelt and wellwritten.This forum is well-known for discussions on● High level of E-A-T for the topic andluxury designer purses. On this particularForum page on authenticating apurpose of the pageforum page, members are consulting forumpurse● A satisfying amount of high quality MCexperts who have expertise authenticating bagsfrom this brand. These experts can tell if aparticular bag is authentic or fake. While thereis an ad at the top and a few ads within theforum message, it does not distract from theMC, which is easy to find.● High level of E-A-T for the topic andForum page on KPIs to trackpurpose of the pageThis forum is well-known for its community of● A satisfying amount of high quality MCexperts on quality assurance. The responsesare authoritative and trustworthy for thepurpose of the page. While there are Ads onthe page, it is easy to find the MC and they areclearly labeled as “Sponsored Link.”This discussion focuses on landscaping for a● High level of E-A-T for the topic andForum page on landscaping anparticular paludarium (an aquarium withpurpose of the pageaquariumterrestrial and aquatic elements). There is a lot● A satisfying amount of high quality MCof discussion and interaction between forummembers about the types of materials andspecies used in the aquarium. The posts showexpertise in the niche topic of aquariumlandscaping.● Very high level of E-A-T for the purposeof the pageThe purpose of the page is to answer questionsQ&A page on abbreviations● Very positive reputation, and the websiteabout the usage of abbreviations. This websiteis responsible for all content on thehas a very good reputation as a reference forwebsiteinformation on writing, publishing, etc. It isconsidered highly authoritative and trustworthyfor the topic of the page.Copyright 20196211.0 Page Quality Rating FAQsQuestionAnswerWith practice, the amount of time needed for accurate PQ ratings will decrease. Thesteps are important and are designed to help you assess many different aspects ofWhy do we have to do all thesePQ. You may be surprised by what you find. Pages that initially look Low qualitysteps? This takes a long time!may turn out to be Medium or High quality with careful inspection. The reverse mayhappen as well. We want your most informed, thoughtful opinion.Are we just giving High qualityNo! The goal is to do the exact opposite. These steps are designed to help youratings to pages that “look”analyze the page without using a superficial “does it look good?” approach.good?Remember that we are not just talking about formal expertise. High quality pagesinvolve time, effort, expertise, and talent/skill. Sharing personal experience is a formof everyday expertise.Specifically for content creators, everyday expertise can be assessed based on thetalent/skill level depicted in the MC (e.g., great hair-styling advice, painting/craftingabilities, skillful home/DIY work, etc.). In cases where the content creator is notdemonstrating formal or everyday expertise but is not doing any harm, Medium is anYou talked about expertiseappropriate rating.when rating MC. Doesexpertise matter for all topics?Pretty much any topic has some form of expert, but E-A-T is especially important forAren't there some topics forYMYL pages.which there are no experts?For most page purposes and topics, you can find experts even when the field itself isniche or non-mainstream. For example, there are expert alternative medicinewebsites with leading practitioners of acupuncture, herbal therapies, etc. There arealso pages about alternative medicine written by people with no expertise orexperience. E-A-T should distinguish between these two scenarios.One final note: if the purpose of the page is harmful, then expertise doesn't matter. Itshould be rated Lowest!For almost any type of page or informational topic, there is a range of content quality.Remember that high quality content is defined as content that takes time, effort,expertise, and talent/skill. Pages that have a harmful purpose should be ratedLowest quality, regardless of their topic.Aren't there some types ofpages or topics, such asFor example, there are both High and Low quality celebrity gossip pages. Often, thecelebrity gossip, that alwayspurpose of these pages is to share scandalous, but potentially true personalhave Low quality content?information about celebrities. We can consider the MC of a gossip page to be highquality if it is accurate and interesting information from a reliable source. On theother hand, demonstrably inaccurate information and unsubstantiated conspiracytheories, etc., should be rated Lowest.I've never seen a High qualitypage of type X. If there are noFor some topics or types of pages, there may not be many (or any!) High qualityhigh quality pages of this type,pages now, but there may be in the future. We need a uniform set of standards thatwhy are we giving existingapply to all pages, even for pages that have not yet been created.pages a Low quality rating?Copyright 201963QuestionAnswerSome of these criteria seemArt pages do have a purpose: artistic expression. Pages created for artisticunfair. For example, some artexpression do not deserve the Low quality rating simply because they have no otherpages do not have a purpose.purpose. Artistic expression, humor, entertainment, sharing photos and videos, etc.Are these pages Low quality?are all valid and valued page purposes.If I have to open the task URLYes! More intensive analysis on the website (e.g., researching E-A-T) can be doneon my phone, can I check foron your computer. Any time that using your computer will help you complete theE-A-T on my desktop/laptop?task, feel free to use it.Copyright 201964Part 2: Understanding Mobile User Needs12.0 Understanding Mobile Users, Mobile Queries, and Mobile ResultsWhat do you do on your mobile smartphone?People rely on their phones for many different tasks in different environments. Users may want to search the web or maywant to tell the phone to do something specific. Keep in mind that tasks can be simple or complex, and may take multiplesteps to complete. For example, a simple task may be to find the director of a movie. A complex task may be to find amovie’s showtimes nearby, purchase tickets, get directions, and then use the phone’s navigation to go to the theater.We expect our phones to do a lot. At the same time, phones can be challenging to use, especially compared to a desktopcomputer or laptop:● Entering data may be cumbersome: typing is difficult on mobile smartphones, and when users speak to theirphones instead of typing, voice recognition may not always be accurate.● Small screen sizes make it difficult to use some phone features, apps, and webpages.● Some webpages are difficult to use on a mobile phone. Website navigation can be difficult as menus andnavigation links may be small. Webpages may require left-to-right scrolling to read text. Images may not fit onthe screen. In addition, many mobile devices cannot access webpages with Flash or other similar features.● Internet connectivity can be slow and inconsistent for mobile users going in and out of networks. Appopening, recognition of voice commands, and webpage load times can be very slow on a mobile phone.Important: Mobile smartphones should make tasks easy, even for mobile users with a small screen device (i.e.,size of smartphone, not a tablet). Users want results right away, at that moment, and may not be able to spend a lot oftime to find what they are looking for.In order to do mobile rating tasks, you must have experience using a mobile smartphone, which we’ll also refer to as amobile phone in these guidelines. If you are not familiar with voice commands, device actions, or phone features, pleasetake some time to experiment on a mobile smartphone. For example, you can try some of these voice commands:● iPhone Siri voice commands● Android voice commands , or say “OK Google” and then “Help” on an Android deviceCopyright 20196512.1 Important Rating Definitions and IdeasQuery: This refers to the word(s) and/or number(s) that a user types or speaks into a mobile phone. In these guidelines,queries have square brackets around them. If a user says “navigate home,” we display: [navigate home]. If a user types“iPhone” in the search box, we display: [iphone].There are many different types of queries because users ask their phones to do many things, from opening an app tocalling a friend to searching the web.User: The user is the person trying to accomplish something by typing or speaking into a mobile phone with a smallscreen (i.e., size of a smartphone, not a tablet).User Intent: When a user types or speaks a query, he or she is trying to accomplish something. We refer to this goal asthe user intent.Locale: All queries have a locale, which is the language and location for the task. Locales are represented by a two-lettercountry code. For a current list of country codes, click here . We sometimes refer to the locale as the task location.User Location: This tells us where the user is located, and should be inferred from the map provided.Search Engine Results Page (SERP): The page a search engine shows after a user enters a query in the search box.The SERP is made up of result blocks.Result: We will use the word result to refer to the result block and the landing page.● Result Block: This is an individual “block” that appears on the user’s phone in response to the query. The resultblock may display information in the block itself or contain links, or may do both.● The Landing Page (LP) is the page you see after you click a link in the result block.Device Actions: Mobile phones and other devices can respond to voice commands to perform many actions, such assetting an alarm or opening an app. This is a specific type of query that we’ll refer to as a Device Action query.● Device Action query: Specific type of query where users ask their phone to perform an action. These arefrequently spoken commands used to complete actions that would normally require interaction with the screen orthe device's controls.● Device Action result: The phone may respond to a Device Action query by performing an action, such ascalling a phone number, etc.Copyright 20196612.2 Understanding the QueryUnderstanding the query is the first step in evaluating the task. Remember, a query is what a user types orspeaks into a mobile phone.Some tasks include a query research link, which you should use if you don’t understand the query or userintent. Otherwise, please do web research using Google or an online dictionary or encyclopedia. If you stilldon’t understand the query or user intent, please release the task.Important: If you research the query on Google, please do not rely on the top results on the SERP. A query may haveother meanings not represented on Google’s search results pages. Do not assign a high rating to a webpage justbecause it appears at the top of a list of search results on Google.Think about users in your locale typing or speaking the following queries into their phone.QueryLikely User Intent[population of paris], English (US)Find the current population of Paris, France.[starbucks near me], English (US)Find the nearest Starbucks location.[weather], English (US)Find weather information in the user location right now.[call mom], English (US)Call/dial the number stored for the contact “Mom” on the device.12.3 Locale and User LocationAll queries have a task language and task location (referred to in rating tasks as the "Locale"). The locale is important forunderstanding the query and user intent. Users in different locations may have different expectations for the same query.Each rating task will show you the User Location information: some tasks have an approximate user location area andsome tasks have a very specific user location.Note: Examples in the following sections will include a User Location in the form of a city and state. Note that in the actualrating tasks, you will need to infer the User Location based on the map that is provided, as discussed in Section 28.For many or most queries, the user location does not change our understanding of the query and user intent. Here aresome examples: [facebook.com], [pictures of kittens], [distance between the earth and the moon], [call mom]. If the taskdoes not display a user location, please evaluate it as a query where the location does not matter and use your judgment.When is the user location important in understanding query interpretation and user intent? Please use both web researchand your personal judgment to answer this question. Ask yourself, “Would users in one city or country be looking forsomething different than users in another city or country?”Copyright 20196712.4 Queries with an Explicit LocationSometimes users tell search engines exactly what kinds of results they are looking for by adding the desired location inthe query, regardless of their user location. We'll call this location inside the query the “explicit location.” The explicitlocation makes queries much easier to understand and interpret.Sometimes the explicit location matches the user location or locale, and sometimes it doesn't.When there is an explicit location in the query, pay attention to it! Users use explicit locations to indicate exactly what theyare looking for.12.5 Queries with Multiple MeaningsMany queries have more than one meaning. For example, the query [apple] might refer to the computer brand or the fruit.We will call these possible meanings query interpretations.Dominant Interpretation: The dominant interpretation of a query is what most users mean when they type the query. Notall queries have a dominant interpretation. The dominant interpretation should be clear to you, especially after doing alittle web research.Common Interpretation: A common interpretation of a query is what many or some users mean when they type a query.A query can have multiple common interpretations.Minor Interpretations: Sometimes you will find less common interpretations. These are interpretations that few usershave in mind. We will call these minor interpretations.Copyright 201968Query: [apple]Locale: English (US)Query: [mercury]Locale: English (US)12.6 Query Meanings Can Change Over TimeRemember to think about the query and its current meaning as you are rating. We will assume users are looking forcurrent information about a topic, the most recent product model, the most recent occurrence of a recurring event, etc.,unless otherwise specified by the query.Copyright 201969The interpretation of the query [iphone], English (US) has changed over time as new iPhone models are released. Thefirst iPhone was introduced in 2007. Users searching for [iphone], English (US) at that time were looking for the new (atthe time) first iPhone model. Most users now are looking for the most recent or upcoming iPhone model. In the future,new models will come out and the dominant interpretation will change again.12.7 Understanding User IntentIt can be helpful to think of queries as having one or more of the following intents.● Know query, some of which are Know Simple queries● Do query, some of which are Device Action queries● Website query, when the user is looking for a specific website or webpage● Visit-in-person query, some of which are looking for a specific business or organization, some of which arelooking for a category of businesses12.7.1 Know and Know Simple QueriesThe intent of a Know query is to find information on a topic. Users want to Know more about something.Know Simple queries are a special type of Know query. Know Simple queries seek a very specific answer, like a fact,diagram, etc. This answer has to be correct and complete, and can be displayed in a relatively small amount of space:the size of a mobile phone screen. As a rule of thumb, if most people would agree on a correct answer, and it would fit in1-2 sentences or a short list of items, the query can be called a Know Simple query.Copyright 201970Know Simple queries may be questions such as [how tall is barack obama]. Frequently, Know Simple queries do nothave question words. For example, [barack obama height] has the same user intent as [how tall is barack obama], but isnot in a question format.Most queries are not Know Simple queries, such as:● Broad, complex, and/or in-depth informational queries that do not have a short answer● Ambiguous or unclear informational queries● Informational queries on controversial topics● Informational queries with no definitive “right answer”● Queries where different users may want different types of information, or different sources of informationHere are some examples where the Know Simple query asks for a simple fact, which can be answered correctly andcompletely in a small amount of space, and the Know query answer is more complex.Know Simple QueryKnow QueryExplanationThe Know query is a broad information query and different[barack obama height][barack obama]users may be looking for different things (e.g., biography,[how tall is obama]books, social media posts, etc.).The Know query is a broad information query and different[new york city population 2013][new york city]users may be looking for different things (e.g., tourist and tripplanning information, facts, photographs, history).The Know query is a broad query for medical information[who is graves disease named[graves disease]and different users may have different needs. There is noafter]single “answer” for this query.The Know query is a broad query for a particular service[macy’s store hours][macy’s gift wrap options]offered by a department store, and does not have a shortanswer.[what is the symbol for theThe Know query is a broad query and there is no short,[what nickel is used for]element nickel]complete answer.[who won the 2014 bcs national[who is going to win the bcsThe Know query asks for an opinion and there is nochampionship game]national championship game]definitive answer.Even though the Know query is theoretically a yes/no[what is starbucks stock price][should i invest in starbucks stock]question, there is not a single answer that everyone wouldagree on.Raters must think about mobile users when deciding if queries are Know Simple. Use your judgment here.Important Rating Example: The query [weather] may seem like a broad information query, but most mobile users likelyhave a fairly simple informational need: to find the current or upcoming temperature, and the chance of local weatherevents, such as rain or snow. Therefore, we will consider queries like [weather], [weather today], [weather tomorrow],[weather this week] to be Know Simple queries for mobile phone users.12.7.2 Do and Device Action QueriesThe intent of a Do query is to accomplish a goal or engage in an activity on a phone. The goal or activity may be todownload, to buy, to obtain, to be entertained by, or to interact with a website or app. Users want to Do something.Copyright 201971Here are some examples.QueryLikely User Intent[get candy crush game]Install the Candy Crush game.[online personality test]Take an online personality test.[what is my bmi?]Calculate BMI (body mass index).[buy citizen kane dvd]Purchase this DVD.Device Action queries are a special kind of Do query. Users are asking their phone to do something for them. Usersgiving Device Action queries may be using phones in the hands-free mode, for example, while in a car. It’s veryimportant for mobile phones to accommodate Device Action queries, and we have a high standard for rating theseresults.A Device Action query usually has a clear action word and intent. The verb or action word is often at the beginning of thequery, but a query might start with “OK Google” or “Google” or “Siri” or “I want to.” Use your judgment.Here are some examples of Device Action queries.Type of ActionDevice Action Query Examples (verb or action shown in bold)[call mom’s mobile phone], [place a call to anne jones], [ok google, could you please call myCall someonemom]Send a message[send a text to john smith], [text john smith], [sms john smith]Get map information (e.g.,[navigate to central park], [show me traffic], [show me a map]directions, traffic, etc.)Open an app or webpage, or[go to amazon.com], [open facebook app], [open facebook.com], [open the business section ofinstall an appthe new york times], [siri, would you open facebook for me], [get candy crush app][play me songs from the white album], [watch the life of pi], [show me cute kittens], [i want toPlay or view medialook at cute kittens], [i want to listen to imagine dragons radioactive]Schedule a meeting[schedule a meeting for 9am]Set an alarm or timer[set an alarm for 6am], [alarm for 6am], [countdown timer for 30 secs]Here are some examples of queries that are not Device Action queries.QueryQuery is NOT a Device Action Query: Explanation[phone number empire stateThere is no action word. The user may be looking for the phone number without the intention ofbuilding]calling the number. We’ll consider this a Know Simple query.[facebook.com]There is no action word, such as “open.” We will consider this a Website query.[amazon.com]There is no action word, such as “open.” We will consider this a Website query.There is no action word, such as “call” or “text.” We will consider this a Know query for[anne jones]information.12.7.3 Website QueriesThe intent of a Website query is to locate a specific website or webpage that users have requested. This single webpageis called the target of the query.Copyright 201972One type of Website query is a URL Query, which can be:● Exact, perfectly-formed, working URLs, such as [http://www.ibm.com] or [www.ibm.com] or [ibm.com].● Imperfect URL queries: Queries that look like URL queries, but are not “working URLs”. These URLs do not loadif you type or paste them into your browser address bar. Even so, we believe users have a specific page in mind.Here are some examples.QueryLikely User Intent[kayak], English (US)View the Kayak website.[youtube], English (US)View the YouTube website.[ebay], Italian (IT)View the Italian eBay website.[new york time health section], English (US)View the Health section of the New York Times website.[canon.com eos digital camera], English (US)View the EOS digital cameras page on the Canon website.12.7.4 Visit-in-Person Queries and User LocationUsers carry mobile phones with them throughout the day, for example, at work, to school, to restaurants, or runningerrands. One reason to carry a mobile phone is to have help with Visit-in-Person queries, such as finding coffee shops,gas stations, ATMs, restaurants, etc. Because mobile phones are often used for Visit-in-Person queries, make sure toconsider visit-in-person intent as a possibility for mobile phone users.Some queries clearly “ask” for nearby information or nearby results (e.g., businesses, organizations, other nearby places).Some queries are not asking for nearby information or nearby results. Here are some examples.Queries with Visit-in-Person IntentQuery with Non-Visit-in-Person IntentMore examples: [boston red sox], [washington post], [scrabbleMore examples: [pizza], [yoga class], [coffee shops], [moviecheat], [definition of sedentary], [aapl], [beyonce], [angry birds],showtimes], [car repair], [dentists], [bank of america atm[small dog breeds], [dance videos], [oscars 2012], [pick up lines],locations], [starbucks near me][bank of america login]Copyright 201973And some queries could go either way. Some users may want nearby results and others may not.Here are some examples of queries with both visit-in-person and non-visit-in-person intent:●[hotels]●[post office]●[apple store]●[citibank]●[best buy]●[office depot]●[target]●[library]●[bank of america]●[the gap]Copyright 201974Sometimes, the user location can change our understanding of the query. For users close to Sunnyvale, California, thequery [turmeric] could have two different interpretations: a popular restaurant named Turmeric or the spice turmeric.In most other user locations, there is no restaurant (or anything else) named Turmeric and there is just one interpretationof the query [turmeric]: the spice. The Sunnyvale restaurant is not well-known outside of Sunnyvale, California.Use your common sense when thinking about queries and whether they have possible visit-in-person intent.Copyright 20197512.7.5 Queries with Multiple User IntentsMany queries have more than one likely user intent. Please use your judgment when trying to decide if one intent is morelikely than another intent.QueryLikely User IntentDepending on the user need and location, users may want to visit the official homepage (Website),[harvard]get directions (Visit-in-Person), or learn more about the school (Know).Most users want to go to a nearby Walmart (Visit-in-Person) or view the homepage to shop online[walmart](Website). Some or few users may want to learn more information about the company (Know).12.8 Understanding Result BlocksThe following sections contain examples of different types of queries and results. In these guidelines, pleaseassume that the result blocks and pages are easy to use on the phone, unless otherwise noted.12.8.1 Web Search Result Block ExamplesWeb Search Result Blocks typically have a title link, a URL and a “snippet” of text describing the page. For many queries,Web Search Result Blocks are the most helpful type of result.Query, User Location, User IntentWeb Search Result BlockQuery: [cuisinart food processor reviews]User Location: Oklahoma City, OklahomaUser Intent: This is a Know query. The userwants to find recent reviews of Cuisinart foodprocessors.Result: This is a Web Search Result Blockthat has a link to a landing page with Cuisinartreviews.Query: [broadway tickets]User Location: New York City, New YorkUser Intent: This is a Know query or Doquery. The user wants to search prices and/orpurchase tickets to a Broadway show in NewYork City.Copyright 20197612.8.2 Special Content Result Block ExamplesSpecial Content Result Blocks (SCRBs) appear in the search results page, along with Web Search Result Blocks. Theyare frequently, but not always, the first result on the search results page.Special Content Result Blocks are designed to show content directly to users on the search results page. From workingcalculators to playable videos to interactive weather information, these results help users immediately get information orcontent, and may not require additional “clicks” or page loads.Because mobile phones can be difficult to use, SCRBs can help mobile phone users accomplish their tasks very quickly,especially for certain Know Simple, Visit-in-Person, and Do queries.Important: Please assume that any interactive features work and function properly. Some notes:● All result blocks are “screenshots” or images of search results with prominent links enabled. Unfortunately, ascreenshot or image of an interactive result block will not function as it would for a real user. For the purpose ofrating, please assume that interactive result blocks do function as intended. Try to interact with the resultblock as some links, buttons, or other features may work.● There may be a delay between when the rating task is created and when you actually rate the block, causingsome information in special content result blocks to be a few hours or even days out of date. Stock price orweather informational blocks are designed to give users extremely current and timely information. However, dueto a delay in rating time, the information may no longer be accurate. Don’t penalize a special content result blockfor being out of date. Assume that the blocks show current information for users, unless instructedotherwise.Query, User Location, User IntentSpecial Content Result BlockQuery: [weather]User Location: Chicago, IllinoisUser Intent: This is a Know Simple querysince mobile users have a fairly simpleinformational need: find the currenttemperature and chance of rain or snow. Theuser wants to know the weather for the UserLocation.Note: Assume the block shows currentinformation for users.Copyright 201977Query, User Location, User IntentSpecial Content Result BlockQuery: [emma stone movies]User Location: Des Moines, IowaUser Intent: This is a Know query. The userwants to get information on movies with EmmaStone.Result: In this result block, users canimmediately see some popular movies starringEmma Stone, with an option to click on thelinks to learn more about each movie. Userscan also swipe to see a list of more movies.Query: [calories in a banana]User Location: Oakland, CaliforniaUser Intent: This is a Know Simple query.The user wants to find out how many caloriesare in a banana.Query: [baseball scores]User Location: Wichita, KansasUser Intent: This is a Know query. The userwants to find the most recent Major LeagueBaseball scores.Copyright 201978Query, User Location, User IntentSpecial Content Result BlockQuery: [coldplay fix you video]User Location: New Orleans, LouisianaUser Intent: This is a Do query. The userwants to watch the music video for the song“Fix You” by Coldplay.Result: By clicking on this result block, userscan play the music video for the song on theirphone, learn more about the artist/album, etc.Query: [what is the tallest tree]User Location: Boise, IdahoUser Intent: This is a Know Simple query.The user wants to know what type of tree isthe tallest.12.8.3 Device Action Result Block ExamplesA mobile phone should respond to a Device Action query and do what the user is asking. If the block is a Device Actionquery to open an app, please assume that the user has the app installed on their phone. If the query is to download theapp, please assume that the user does not have the app installed on their phone.Query, User Location, User Intent, ResultDevice Action Result BlockQuery: [open angry birds]User Location: Little Rock, ArkansasUser Intent: This is a Device Action query.The user wants the device to open the AngryBirds app so he/she can play the game.Result: In this result block, users can click thelink to open the app.Copyright 201979Query, User Location, User Intent, ResultDevice Action Result BlockQuery: [go to amazon.com]User Location: Glendale CaliforniaUser Intent: This is a Device Action query.The user wants to go to amazon.com tointeract with the website.Result: In this result block, users can clickthe links to go directly to the website.Query: [set alarm for 5 o’clock am]User Location: Tacoma, WashingtonUser Intent: This is a Device Action query.The user wants to set the device’s alarm to gooff at 5:00 AM.Result: In this result block, the query hasinitiated the alarm on the phone to be set for5:00 AM.Query: [send text to mom]User Location: Tacoma, WashingtonUser Intent: This is a Device Action query.The user wants to send a text message to acontact nicknamed “Mom.”Result: In this Device Action Result Block,the query has initiated a text to the contactnicknamed “Mom,” with an option to texteither the work or mobile number.Copyright 201980Query, User Location, User Intent, ResultDevice Action Result BlockQuery: [call best buy]User Location: Mountain View, CaliforniaUser Intent: This is a Device Action query.The user wants to call the nearest Best Buystore.Result: In this Device Action Result Block, thequery has initiated a call to the nearest BestBuy location.12.8.4 How Device Action Results are Displayed in Rating TasksImportant note: Users issuing queries actually experience the phone’s response to the query, while raters are given adescription of it. If an iPhone user says “Siri, call Mom,” the iPhone displays a visual prompt to show that it’s dialing aphone number. In these rating tasks, you will see a description of this action.Please also assume that the phone successfully performs the action in a fully satisfying way.Below are some additional examples of Device Action queries, along with the corresponding “action text” displayed in therating task.This is what the user sees on his or her phone for theThis is what you (the rater) might see in the rating taskDevice Action queryThe left side shows what the user sees on the phone for the query [set alarm for 30 mins], while the right side shows the“action text” that you (the rater) might see in the rating task. The text on the right indicates that the user issued thequery at 1:48 PM (13:48:00), and the device has set its alarm to go off 30 minutes later at 2:18 PM (14:18:00).Copyright 201981This is what the user sees on his or her phone for theThis is what you (the rater) might see in the rating taskDevice Action queryThe left side shows what the user sees on the phone for the query [open facebook app]. In this case, the phone showsan “Opening app” message and then opens the app. The right side shows the “action text” that you (the rater) might seein the rating task. The text indicates that the device responded by opening the Facebook app on the user’s phone.The left side shows what the user sees on the phone for the query [call dan], while the right side shows the “action text”that you (the rater) might see in the rating task. The user wants to dial the number stored for the contact “Dan” on thedevice. This text indicates that the device responded by displaying the contact’s phone number and dialing the number.Copyright 201982This is what the user sees on his or her phone for theThis is what you (the rater) might see in the rating taskDevice Action queryFor some Device Action queries, the device displays a list of options to choose from before it can respond to theDevice Action query. Here is an example for the query [call target]. The user is shown a list of Target stores in the areato choose from. This example shows that the Device Action result taken by the device will be to call the desired Targetstore after the user makes his/her selection.Here is an example for the query [play adele]. The user is shown a "Play media" type of result. In this case, since theuser wants to play music, the Device Action result shown is a "Play Music" button to click. Clicking this button will playthe specified song if the user has the song on his/her device. If not, clicking the result box will give the user options tohear the specified song online.Copyright 20198312.9 Rating on Your Phone IssuesWe understand that raters using different phones, operating systems, and browsers may have different experiences. Ingeneral, do what you would do naturally, and rate based on your experience. Here are some additional points to keep inmind when you are rating on your phone:● If you see one of these messages when you open a landing page on your phone:o Asks whether you want to open the page in the browser or the website’s app: select and evaluate thewebpage. However, if the result automatically opens an app by default based on your phone’s settings(e.g. some users have set all YouTube pages to automatically open the result in the YouTube app), youshould rate your natural app experience—you do not have to change your phone’s default settings.o Asks whether you want to visit the mobile page or desktop page: it is fine to select the mobile page aslong as the landing page is the same. Sometimes, the mobile option will bring you to the mobilehomepage instead of the specific URL in the task. You may need to check that the mobile page is in factthe same URL as the desktop page.● Please open and look at PDF files. Your experience may be easier or harder than other users depending on yourphone and browser, but you should still open the PDF file and look at it.● Occasionally, you may be assigned some of these rating tasks on a desktop computer, but please rate from theperspective of a mobile user unless otherwise instructed.● You should assume queries were issued on a smartphone unless otherwise stated in the task or project-specificinstructions.Copyright 201984Part 3: Needs Met Rating Guideline13.0 Rating Using the Needs Met ScaleThere are many different kinds of queries and results, but the process of rating is the same: Needs Met rating tasks askyou to focus on mobile user needs and think about how helpful and satisfying the result is for the mobile users.This is what the Needs Met rating slider looks like:RatingDescriptionA special rating category, which only applies to certain queries and results. All or almost allFully Meets (FullyM)mobile users would be immediately and fully satisfied by the result and would not need toview other results to satisfy their need.Highly Meets (HM)Very helpful for many or most mobile users. Some users may wish to see additional results.Helpful for many users OR very helpful for some mobile users. Some or many users mayModerately Meets (MM)wish to see additional results.Helpful for fewer mobile users. There is a connection between the query and the result, butSlightly Meets (SM)not a strong or satisfying connection. Many or most users would wish to see additionalresults.Completely fails to meet the needs of the mobile users. All or almost all users would wish toFails to Meet (FailsM)see additional results.Please note that you may assign in-between ratings. Use in-between ratings if you think the rating of a result fallsbetween two labels. You can either drag the slider or click on the point that you want the slider to land on.13.1 Rating Result Blocks: Block Content and Landing PagesFor Needs Met rating, you will assign a rating to each result. Each result includes the content inside the result block andlanding pages associated with the result.Type of BlockWhat to RateThe content inside this type of block should always play a large role in your rating.Special Content Result Block(SCRB)In addition, think about whether a user would click on the link(s) if available, in orderto satisfy their user need.Note: Assume that interactiveresult blocks function as intended.● If most users would not click, rate the Special Content Result Block basedTry to interact with the result blockon the block content alone.as some links, buttons, or other● If some or many users would click, you may consider the helpfulness of thefeatures in your rating task maylanding page(s) in addition to the content in the block. In this case, bothwork.need to be helpful to justify a high rating.Web Search Result BlockA click is required, and you should evaluate the landing page to assign a rating.Device Action Result BlockBase your rating on the helpfulness of the action itself.Copyright 201985For example, think about the query [what does love mean].Result BlockQuery: [what does love mean]RatingMost users would probably not click onthe Special Content Result Block,because the block contains a largeamount of helpful content and has noSpecial Content Result Blockobvious landing page link associatedwith it.Therefore, base your rating on thecontent inside the block itself.In this case, users would have to click onthe web search result in order to get ananswer to the question.Web Search Result BlockTherefore, base your rating on thecontent of the landing page.Copyright 201986Here are some examples of Special Content Result Blocks where the block should be rated primarily on the content insidethe block itself. As always, please use your judgment.Query and Special Content Result BlockQuery: [utopia animal hospital]Query: [chicago weather]Query: [calories in a banana]Query: [how to find security code onQuery: [how did Lincoln die]Query: [movies san francisco]visa]Copyright 20198713.2 Fully Meets (FullyM)Fully Meets is a special rating category, which can be used in the following situations:● The query and user need must be specific, clear, and unambiguous.● The result must be fully satisfying for mobile users, requiring minimal effort for users to immediately get or usewhat they are looking for.● All or almost all users would be completely satisfied by the result—users issuing that query would not needadditional results to fully satisfy the user intent.In other words, the Fully Meets rating should be reserved for results that are the “complete and perfect response oranswer” so that no other results are necessary for all or almost all users to be fully satisfied.You will need to use your judgment to decide whether a result block can Fully Meet the user need. Here are somescenarios when the Fully Meets rating is appropriate:● The user is clearly looking for a specific webpage or website and the result block with the specific webpage orwebsite Fully Meets the user’s need.● The user is trying to complete a device action and the result block accomplishes the desired request.● The user is looking for a very specific fact or piece of information and the result block provides the informationimmediately, thoroughly, accurately, and clearly. No other results would be needed. Before using the Fully Meetsrating for queries seeking a very specific fact or piece of information, you must check for accuracy and confirmthat the information is supported by expert consensus where such consensus exists.Fully Meets may apply in other situations as well. Ask yourself whether the result block alone is the perfect and completeresult that would fully satisfy all or almost all users. Be conservative when using the Fully Meets rating. When in doubt,consider a lower rating.Note: If a result block is very close to being fully satisfying, but the block alone may not be sufficient in order to fully satisfyall or almost all users, a rating of Highly Meets+ may be appropriate.Sometimes you have to think about how specific the user need is and will need to make a judgment call on whether it isspecific enough to possibly have a Fully Meets rating.13.2.1 Examples of Fully Meets (FullyM) Result BlocksQuery and User IntentResultRatingFully Meets ExplanationWhat you might see in theQuery: [amazon.com]rating task:User Location:The query has clear intent to goAction: Open a specificAustin, Texasto amazon.com and the phonewebpageis opening the specified website.User Intent: Go toURL: http://www.amazon.com/amazon.com.Website Name: Amazon.com:Online Shopping forElectronics, Apparel,Computers ...Copyright 201988Query and User IntentResultRatingFully Meets ExplanationQuery: [amazon]The query has clear intent to goto the amazon.com website.User Location:While there may be otherAustin, Texasinterpretations for the query, thedominant one is by far theUser Intent: Go to thewebsite.Amazon website.Query: [target website]User Location: Jacksonville,The query has clear intent to goFloridato target.com.User Intent: Go to the Targetwebsite.Query: [shop nordstromonline]User Location: Monterey,The query has clear intent to goCaliforniato the Nordstrom website.User Intent: Go to theNordstrom website for onlineshopping.Query: [titanic imdb]User Location: Lexington,The query has clear intent to goKentuckyto the IMDb page for Titanic.User Intent: Go to the IMDbpage for Titanic.Query: [www.yahoo.c0m]Even though this is an imperfectUser Location: Denver,URL query, it’s clear the userColoradowants to go to the Yahoowebsite.User Intent: Go to the Yahoowebsite.Query: [cnn health]User Location: Annapolis,The query has clear intent to goMarylandto the Health section of thecnn.com webpage.User Intent: Go to the Healthsection of cnn.com.Query: [cnn]The query has clear intent toUser Location: Annapolis,access CNN news and content.MarylandThe website has the content theuser is searching for, and fullyUser Intent: Go to the CNNsatisfies the user intent.website.Copyright 201989Query and User IntentResultRatingFully Meets ExplanationThis result Fully Meets the userneed whether they want the Yelpapp or the Yelp website, whichare both popular.Note: If you see this kind ofresult, assume that the user hasQuery: [yelp]the app installed on their phone.User Location: Raleigh,Clicking on the Yelp link aboveNorth Carolinathe logo opens the app directly,and clicking on the “Open onUser Intent: Open the Yelpyelp.com” link gives the option ofapp or go to the website atopening the app or website.yelp.com.Query: [lebron james statsbasketball- reference.com]The query has clear intent to goUser Location:to the player statistics page forMiami, FloridaLeBron James on a specificwebsite,User Intent: Go to the playerbasketball-reference.com.statistics page for LeBronJames on a specific website.What the user sees:Query: [open instagram]This Device Action query isclear and specific: the userUser Location:What you might see in thewants to open the InstagramLaguna Beach, Californiarating task:app. The result block shows thephone in the process of openingUser Intent: Open theAction: Open an appthe specified app—it FullyInstagram app on the user’sMeets the user need.device.App: InstagramQuery: [open bing searchapp]The result block shows that thephone has detected that the appUser Location: Dallas, Texasis not installed and gives theoption of downloading the app.User Intent: Open the BingThis result Fully Meets the userSearch app on the user’sneed.device.Copyright 201990Query and User IntentResultRatingFully Meets ExplanationWhat the user sees:Query: [open facebook app]This Device Action query isclear and specific: the userUser Location: Richmond,wants to open the FacebookVirginiaWhat you might see in theapp. The result block shows therating task:phone’s confirmation that it isUser Intent: Open theopening the app—it Fully MeetsFacebook app on the user’sAction: Open an appthe user need.device.App: FacebookWhat the user sees:Query: [set alarm for 5This Device Action query iso’clock am]clear and specific: the userwants to set the phone’s alarmUser Location: Tacoma,What you might see in theclock for 5:00 AM. The resultWashingtonrating task:block shows the phone in theprocess of setting the alarm atUser Intent: Set the device’sAction: Set alarmthe specified time—it Fullyalarm to go off at 5:00 AM.Meets the user need.Alarm Time: 5:00 AMChef Chu’s is a Chineserestaurant located in the userlocation. This result blockQuery: [chef chu phoneimmediately shows the correctnumber]phone number with the option tocall the number directly on theUser Location: Los Altos,device—it Fully Meets the userCaliforniaintent.User Intent: Find the phoneNote: You must check fornumber for the restaurantaccuracy before using the Fullycalled Chef Chu’s.Meets rating. You can verifythat the phone number in thisSCRB is correct by checkingChef Chu's official website.What the user sees:This Device Action query isclear and specific: the userwants to call the nearest BestQuery: [call best buy]Buy store. The result blockshows the phone in the processWhat you might see in theof calling the store with theUser Location: Mountainrating task:correct phone number—it FullyView, CaliforniaMeets the user need.Action: Make a callUser Intent: Call the nearestNote: You must check forBest Buy store. Note thatBusiness Name: Best Buyaccuracy before using the Fullythere is only one Best BuyMeets rating. You can verifystore located in MountainLocation: 2460 E Charleston Rd,that the phone number in thisView.Mountain View, CA 94043Device Action block is correct bychecking Best Buy's officialPhone number: (650) 903-0591website for the location inMountain View.Copyright 201991Query and User IntentResultRatingFully Meets ExplanationWhat the user sees:Query: [open map of italy]This Device Action query isclear and specific: the userUser Location: Baltimore,wants to see a map of Italy. TheWhat you might see in theMarylandresult block shows a map with arating task:link to open it in GoogleUser Intent: Open a map ofMaps—it Fully Meets the userAction: Open mapItaly on the user’s device.need.Location: ItalyWhat the user sees:This Device Action query isQuery: [navigate to yosemiteclear and specific: the usernational park]What you might see in thewants to navigate to Yosemiterating task:National Park. The result blockUser Location: Seattle,shows the phone in the processWashingtonAction: Navigationof opening up the Navigationapp, which will give the userUser Intent: Navigate toDestination: Yosemite Nationalturn-by-turn directions from theYosemite National Park fromParkuser’s location—it Fully Meetsthe user’s location.the user need.Destination Address: YosemiteVillage, CA 95389Query: [how to find securityThe result block displays thecode on visa]complete and correct answerprominently in the result block,User Location: Chicago,in a way that is easy for usersIllinoison mobile devices to read. Theblock also includes an imageUser Intent: Find out how toshowing users exactly where tolocate the security code on afind the code, and the blockVisa card.Fully Meets the user need.Copyright 201992Query and User IntentResultRatingFully Meets ExplanationThe result block displays theQuery: [starbucks stockcomplete and correct answerprice]prominently in the result block,in a way that is easy for usersUser Location: Alexandria,on mobile devices to read—itVirginiaFully Meets the user need.User Intent: Find the currentNote: Assume that the resultstock price for Starbucks.shows current information forusers.Query: [new york cityThe result block displays thepopulation 2012]complete and correct answerprominently in the result block,User Location: Pasadena,in a way that is easy for usersCaliforniaon mobile devices to read—itFully Meets the user need.User Intent: Find thepopulation of New York Cityback in 2012.The result block displays thecomplete and correct answerprominently in the result block,Query: [what is the weatherin a way that is easy for usersforecast for today]on mobile devices to read—itFully Meets the user need.User Location:Mountain View, CaliforniaRemember that we considerweather queries, like this one, toUser Intent: Find weatherbe a Know Simple query forforecast information for themobile phone users.current day in Mountain View,California.Note: Assume the result showscurrent information for users.The result block displays thecomplete and correct answerQuery: [london time]prominently in the result block,in a way that is easy for usersUser Location: New York,on mobile devices to read—itNew YorkFully Meets the user need.User Intent: Find the currentNote: Assume that the resulttime in London.shows current information forusers.Copyright 201993Query and User IntentResultRatingFully Meets ExplanationQuery: [who is the chancellorof germany]The result block displays thecomplete and correct answerUser Location: New York,prominently in the result block,New Yorkin a way that is easy for userson mobile devices to read—itUser Intent: Find the nameFully Meets the user need.of the current Chancellor ofGermany.Query: [chevron at shorelineand middlefield]The intent is to visit the specificUser Location: Mountaingas station specified by theView, Californiauser. This result block is for thespecified Chevron location, withUser Intent: Find the specificinformation to visit this locationgas station specified by thein person.user in order to visit thelocation in person.The result has exactly what theQuery: [decemberists craneuser wants, displaying the lyricswife 3 lyrics]to the specified song clearly andcompletely inside the resultUser Location: Long Beach,block. The user does not needCaliforniato click to a new page to see thecomplete lyrics for this song.User Intent: See the lyrics toThe Decemberists songNote: The lyrics posted oncalled “Crane Wife 3.”Google Play are licensed.Copyright 201994Query and User IntentResultRatingFully Meets ExplanationThe intent is to find gas stationsnear the specific user location,represented by the blue dot onthe map.This result block has a verysatisfying list of nearby, popular,and prominent options withinone mile of the specific location.Query: [gas stations nearThis kind of block is especiallyme]helpful for users who want tovisit the business in person.User Location: MountainView, CaliforniaThis result would be veryconvenient for mobile users whoUser Intent: Find gasneed gas immediately,stations near the userespecially for those who arelocation. Note that this maydriving and cannot easily usebe an urgent query.their phone.Note: A range is includedbecause some users would befully satisfied with theseselections, while some userswould want more information(e.g., gas prices, hours, distancefrom location, longer list ofoptions).The intent is to find coffee shopsnear the specific user location,represented by the blue dot onthe map.This result block has a verysatisfying list of nearby, popular,and prominent options within afew miles of the specificQuery: [nearby coffee shops]location. This kind of block isespecially helpful for users whoUser Location: Mountainwant to visit the business inView, Californiaperson. Note that these blocksare interactive—clicking on aUser Intent: Find coffeecoffee shop will give options toshops near the user location.call the business, get directions,read reviews, etc.Note: A range is includedbecause some users would befully satisfied with theseselections, while some userswould want more information(e.g., hours, distance fromlocation, longer list of options).Copyright 201995Query and User IntentResultRatingFully Meets ExplanationThis block contains a map withthe queried address, link to getdirections, and specifies thelandmark at the well-knownaddress on the map (“The WhiteHouse”).Query: [1600 pennsylvaniaIt’s not unusual to search for anave washington dc]address (or business) that is farfrom the user location. Here,User Location: Bakersville,the user has explicitly asked forCaliforniaa specific address in a far awayplace, and this result is veryUser Intent: Find a map,satisfying. For a query thisdirections, information aboutspecific, the user location doeswhat is located at thisnot change the rating.address, etc.Note: A range is includedbecause some users would befully satisfied with this result,while some users would wantmore information (e.g., photos, abrief description).This block contains a map, linkto get directions, departuretimes for the multiple train linesQuery: [metro center station]that operate at this station, linkto a detailed schedule (i.e., theUser Location: Adams“Departure board”), and anMorgan, Washington D.C.option to see more information.User Intent: The user wantsSince the user is located in theto see a map, schedule,same city as the station, thetransfer options, and/or otherinformation in this block is highlytrain information for the Metrosatisfying.Center station, given that theuser is close to the queriedNote: A range is includedstation.because some users would befully satisfied with this result,while some users may wantmore information (e.g., nearbyattractions, ticket prices).Copyright 20199613.2.2 Examples of Queries that Cannot Have Fully Meets ResultsThere are some queries that cannot have a Fully Meets result. Here are some examples.Type of QueryExampleNo Fully Meets Result: ExplanationThis is a broad informational query. Knittingis an activity anyone can do and that anyonecan create a website for. Different usersmay want different types of content: videos,[knitting]instructions, patterns, etc. There is no oneBroad queries where noofficial source for knitting information and nosingle result could fullyone result could satisfy most users.satisfy all usersTherefore, no Fully Meets result is possiblefor this query.Famous namesThis is a broad informational query and it isimpossible to know exactly what the user ise.g., [barack obama]looking for.There is no dominant interpretation for thisquery. The following entities are all commoninterpretations: Americans with DisabilitiesAct, American Dental Association, and[ada]American Diabetes Association. While eachinterpretation has an official homepage,none is Fully Meets since there is nodominant interpretation.Ambiguous queriesQueries for people’s names can be tricky.without a clear user intentMany or most people queries do not have aor dominant interpretationdominant interpretation. Even unusualsounding name queries may not have aNon-famous people namesdominant interpretation. For example, thequeries [sam wen], [tran nguyen], and [davide.g., [sam wen]mease] can have no Fully Meets resultbecause there are multiple people with eachof these names, and it is not clear that mostusers are looking for any one particularindividual.Copyright 20199713.3 Highly Meets (HM)A rating of Highly Meets is assigned to results that meet the needs of many or most users. Highly Meets results arehighly satisfying and a good “fit” for the query. In addition, they often have some or all of the following characteristics: highquality, authoritative, entertaining, and/or recent (e.g., breaking news on a topic).In order to receive a Highly Meets rating, information pages such as encyclopedia articles and news articles must beaccurate and highly credible. Highly Meets medical and scientific information pages must represent well-establishedscientific/medical consensus unless the user is clearly seeking an alternative viewpoint. For all information pages, youmust check for accuracy and confirm that the information is supported by expert consensus where such consensus exists.A query can have many Highly Meets results.Have high standards for the Highly Meets rating. This is especially important for queries with many on-topic results.13.3.1 Examples of Highly Meets (HM) Result BlocksQuery and User IntentResultRatingHighly Meets ExplanationThis result shows a complete listQuery: [trader joes]of all three locations in theCharlotte area, with informationUser Location: Charlotte,that is especially helpful for usersNorth Carolinawho want to visit the store.User Intent: There are twoNote: This result block is notpossible user intents: mostFully Meets because users whousers probably want towant to go to the website to seevisit a nearby location orcoupons, promotions, etc. wouldgo to the website.have to see additional results.This is the official website forQuery: [trader joes]Trader Joe’s, which has highlyauthoritative information on theUser Location: Charlotte,businesses’ stores, promotions,North Carolinarecipes, news, etc.User Intent: There are twoNote: This result block is notpossible user intents: mostFully Meets because users whousers probably want towant information to visit the storevisit a nearby location orhave to do a bit of work to findgo to the website.that information—it is notimmediately available.Query: [museum ofmodern art]This is the museum’s officialwebsite and has very helpfulUser Location:information about exhibits,Manhattan, New Yorkmembership, the store, etc.User Intent: There are twoNote: This result block is notpossible user intents: mostFully Meets because users whousers probably want towant information to visit thevisit the museum (note thatmuseum have to do a bit of workthe user is located in NYCto find that information—it is notwhere the museum isimmediately available.located) or go to thewebsite.Copyright 201998Query and User IntentResultRatingHighly Meets ExplanationQuery: [museum ofThe result block showsmodern art]information about the museum,and is especially helpful for usersUser Location:who want to visit the museum.Manhattan, New YorkNote: This result block is notUser Intent: There are twoFully Meets— even though therepossible user intents: mostis a website link, it is not veryusers probably want tosatisfying for users who want tovisit the museum (note thatgo to the website because it isthe user is located in NYCnot as informative as a webwhere the museum issearch result block with a title,located) or go to thesnippet, and URL.website.The query is the name of a cardealership in New Jersey, whichis the only dealership with thatname in the user locationQuery: [prestige bmw](Ramsey, New Jersey). Theresult block shows informationUser Location:about the dealership, and isRamsey, New Jerseyespecially helpful for users whowant to visit the business.User Intent: There are twopossible user intents: mostNote: This result block is notusers probably want toFully Meets— even though therevisit the car dealership oris a website link, it is not verygo to the website.satisfying for users who want togo to the website because it isnot as informative as a websearch result block with a title,snippet, and URL.This is the car dealership’sQuery: [prestige bmw]official website and has veryhelpful information aboutUser Location:inventory, financing, etc.Ramsey, New JerseyNote: This result block is notUser Intent: There are twoFully Meets because users whopossible user intents: mostwant information to visit theusers probably want todealership have to do a bit ofvisit the car dealership orwork to find that information—it isgo to the website.not immediately available.Copyright 201999Query and User IntentResultRatingHighly Meets ExplanationThere is only one library in theuser location (Belmont,Massachusetts). The resultblock shows information aboutQuery: [belmont library]the library, and is especiallyhelpful for users who want to visitUser Location: Belmont,the location.MassachusettsNote: This result block is notUser Intent: FindFully Meets— even though thereinformation about thisis a website link, it is not verylibrary or go to the website.satisfying for users who want togo to the website because it isnot as informative as a websearch result block with a title,snippet, and URL.There is only one library in theuser location (Belmont,California). The result blockshows information about theQuery: [belmont library]library, and is especially helpfulfor users who want to visit theUser Location: Belmont,location.CaliforniaNote: This result block is notUser Intent: FindFully Meets— even though thereinformation about thisis a website link, it is not verylibrary or go to the website.satisfying for users who want togo to the website because it isnot as informative as a websearch result block with a title,snippet, and URL.The user intent is too broad tohave a Fully Meets result.Query: [decemberists]However, this is TheDecemberists’ official websiteUser Location: Longand has a lot of content includingBeach, Californiatour dates, music videos, thelatest album, etc. The result isUser Intent: Learn moreuniquely authoritative and mostabout the band, Theusers would be very satisfied byDecemberists.this website.The user intent is too broad toQuery: [celine dion]have a Fully Meets result.However, this is Celine Dion'sUser Location: Bellevue,official website and has a lot ofWashingtoncontent including recent news,show information, music, photos,User Intent: Learn morevideos, etc. The result is uniquelyabout the singer Celineauthoritative and most usersDion.would be very satisfied by thiswebsite.Copyright 2019100Query and User IntentResultRatingHighly Meets ExplanationQuery: [fear the walkingdead]The user intent is too broad tohave a Fully Meets result, andUser Location: Mountaindifferent users may be looking forView, Californiadifferent things.User Intent:This interactive block has a largeFind information about theamount of helpful content for aTV show (e.g., showTV show including a summary,summary, episode guide,episode and cast information,cast information,etc.—this result would be verystreaming options, etc.).helpful for many or most users.Query: [manresa reviews]The LP for this web result has127 reviews for the restaurant,User Location: San Jose,and is easy to use on a mobileCaliforniaphone. The first three reviewsshow automatically, and then youUser Intent: Find reviewscan click to see more. This resultfor this restaurant locatedwould be very helpful for many orin Los Gatos, California.most users.Query: [who is thechancellor of germany]This is a specific Know Simplequery for the name of the currentUser Location: New York,Chancellor of Germany. WhileNew Yorkthe answer is in the description ofthe web result, it is not displayedUser Intent: The userprominently in a way that is verywants to find the name ofeasy for mobile users to read.the current Chancellor ofGermany.Copyright 2019101Query and User IntentResultRatingHighly Meets ExplanationQuery: [broadway tickets]The LP for this web result offersmany Broadway tickets for sale,User Location: New York,from a highly trustworthy source.New YorkWhile you have to zoom in andscroll to navigate the site, thisUser Intent: Researchresult would be very helpful forprices and/or purchasemany or most users because it istickets to a Broadwayso highly trustworthy.show.The LP for this mobile-friendlyweb result offers many kidsbackpacks for sale. TheQuery: [kids backpacks]company is well-known formanufacturing and selling highUser Location: New York,quality backpacks for kids ofNew Yorkdifferent ages. There is a lot ofproduct information and manyUser Intent: Researchuser reviews for each backpack,prices and/or purchasein addition to filter options thatbackpacks for kids.are easy to use on a phone. Thisresult would be very helpful formany or most users.Query: [poison ivy]The LP for this mobile-friendlyweb result is part of anUser Location: Atlanta,authoritative government websiteGeorgiaand provides a lot of helpfulinformation about poison ivy.User Intent: Find picturesThis result would be very helpfulof poison ivy plants,for many or most users. A few orinformation about how tosome users may wish to seetreat poison ivy, etc.additional results.Query: [michael jordan]The LP of this web result is aUser Location: Boston,mobile-friendly Wikipedia articleMassachusettsabout Michael Jordan. Thisresult would be helpful for manyUser Intent: Findor most users.information, news, images,etc. about Michael Jordan.Users are looking for good orQuery: [dance video]entertaining dance videos andthere are many options online.User Location: New York,New YorkThere are many on-topic resultsfor this query and this is one veryUser Intent: Find a dancepopular video of a comedianvideo to watch.demonstrating dance styles fromprevious decades.Copyright 2019102Query and User IntentResultRatingHighly Meets ExplanationQuery: [trestle bridge]User Location: ColoradoSprings, ColoradoSeeing images of trestle bridgesis very helpful in understandingUser Intent: The userthis type of bridge. In this case,wants to understand what“a picture is worth a thousanda trestle bridge is or learnwords”, meaning that a picturemore information aboutmay be more helpful than a textthem (e.g., what it looksdescription due to the uniquelike, how they are built,design of the bridge.types of materials,well-known examples,etc.).Query: [purpleconeflowers]This block contains many helpfulUser Location: New York,images, and the landing pageNew Yorkshows even more images—itHighly Meets the user intent.User Intent: Find imagesof or information aboutpurple coneflowers.Query: [invasive species]The result block has a goodUser Location: St. Louis,summary of what invasiveMissourispecies are, but some userswould probably want to see moreUser Intent: Find moreinformation like examples,information about invasiveimpact, etc.species.For users in Sunnyvale,California, the query [turmeric]could have two differentinterpretations: a popularQuery: [turmeric]restaurant named Turmeric orthe spice turmeric. Because theUser Location:user is located in Sunnyvale,Sunnyvale, Californiamany mobile users are probablylooking for the restaurant.User Intent: FindHowever, it is not completelyinformation about theclear because some users mayspice or the restaurant inwant to find information about theSunnyvale.spice. This result about therestaurant has satisfyinginformation for users who want tovisit —it Highly Meets the mostlikely user need.Copyright 2019103Query and User IntentResultRatingHighly Meets ExplanationQuery: [how to get fromEven though the user has toseattle to xpppzyfii]re-enter the destination, theresult block recognizes that theUser Location: Seattle,user was asking for directionsWashingtonfrom Seattle. The user has toenter the destination manuallyUser Intent: Get directionsbecause the name in the queryfrom Seattle to another(“xpppzyfii”) is so garbled thatplace. Note that thethere is no good guess as tolocation in the querywhat the user meant.(“xpppzyfii”) is garbled andit is impossible to knowTherefore, this block is satisfyingwhat the user wanted.because it helps the user correct(The name was likelythe request and then immediatelymistyped or mistranscribedget the desired directions.from a voice query.)Query: [kristen wiig]This is a fan site dedicated toKristen Wiig. The website hasUser Location: New York,comprehensive info includingNew Yorkover 50,000 pictures and 300video clips, interviews, articles,User Intent: Find moreand more. This website Highlyinformation about theMeets the need of many or mostactress, comedian, writer,users.and producer.Query: [greek alphabet]This is a broad query. Differentusers may be looking for differentUser Location: Albany,things.New YorkThis result shows multiple tablesUser Intent: Find historicalof images with the letters in theinformation about theGreek alphabet. This resultGreek alphabet, thewould be helpful for many users.names of the letters in theSome users may wish to seeGreek alphabet, images ofadditional results.the letters, etc.This is a broad query for anactress. Different users may belooking for different things.Query: [jennifer aniston]This result shows recent newsUser Location: Dover,about Jennifer Aniston. TheDelawarearticles are timely (at the timethis was written) and relativelyUser Intent: Find images,interesting, and not just commonrecent news, gossip,everyday news about theinformation, etc. aboutactress. Many users would beJennifer Aniston.satisfied with the result and someusers may wish to see moreresults.Copyright 2019104Query and User IntentResultRatingHighly Meets ExplanationThis is a broad query for a city.Different users may be lookingQuery: [seattle,for different things.washington]The result contains a wide varietyUser Location: Arlington,of helpful information such as aTexasmap, weather information,several points of interest, andUser Intent: Findhas an option to see moreinformation, news, maps,information containing nearbyetc. related to Seattle,events and facts about the city.Washington.Moderately Meets+ to HighlyMeets is an appropriate rating forthis result.This is a broad query for anQuery: [emily blunt]actress. Different users may belooking for different things.User Location: Portland,OregonThe result contains a variety ofhelpful information such asUser Intent: Findimages, brief biography, recentbiographical informationmovies, and an option to see(e.g., filmography) ormore. Moderately Meets+ tocurrent news/celebrityHighly Meets is an appropriategossip about Emily Blunt.rating for this result.This page provides therequested lyrics on Coldplay'sofficial website. Users canalso navigate around the siteQuery: [coldplay yellowto listen to the song, explorelyrics]all albums the song appearson, listen to or view lyrics forUser Location: Billings,other songs on the sameMontanaalbum, or learn more aboutthe artist overall.User Intent: Find thelyrics to the songAdditionally, users can trust“Yellow”, which wasthat the lyrics on the LP arewritten by the band100% accurate due to theColdplay.uniquely authoritative natureof the source, which makesthis result very helpful formany or most users.Copyright 2019105Query and User IntentResultRatingHighly Meets ExplanationThe LP for this web resultcontains authoritative informationQuery: [1969 moonabout the Apollo 11 moon landinglanding]on the official website of NASA,which was the organization thatUser Location: Newoversaw this mission in 1969.Haven, ConnecticutThe MC has a lot of helpfulinformation and content,User Intent: Find accurateincluding a detailed summary,and authoritativevideo footage, and images of theinformation about thismoon landing that users canhistorical event.view and explore. This resultwould be very helpful for many ormost users.This is an informational query ona fairly broad topic. DifferentQuery: [stem education]users may be looking for differentthings, yet accuracy andUser Location: Memphis,credibility of the source areTennesseeimportant.User Intent: FindThis LP is a news articleinformation or recent newspublished on a reputable newsabout education in STEMwebsite. The MC of the articlefields (i.e., Science,covers recent efforts to reformTechnology, Engineering,STEM education in the U.S., andand Mathematics).it includes citations from expertsources. This result would behelpful for many or most users.Query: [mentos and cokedeath]This LP is on a well-knownfact-checking and debunkingUser Location: Laswebsite. The page calls thisVegas, Nevadastory "False", then provides acredible explanation of how theUser Intent: Find accurateauthors came to that conclusion,information about a rumorincluding history of similar urbanthat a mixture of Mentoslegends. This result would beand Coca-Cola can causevery helpful for users seeking todeath, which was spreadverify the credibility of this rumor.on the Internet in 2006.Query: [pj fleck]This LP is an opinion pieceUser Location:written by the Editorial Board ofMinneapolis, Minnesotathe largest newspaper in the U.S.state of Minnesota. The MC ofUser Intent: Findthe article expressesinformation or recent newswell-informed opinions aboutabout P.J. Fleck, who hadFleck's upcoming tenure as headjust become the new headcoach, and it would likely be offootball coach at theinterest to many or most usersUniversity of Minnesota awhen this query was issued.few days before thisexample was written.Copyright 2019106Query and User IntentResultRatingHighly Meets ExplanationQuery: [batman legomovie review]User Location: Orlando,This LP is an in-depth review ofFloridathe queried movie by a film criticat a reputable newspaper. ThisUser Intent: Find reviewsresult would be very helpful forof the 2017 film The LEGOmany or most users.Batman Movie on crediblenews or entertainmentsources.Copyright 201910713.4 Moderately Meets (MM)A rating of Moderately Meets is assigned to results that are helpful and satisfying for many users or very satisfying forsome users.Moderately Meets results have fewer valuable attributes than Highly Meets results. Moderately Meets results shouldstill “fit” the query, but they might be less comprehensive, less up-to-date, come from a less authoritative source, etc.Moderately Meets results are not low quality, out-of-date, or inaccurate. Moderately Meets results are generally averageto good.13.4.1 Examples of Moderately Meets (MM) Result BlocksModerately MeetsQuery and User IntentResultRatingExplanationThe LP for this web result is aQuery: [shutterfly]high-quality page oncrunchbase.com—a member siteUser Location: Boise,on the TechCrunchIdahonetwork—with a profile ofShutterfly. The MC has a lot ofUser Intent: Go to thehelpful and accurate informationShutterfly website or findabout the company and is easyinformation about theto read on a mobile device. Thiscompany.result would be helpful for manyusers or very helpful for some.The LP for this web resultcontains information about TomQuery: [tom cruise]Cruise, which would be helpfulfor many users or very helpful forUser Location:some users. The photos andScottsdale, Arizonamain links can easily beaccessed on a phone.User Intent: Findbiographical information orNote that there are many, manycurrent news/celebritypages about Tom Cruise and thisgossip about Tom Cruise.result is not helpful enough for arating of Highly Meets.Query: [seattle,This is a broad query for a city.washington]Different users may be lookingfor different things.User Location: Denver,ColoradoThe result shows a map ofSeattle, Washington and clickingUser Intent: Findon the map brings up a moreinformation, news, maps,detailed map. This result may beetc. related to Seattle,helpful for some users.Washington.Query: [city of angels]This result reflects one of severalpossible user intents, as theUser Location:query is also the name of aLos Angeles, Californiamovie, song, musical, and more.However, since the user locationUser Intent: Findis near the school, this resultinformation about thewould be very helpful for somemovie, song, musical,users—specifically, users whoschool, or some otherare looking for the school.entity by this name.Copyright 2019108Moderately MeetsQuery and User IntentResultRatingExplanationThis is a result to download oneof the YouTube apps. MobileQuery: [youtube]users want answers and resultsright away and may not be ableUser Location: Tucson,to spend a lot of timeArizonadownloading and installing apps.It is possible that users want oneUser Intent: Go to theof the YouTube apps, but it isYouTube website.probably not the dominant intentfor mobile users on the go.Query: [nicaraguanThis result displays the name ofmoney]Nicaraguan currency. Someusers may have their need metUser Location: Miami,by learning the name of theFloridacurrency, but many users maywant images, know the exchangeUser Intent: Find out whatrate, etc. This result would beNicaraguan currency ishelpful for many users or verycalled, what it looks like,helpful for some users.the exchange rate, etc.Query: [where is virginia inthe us]The description in this resultblock may be helpful for usersUser Location: Louisville,who are already familiar with thisKentuckyarea in the United States. Manyor most users would probablyUser Intent: Find wherewant to see a map or a clearerthe state of Virginia isdescription.located in the U.S.Query: [every breath youtake lyrics]The LP for this lyrics websitepage has the requested lyrics.User Location: FortThere are many lyrics websitesDavis, Texason the web and many pages arenot 100% accurate. ModeratelyUser Intent: Find the lyricsMeets is an appropriate rating forto the song “Every Breathaverage pages with theYou Take,” which wasrequested lyrics.written by Sting.Query: [kristen wiig]This is Kristen Wiig’s officialwebsite, but the only content isUser Location: New York,links to her talent and PRNew Yorkagencies, along with a note thatsays she is not on any socialUser Intent: Find morenetworking sites. While thisinformation about theinformation is helpful, manyactress, comedian, writer,users would want to see more.and producer.Copyright 201910913.5 Slightly Meets (SM)A rating of Slightly Meets is assigned to results that are helpful and satisfying for some or few users. Slightly Meetsresults may serve a minor interpretation, be low quality, have stale or outdated information, have some minorinaccuracies, be too specific, too broad, too niche for the general user population considering the query, etc. to receive ahigher rating.Important note: On mobile phones, the "cost of a click" is high. Many users decide which result to click or tap on basedon the title of the web result on the search results page. (Note that these titles usually come from webpages.) A resultwith a very misleading or exaggerated title should be rated Slightly Meets or lower, due to the poor user experience thatoccurs when the landing page does not match the expectation of the user when clicking or tapping on the result.13.5.1 Examples of Slightly Meets (SM) Result BlocksQuery and User IntentResultRatingSlightly Meets ExplanationQuery: [britney spears]The LP of this mobile-friendlyUser Location: Baltimore,web result has a 2006 articleMarylandabout Britney Spears filing fordivorce. This is very old, staleUser Intent: Findnews, making the result helpfulinformation about Britneyfor few users.Spears (e.g., currentnews, pictures).Query: [honda odyssey]Although the LP hascomprehensive information fromUser Location: Miami,a reputable source, and is easyFloridato use on a mobile device, theinformation is about the 2010User Intent: We willHonda Odyssey. Thisassume that users areinformation would be consideredinterested in the currentstale for the query today, makingHonda Odyssey model,this result helpful for some or fewunless specified otherwise.users.The LP of this web result is aboutQuery: [hot dog]the movie “Hot Dog,” which cameout in 1984 and is a minorUser Location:interpretation of this query.Sunnyvale, CaliforniaBecause this is an unlikelyinterpretation, this web resultUser Intent: Findwould be helpful for few users,information about hoteven though the landing pagedogs, such as recipes orhas good content from anutrition information.reputable source, and is easy touse on a mobile device.This result provides contactQuery: [motorcycles]information for one of the twomotorcycle shops in Potsdam,User Location: Potsdam,New York. It is possible thisNew Yorkwould be helpful for some users,but many users would be lookingUser Intent: Findfor information. Additionally,information aboutthere is distractingmotorcycles.information (a listing for aninsurance agent).Copyright 2019110Query and User IntentResultRatingSlightly Meets ExplanationThis is a Wikipedia page that hasQuery: [abe lincoln’sbirthdays for all U.S. presidents,birthday]including Abraham Lincoln.However, his birthday is notUser Location: Fortprominently displayed and it isDavis, Texasnot obvious that the answer isthere—users have to do someUser Intent: Find thiswork and search around on thespecific piece ofpage to find the answer, makinginformation.SM to SM+ an appropriate rating.Query: [lack of sex andThe quality of writing in thisproblems with myarticle, which was created by amarriage]person without expertise inmarriage or relationshipUser Location: Waco,counseling, is poor. Even thoughTexasthe article is about the query, thepage is low quality andUser Intent: Find help foruntrustworthy. It would be helpfulmarital issues.for few users.Query: [nail spa]Burke Williams is a day spa thatoffers many treatments likeUser Location: San Jose,massage therapy, skin care, etc.CaliforniaWhile it does have nail careoptions, it is not a dedicated nailUser Intent: Find a nailspa.spa in or near San Jose.Query: [what type ofsharks live in rivers]This result block does not containUser Location: Tucson,enough information to be fullyArizonasatisfying and mentions only onetype of shark. Most users wouldUser Intent: Findneed to do further research.information about whattypes of sharks live inrivers.The answer in this result block isreally confusing. Even if usersQuery: [210 area code]can figure it out, they would likelystill have to click on the link, orUser Location: Austin,go to another website, to confirmTexasthe information.User Intent: Find whatWhile there is a map, you wouldarea uses the 210 areahave to expand or click on it tocode for phone numbers.see the details, so it is not thathelpful.Copyright 2019111Query and User IntentResultRatingSlightly Meets ExplanationQuery: [ibm]User Location: Rockville,This block contains images of theMarylandlogo for IBM, but these imagesare not particularly helpful for thisUser Intent: Go to the IBMquery.website or find informationabout the company.The title of this article makes itappear as though the articleQuery: [where is nibiru]describes an impendingcatastrophe. Yet, the MC statesUser Location: Oklahomain its third paragraph that NibiruCity, Oklahoma"doesn’t actually exist" and callsbelievers in it "conspiracyUser Intent: Find thetheorists". The title contradictslocation of "Nibiru", whichthe content of the article, and aswas a fictional planet in thea result could mislead users whomovie Star Trek Intodon't read the full article.Darkness, as well as apseudoscientific outerNote: The "cost of a click" is highplanet in the solar systemon mobile phones. Results withthat doesn't actually exist.very misleading or exaggeratedtitles should be rated SlightlyMeets or lower.Copyright 201911213.6 Fails to Meet (FailsM)A rating of Fails to Meet should be assigned to results that are helpful and satisfying for no or very few users. Fails toMeet results are unrelated to the query, factually incorrect (please check for factual accuracy of answers), and/or all oralmost all users would want to see additional results. These results completely fail to meet the user intent, such as a lackof attention to an aspect of the query (or user location) that is important for satisfying user intent. Fails to Meet may alsobe used for results that are extremely low quality, have very stale or outdated information, be nearly impossible to use ona mobile device, etc.Fails to Meet should be used for the following types of Lowest Page Quality results:● Results that harm users (e.g., malicious download pages, "phishing" pages or websites, etc.).● Pages or websites that misrepresent the website's owner or purpose, such as by impersonating a different site(e.g., copied logo or branding of an unaffiliated site, URL that mimics another site's name).● Pages or websites that appear to be deliberate attempts to misinform or deceive users by presenting factuallyinaccurate content (e.g., fake product reviews, demonstrably inaccurate news, etc.).● Pages or websites with factually inaccurate content that can cause harm to users, regardless of their purpose orintent (e.g., inaccurate medical information; inaccurate information about how to vote, obtain a visa or green card,pay government taxes, etc.).The following should also be rated Fails to Meet because they lead to very poor and upsetting user experiences:● Porn results for non-porn-seeking queries.● Upsetting or offensive results for queries that are not obviously seeking upsetting or offensive content.● Pages that directly contradict well-established scientific or medical consensus for queries seeking scientific ormedical information, unless the query indicates the user is seeking an alternative viewpoint.● Pages that directly contradict well-established historical facts (e.g., unsubstantiated conspiracy theories), unlessthe query clearly indicates the user is seeking an alternative viewpoint.13.6.1 Examples of Fails to Meet (FailsM) Result BlocksQuery and User IntentResultRatingFails to Meet ExplanationQuery: [dogs]This is a broad informationalUser Location: Pittsfieldquery for an animal. DifferentCharter Township,users may be looking for differentMichiganthings.User Intent: FindThis result block showsinformation (e.g., pictures,visit-in-person information forbreeds, training details,three different dog care providersetc.) related to dogs.near the user location. However,the query is very broad and it isNote: For this query, it isunlikely users want to govery unlikely users want toanywhere in person.go anywhere in person.Query: [mike]This is a broad query and it isunclear exactly what the user isUser Location: Eustis,looking for.FloridaThis result block showsUser Intent: Findvisit-in-person information for twoinformation aboutbusinesses that contain thesomething related to Mike.name Mike. However, the queryis very broad and it is veryNote: For this query, it isunlikely these businesses areunlikely users want to gowhat users seek given the query.anywhere in person.Copyright 2019113Query and User IntentResultRatingFails to Meet ExplanationQuery: [tampa rays]User Location: Tampa,This result block showsFloridainformation to visit a sports cardstore in person, which happensUser Intent: Findto have the baseball team in theinformation (e.g., scores,name. However, remember thatroster, recent news) aboutfor this query, it is unlikely usersa professional baseballwant to go anywhere in person.team in Florida calledTampa Bay Rays.Note: This business wasfabricated for the purposes ofNote: For this query, it isthis example, and does not existunlikely users want to goin real life.anywhere in person.WRAL is a television newsstation in North Carolina. Userswant to go to the website or findQuery: [wral]information about the station.User Location: WakeIn this example, clicking on theCounty, North Carolinablocks show information aboutthe businesses’ corporateUser Intent: Go to theheadquarters. Note thatWRAL website or findtelevision stations (like radioother information about thestations, newspapers, etc.)news station in Northusually have special contactCarolina.information for the public that isdifferent than their corporateNote: Users generallyheadquarter information. Also,would not go to a newswith the query just being thestation in person.name of the station, it is veryunlikely that users want this kindof information.Query: [texas farmfertilizer]This result block shows theTexas Farm corporate office,User Location: Dallas,which is not helpful given theTexasuser intent—users could notphysically go to the company’sUser Intent: Findcorporate office to buy or learninformation about, orabout the product. Fertilizer iswhere to buy, fertilizer fromthe kind of product that youthe company Texas Farm.would have to buy at a store.Copyright 2019114Query and User IntentResultRatingFails to Meet ExplanationQuery: [united 656]This result shows information forUser Location: Skokie,a church, an event venue, andIllinoisthe closest airport. However,users clearly want to knowUser Intent: Finddetails about a specific flight, andinformation about flightthere is absolutely no information656 operated by Unitedin the block about the flight. ThisAirlines (e.g., whether theresult Fails to Meet the userflight is on time, what gateintent.it is departing from).Query: [german cars]This LP is the homepage ofSubaru, a Japanese carUser Location: Toledo,company, not a German carOhiocompany.User Intent: FindThe page completely Fails toinformation about GermanMeet the user intent and wouldcars or go to the officialbe helpful for no or very fewhomepage of a Germanusers.automaker.Query: [company to get ridThis LP is the homepage of aof the possum in my attic]pest control company inAustralia. U.S. users would needUser Location: Naperville,a U.S. company to take care ofIllinoisthis problem. There is amismatch between the page andUser Intent: Find athe locale that makes this resultcompany to trap andhelpful for no users—itremove a possum from thecompletely Fails to Meet theattic.user intent.Query: [starting jetsquarterback 2001]Although this is a trustworthyUser Location: Chicago,website for information aboutIllinoisNFL football, this LP does notcontain the informationUser Intent: Find therequested by the user. Thisname of the startingresult completely Fails to Meetquarterback for the Newthe user intent.York Jets football team in2001.Query: [navigate toyellowstone national park]This web result (the officialhomepage of YellowstoneUser Location: Denver,National Park) completely fails toColoradorespond to the specific DeviceAction query: to navigate to theUser Intent: Navigate topark.Yellowstone National Parkfrom the user’s location.Copyright 2019115Query and User IntentResultRatingFails to Meet ExplanationQuery: [doctor salary]User Location: SanThe answer in this block is aboutFrancisco, Californiathe cost of education, not salary,which is misleading and doesn’tUser Intent: Findanswer the user’s query.information about doctorsalaries.Query: [stony childdevelopment center westpoint phone number]The answer in this block providesthe phone number for the WestUser Location: WestPoint Club, not the Stony ChildPoint, New YorkDevelopment Center located inWest Point, New York. ThisUser Intent: Find theresult Fails to Meet the usertelephone number for theintent.Stony Child DevelopmentCenter in West Point, NewYork.Query: [who inventedThe answer provided in thisstairs]result block is factuallyinaccurate. Stairs have been aUser Location: Lubbock,common architectural feature ofTexasbuildings, pathways, outdoorstructures, etc. since long beforeUser Intent: Find out1948, and they were not inventedabout the origin of stairs.by a person named WernerBösendörfer.This result includes several appsto download, with an option tosee more apps. The user isQuery: [young famouslooking for information about appapp developers]developers that are well-known,so it Fails to Meet the userUser Location: Lubbock,intent.TexasNote: Unless you feel the userUser Intent: Findintent to download an app isinformation about, or a liststrong, results that allow users toof, well-known appdownload apps are generallydevelopers who areless helpful. Mobile users wantyoung.answers and results right away,at that moment, and may not beable to spend a lot of timedownloading and installing apps.Copyright 2019116Query and User IntentResultRatingFails to Meet ExplanationQuery: [send textmessage to john that i’mrunning late]Action: Send an emailThe user clearly wants to send aUser Location: New York,text message. The DeviceNew YorkSubject:Action result to “Send an email”is incorrect and completely FailsUser Intent: Send a textRecipient: Johnto Meet user intent.message to a contactnamed John with theBody: I'm running latemessage “I’m runninglate.”Query: [weather]The user clearly wants weatherinformation. The Device ActionUser Location:Query Time: 2013-4-23 6:00:12result to set an alarm isMountain View, Californiainappropriate (and even absurd)Action: Set alarmfor this information query. ThisUser Intent: Find currentresult completely Fails to Meetweather information forAlarm Time: 22:43:00the user intent.Mountain View, California.Query: [batman]It is extremely unlikelyUser Location: Anaheim,(potentially a no-chanceCaliforniainterpretation) that this query islooking for information on a cityUser Intent: Findin Turkey called Batman, giveninformation about thethat the user is located in thefictional superhero thatUnited States. No or almost noappears in Americanusers would be satisfied with thiscomic books, movies, andresult.television shows.It is extremely unlikelyQuery: [obama](potentially a no-chanceinterpretation) that this query isUser Location: Austin,looking for information on a cityTexasin Japan called Obama, giventhat the user is located in theUser Intent: FindUnited States. No or almost noinformation about Barackusers would be satisfied with thisObama.result.Query: [weather paris,texas]This result completely fails tosatisfy the user intent, which is toUser Location: Paris,find weather information forTexasParis, Texas, and not Paris,France. No users would beUser Intent: Find currentsatisfied with this result.weather information forParis, Texas.Copyright 2019117Query and User IntentResultRatingFails to Meet ExplanationQuery: [what is the thirdquarter earnings for ge]This result does not answer theUser Location: New York,user’s question to show thirdNew Yorkquarter earnings for GE. Nousers would be satisfied with thisUser Intent: Find thisresult.most recent third quarterearnings information forGeneral Electric.This result reflects one of severalpossible user intents, as thequery is also the name of aQuery: [city of angels]movie, song, musical, and more.User Location:Since the user location is inChicago, IllinoisChicago, very few or no userswould be interested in seeingUser Intent: Findinformation about a school byinformation about thethis name in Los Angeles that isschool, a movie by thisnot well known outside of thisname, or some other entitycity. It is very unlikely that peopleby this name.outside of Los Angeles woulduse this query to search for thisschool.This result block shows a go kartQuery: [go kart for sale]arcade in Warrington,Pennsylvania, and two other goUser Location:kart arcades in the surroundingWarrington, Pennsylvaniaarea. These arcades are placesto go ride go karts, not purchaseUser Intent: Find go kartsthem, so the result completelyfor sale in the Warrington,Fails to Meet the user intent. NoPennsylvania area.users would be satisfied with thisresult.Query: [ralphs]User Location: SanRalphs is a nationwideClemente, Californiasupermarket chain. Theselocations are all in San Diego,User Intent: There are twoCalifornia, which is a major citypossible user intents: mostsouth of the user location (aboutusers probably want to60 miles away). These resultsvisit a nearby Ralphsare too far to be helpful.location or go to thewebsite.Copyright 2019118Query and User IntentResultRatingFails to Meet ExplanationUsers issuing this query want togo to the Amazon website.Showing information about howQuery: [amazon]to visit or call the corporate officefor an online company would notUser Location: Austin,be helpful. Very, very few peopleTexasever go to an Amazon corporateoffice, which is not open to theUser Intent: Go to thepublic. If someone needed to goAmazon website.to the office for an interview orbusiness visit, they would needto get that information fromsomeone at the company orwould use a more specific query.Query: [what is the closestlarge city]A news result is inappropriateUser Location: Myrtleand completely unhelpful for thisBeach, South Carolinaquery. No users would besatisfied with this result.User Intent: Find theclosest large city to MyrtleBeach, South Carolina.Query: [australian openmens singles result 2008]This LP is about the 2004Australian Open, not the 2008User Location: Kent,Australian Open. It does not payWashingtonattention to an aspect of thequery that is important forUser Intent: Find a pagesatisfying user intent (i.e., 2008).that displays the 2008The result Fails to Meet the usermen’s singles result forintent.this tennis tournament.Query: [tooth loss fiveyears old]This LP has information abouttooth loss in pike fish and has theUser Location: Denton,words “five years old” on theTexaspage. This result Fails to Meetthe user intent because it hasUser Intent: Findkeyword matches only and wouldinformation about toothbe helpful for no users.loss in a five-year-oldchild.Query: [what is wedding inspanish]The translation in the result blockis completely wrong andUser Location: Denton,inaccurate.TexasMañana means “tomorrow,” notUser Intent: Find how to“wedding.”say the word “wedding” inSpanish.Copyright 2019119Query and User IntentResultRatingFails to Meet ExplanationQuery: [american express]The LP is a humorous blog postUser Location: Denton,about a wife helping her husbandTexasto buy a suit. The page mentions“American Express,” but isUser Intent: Go to theinsufficiently related to the queryAmerican Express cardto be helpful for users, so it Failswebsite or get informationto Meet the user intent.about the company and itsproducts and services.Query: [how to quitsmoking]This LP has gibberish text. Readthis sentence: “How do you makeUser Location: Denton,a cigarette symbol on theTexaskeyboard? In.” The quality of thelanding page is so low that theUser Intent: Findpage Fails to Meet the userinformation on ways to quitintent.smoking.This is the official website of themovie "American Beauty".However, the landing page isextremely difficult to use (evenseems broken on a mobilephone) and there is no satisfyingQuery: [american beauty]or helpful content on the page—itFails to Meet the user intent.User Location: MountainView, CaliforniaQR Code to view the page:User Intent: Learn moreabout the movie called"American Beauty".Query: [starting order fortoday’s nascar race]This result shows a NASCARUser Location: Denton,schedule, but does not have theTexasstarting order. The content is notwhat the user is looking for andUser Intent: FindFails to Meet the user intent.information about thestarting order of theNascar race that day.Remember that you shouldQuery: [air canada phonecheck for the factual accuracy ofnumber]answers. For this result, go tothe company’s page atUser Location: Seattle,www.aircanada.com/en/customerWashingtoncare/int/ and select USA to checkthe number shown here.User Intent: Find theAccording to the airline’s website,customer service phonethe correct phone number isnumber for the airline Air1-888-247-2262. Because thisCanada.answer is incorrect, it should berated Fails to Meet.Copyright 2019120Query and User IntentResultRatingFails to Meet ExplanationQuery: [obama news]The MC of this page is anexample of a demonstrablyUser Location: Norfolk,inaccurate news report, includingVirginiaa fictitious quotation by BarackObama. Because the content isUser Intent: Find recentpresented as a factual newsnews about Barackarticle, it is inaccurate with anObama, the 44th presidentintent to deceive users andof the United States.should be rated Fails to Meet.Despite strong medicalconsensus linking tobacco tolung cancer—which can be foundat authoritative sources bysearching [lung cancer andsmoking]—this LP claims there isQuery: [does smokingno connection between smokingcause cancer]and cancer by selectivelyinterpreting some experimentsUser Location: Scottsdaledone on animals., ArizonaAdditionally, this is a YMYL queryUser Intent: Find outon a medical topic, so accuratewhether smoking causesand trustworthy information iscancer.highly important. This pagedirectly contradictswell-established medicalconsensus and may potentiallycause harm to users, so it shouldbe rated Fails to Meet.Betty White was alive at the timethis example was written. ThisLP is a social media profile pageQuery: [betty white]created by an unknown authorthat was designed to look like aUser Location: Lexington,memorial page for Betty WhiteKentuckyand falsely states that she died.This page is factually inaccurateUser Intent: Findand deceptive to users, so itinformation about theshould be rated Fails to Meet.American actress BettyWhite, such asRemember: For informationalbiographical info,queries/results, it is important tofilmography, awards,check other reputable sources tocurrent news, etc.determine if the result is factuallyaccurate. A quick online searchfor [betty white] would allow youto confirm that she was still alive.Copyright 2019121Query and User IntentResultRatingFails to Meet ExplanationMiley Cyrus was alive at the timethis example was written. ThisLP is an article written by anunknown author that wasdesigned to look like a newsstory and falsely states that shedied. Furthermore, the page isfound on a low quality website,Query: [miley cyrus]and the article has not beenupdated, clarified, or removedUser Location: Lexington,even days after having beenKentuckyproven false. This page isfactually inaccurate andUser Intent: Finddeceptive to users, so it shouldinformation about thebe rated Fails to Meet.American singer/actressMiley Cyrus, such asRemember: Just because abiographical info,website has the look and feel of adiscography/filmography,traditional news site does NOTcurrent news, etc.mean that you should considerthe reporting to be factuallyaccurate without furtherresearch. Watch out for sitesthat present themselves asnews, but were actually createdwith the intent to mislead ormisinform users.This query is seeking historicalinformation. The LP of this webresult is on a well-known whitesupremacist hate site (read moreQuery: [holocaust history]here or here ). The discussion onthis page is inaccurate andUser Location:misleading, since the HolocaustCooperstown, New Yorkis an extremely well-documentedhistorical event.User Intent: Find historicalinformation about theRemember: Pages that directlyHolocaust.contradict well-establishedhistorical facts should be ratedFails to Meet, unless the queryclearly indicates the user isseeking an alternative viewpoint.This LP is a blog post presentinga factually unsupportedconspiracy theory that AngelaQuery: [who is hitler'sMerkel is the daughter of Adolphdaughter]Hitler. Because the MC isinaccurate and misleading, itUser Location:completely Fails to Meet theCooperstown, New Yorkuser intent, even though the topicof the page matches the query.User Intent: Find thename of or informationNote: A more helpful result forabout Adolf Hitler'sthis query might confirm thatdaughter, if Hitler in factAdolf Hitler had no children, orhad a daughter.provide information on the novelHitler's Daughter by JackieFrench.Copyright 2019122Query and User IntentResultRatingFails to Meet ExplanationThis is a broad query seekinginformation about Islam. The LPwas created for the purpose ofstating the author's opinion thatIslam is not a religion. TheQuery: [islam]author lacks expertise in thetopic; the writing has frequentUser Location: Lexington,misspellings, typos, andKentuckygrammar errors; and the pageseems to exist to promoteUser Intent: Findintolerance or hate.information about thereligion of Islam.Remember: Upsetting oroffensive results for queries thatare not obviously seeking thistype of content should be ratedFails to Meet.Copyright 201912314.0 Rating Porn, Foreign Language, Did Not Load, and Upsetting-Offensive ResultsYou will assign Porn, Foreign Language, Did Not Load, and Upsetting-Offensive flags to result blocks whenappropriate. Some rating tasks may ask you to identify Not-for-Everyone results. All flags are query-independent,meaning that they do not depend on the query. Here is a screenshot of the flags:Click on the flag name to select it. The flag block will turn red and change the “No” to “Yes.” For example, here is a resultthat shows when the Porn flag should be used.Query and User IntentResult Block, Flag, Needs Met RatingExplanationQuery: [freeones],English (US)This LP is the homepageof the Freeones website,User Location:a porn site.Mountain View,CaliforniaThis result merits aFullyM rating and theUser Intent: Go to thePorn flag.Freeones website.14.1 Porn FlagPlease assign the Porn flag to all porn pages, whether the query is porn-seeking or not. The Porn flag does not dependon the query or user intent.This flag should be used if the content inside the result block, or the content on the LP, is pornographic, including pornimages, links, text, pop-ups, and/or prominent porn ads. An image may be considered porn in one culture or country, butnot another. Please use your judgment and knowledge of your locale.Remember: The Porn flag is used to indicate that the result is porn. It doesn’t matter whether the query “asks for porn”.14.2 Needs Met Rating for Porn Results14.2.1 Needs Met Rating for Clear Non-Porn Intent QueriesIf the user intent is clearly not porn-seeking, a landing page that has porn for its MC should be rated Fails to Meet.● When the user intent is clearly not porn, a porn result should be considered unhelpful or useless.● Uninvited porn is a very bad experience for many users.The following queries should be considered non-porn intent queries: [girls], [wives], [mature women], [gay people], [peoplekissing], [boy speedos], [moms and sons], [pictures of girls], [pictures of women], [mothers and daughters], [cheerleaders],etc.Copyright 2019124Remember to assign the Porn flag for all porn pages. Use your judgment and represent users in your locale.QueryUser IntentLanding PageRatingPorn Flag?Example[toys], English (US)Find toys to buy.FailsMYesWarning – this page is porn.Find the answer to thisExample[how tall is a camel], English (US)FailsMYesquestion about camels.Warning – this page is porn.Example[car pictures], English (US)Find pictures of cars.FailsMYesWarning – this page is porn.14.2.2 Needs Met Rating for Possible Porn Intent QueriesSome queries have both non-porn and porn interpretations. For example, the following English (US) queries have both anon-porn and an erotic or porn interpretation: [breast], [sex]. We will call these queries “possible porn intent” queries.For "possible porn intent" queries, please rate as if the non-porn interpretation were dominant, even though some or manyusers may be looking for porn. For example, please rate the English (US) query [breast] assuming a dominant health oranatomy information intent.QueryUser IntentLanding PageRatingPorn flag?Find anatomy or health[breasts], English (US)ExampleHMNoinformation about breasts.Find anatomy or healthExample[breasts], English (US)FailsMYesinformation about breasts.Warning – this page is porn.14.2.3 Needs Met Rating for Clear Porn Intent QueriesFor very clear porn intent queries, assign a rating to the porn landing page based on how helpful it is for the user. Eventhough there is porn intent, the page should still be assigned a Porn flag.Do not simply rate all porn pages for porn queries as MM or HM. Even though the query is porn and the result is porn, thepage must fit the query and be helpful to get a high Needs Met rating.Pages that provide a poor user experience, such as pages that try to download malicious software, should also receivelow ratings, even if they have some images appropriate for the query.QueryUser IntentLanding PageRatingPorn Flag?Example:Navigate to the Freeones[freeones], English (US)http://www.freeones.comFullyMYeshomepage.Warning – this page is porn.Example:Navigate to the Freeones[freeones], English (US)http://www.baberoad.comFailsMYeshomepage.Warning – this page is porn.Example[anime sex pictures], English (US)Find anime sex pictures.MM to HMYesWarning – this page is porn.Find porn pictures ofExample[cheerleader porn], English (US)MM to HMYescheerleaders.Warning – this page is porn.Copyright 201912514.3 Reporting Illegal ImagesChild PornographyNote: When working on rating projects in any task location or locale, you must follow United States federal law, whichconsiders child pornography to be illegal.Definition of Child PornographyAn image is child pornography if it is a visual depiction of someone who appears to be a minor (i.e., under 18 years old)engaged in sexually explicit conduct (e.g., vaginal or anal intercourse, oral sex, bestiality or masturbation as well aslascivious depictions of the genitals), or sadistic or masochistic abuse. The image of sexually explicit conduct can involvea real child; a computer-generated, morphed, composite or otherwise altered image that appears to be a child (think ofimages that have been altered using “Photoshop”); or an adult who appears to be a child; and the image can benon-photographic (e.g., drawings, cartoons, anime, paintings, or sculptures) so long as the subject is engaging in sexuallyexplicit conduct that is obscene. If it is indistinguishable from child pornography, it is child pornography.Even if the pornographic image depicts children in a literary (think of the famous book "Lolita"), political (think of politicalcartoons), artistic, or scientific context, please send the link to your employer/company as instructed below.Depiction of the genitals does not require the genitals to be uncovered. Thus, for example, a video of underage teenagegirls dancing erotically, with multiple close-up shots of their covered genitals, or images of children with opaque underwearthat focus on the genitalia could be considered child pornography.An image of a naked child (e.g., in the bathtub or at a nudist colony) is not considered child pornography as long as thechild is not engaging in sexually explicit conduct, or the focus is not on the child’s genitalia. Visual depictions of adults wholook like children (e.g., a 35-year-old man play-acting in diapers, or an obvious woman dressed as a school girl) are notchild pornography. If you don't think it's a minor, it probably isn’t child pornography. However, if you cannot tell that theperson in the image is over 18 (e.g., an under-developed 18-year-old whose body hair has been waxed), that is childpornography.Reporting InstructionsPlease report images containing child pornography (URLs only) as instructed by your employer/company.14.4 Foreign Language Flag14.4.1 Using the Foreign Language FlagPlease assign the Foreign Language flag when the language on the landing page is NOT one of the following:● The task language● A language that is commonly used by a significant percentage of the population in the task location● EnglishFor example, most Catalan-speaking users in Spain also speak Spanish. Therefore, for rating tasks in Catalan (ES), theForeign Language flag should NOT be assigned to landing pages in Catalan, Spanish, or English.Copyright 2019126Here is a screenshot of a result block that shows when the Foreign Language flag would be used.Query and User IntentResult Block and LP, Flag, Needs Met RatingExplanationThis LP is the homepageQuery: [baidu]of the Baidu website.The result is the targetLocale: English (US)page of the query, but isin a foreign languageUser Location:(Chinese).Anchorage, AlaskaThis result merits aUser Intent: Go to theFullyM rating and theBaidu website.Foreign Language flag.Important:● Please assign the Foreign Language flag even if you personally understand the language, but most users in yourlocale do not.● Please assign the Foreign Language flag based on the language of the landing page, not the appearance of theresult block.● Please remember to flag all foreign pages with the Foreign Language flag, even if most users in your localewould expect or want a foreign language page for the query.● Sometimes it is difficult to determine what language the landing page is in. The LP may have multiple languagesor no words at all. In these cases, try to represent users in your locale. Does it feel like a foreign language page?When in doubt, don’t use the Foreign Language flag.14.4.2 Needs Met Rating for Foreign Language ResultsYou must assign a Needs Met rating for all result blocks in your task, even if the result blocks have a foreign languagelanding page.In most cases, pages you flag as Foreign Language should be rated FailsM, because they cannot be understood bymost users in your locale and are therefore useless. Remember that if users in your locale can read the language, thenyou shouldn’t be using the Foreign Language flag. Occasionally, you will encounter helpful Foreign Language pages.If the query clearly indicates that most users would expect or want a foreign language result, then the Needs Met rating ofthe foreign language page should not be FailsM. For example, please assign the FullyM rating and Foreign Languageflag for baidu.com if the query is [baidu.com], English (US).Videos are often an example where foreign language pages are helpful and desired. Think about user intent and whatpages are good for users. If the query “asks” for a foreign language song, band, film, sporting event, etc., then a video ofthe song, band, film, sporting event, etc. is helpful since it can probably be understood or enjoyed even though it is in aforeign language. For these types of queries, foreign language results are often expected.If the video is someone talking about the song, band, film, or event, the result probably cannot be understood or enjoyedand should be assigned a FailsM rating and the Foreign Language flag.Copyright 2019127Query and User IntentResult Block and LP, Needs Met RatingExplanationQuery: [video of celine dionsinging s’il suffisait d’aimer]This video is just what English (US) users areLocale: English (US)looking for, even though the video is not inEnglish. The language of the LP is mostlyUser Location: Lansing,English (even though the video is in French), soMichiganthe Foreign Language flag is not needed.User Intent: Watch a video ofCeline Dion singing this song.Query: [alex c]The query is for the German composer, Alex C.The landing page has a video with one of hisLocale: English (US)songs sung by Y-ass (misspelled as “Yass” inthe YouTube title) in German. It would beUser Location: Davenport, Iowahelpful for some or many English (US) userswho type the query, even though it is not inUser Intent: Watch a video orEnglish. The language of the landing page isn’tlisten to a song by this Germanclear. Use your judgment when decidingcomposer or find informationwhether to assign the Foreign Language flag.about him.Query: [kasal, kasali, kasalo]The query is for “Kasal, Kasali, Kasalo,” aLocale: English (US)Filipino film. The LP is a clip from the movie inFilipino (Tagalog), the language spoken in theUser Location: Daly City,Philippines. It would be helpful for manyCaliforniaEnglish (US) users who type the query, eventhough it is not in English. Use your judgmentUser Intent: Watch a trailer ofwhen deciding whether to assign the Foreignthis Filipino film or find informationLanguage flag.about it.Copyright 201912814.5 Did Not Load Flag14.5.1 Using the Did Not Load FlagDid Not Load is used to indicate technical problems that prevent you from viewing any LP content.Use the Did Not Load flag when:● The MC of the landing page is a web server or web application error message and there is no other content onthe page: no navigation links, no home link, no SC, and no Ads. See here for a Wikipedia page on different typesof error messages.● The landing page is completely blank: no MC, no SC, and no Ads.Assign the Did Not Load flag based on the landing page, not the result block.Here is an example of a Did Not Load landing page. You cannot tell that the landing page doesn’t load by looking at theresult block.Query and User IntentResult Block and LP, Flag, Needs Met RatingExplanationQuery: [douglas instruments]This page displays a generic 404message. There is no MC, SC, orUser Location: South Bend,Ads on the page.IndianaThis result merits a FailsM ratingUser Intent: Navigate to theand the Did Not Load flag.homepage of this website.Here are screenshots of other types of landing pages that should be assigned the Did Not Load flag: D1, D2, D3.Additionally, use the Did Not Load flag for● Malware warnings, such as “Warning – visiting this web site may harm your computer!”● Pages that solicit certificate acceptance requests.Here is an example of a malware warning:Copyright 2019129Here is an example of a certificate acceptance request:14.5.2 Needs Met Rating for Did Not Load ResultsAll result blocks must be given a Needs Met rating. If the landing page truly doesn’t load, assign the Did Not Load flagand rate the page FailsM. True Did Not Load pages are useless.Sometimes the page partially loads or has an error message. Give Needs Met ratings based on how helpful the result isfor the query. Error messages can be customized by the webmaster and are part of a well-functioning website.Sometimes these pages are helpful for the query.Query and User IntentResult Block and LP, Needs Met RatingExplanationThe MC has an error message,Query: [boys pink snow shoes]but the LP has a lot of SC.However, the page has noUser Location: South Bend,information about boys pink snowIndianashoes and is unhelpful for thequery.User Intent: Find informationabout or purchase boys’ snowDo not assign the Did Not Loadshoes.flag.In spite of the customized “NoQuery: [bible passages]results found” message on the LP,it has links to all passages in theUser Location: South Bend,bible, organized by book. It wouldIndianabe very helpful for most users.User Intent: Find specificDo not assign the Did Not Loadpassages in the bible.flag.14.6 Upsetting-Offensive FlagThe Internet contains all sorts of content, including content that many users find offensive or upsetting. Additionally, usersof all ages, genders, races, and religions use the Internet to understand the world and other people's points of view.Users may issue queries on sensitive topics to understand why people believe, say, or do upsetting or offensive things.Search engines exist to allow users to find the information they are looking for.Please assign the Upsetting-Offensive flag to all results that contain upsetting or offensive content from the perspectiveof users in your locale, even if the result satisfies the user intent.In addition, some rating tasks may ask you to identify Not-for-Everyone results in order to flag content that you feel maybe uncomfortable for some users.Copyright 201913014.6.1 Using the Upsetting-Offensive FlagAssign the Upsetting-Offensive flag to results that contain upsetting or offensive content, whether the content is insidethe result block or on the LP. Please represent users in your locale and use your judgment to determine what constitutesupsetting or offensive content. As a general rule of thumb, Upsetting-Offensive results contain content that is soupsetting or offensive that it should only be shown if the query is explicitly seeking this type of content.Upsetting-Offensive content typically includes the following:● Content that promotes hate or violence against a group of people, including but not limited to those grouped onthe basis of race or ethnic origin, religion, disability, age, nationality, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender orgender identity.● Content with racial slurs or extremely offensive terminology without context or beneficial purpose.● Depiction of graphic violence without context or beneficial purpose.● Explicit how-to information about harmful activities (e.g., how-tos on human trafficking or violent assault).● Other types of content that users in your locale would find extremely upsetting or offensive.Important: Please think about the purpose of the page and how the content is presented when determining whether toassign the Upsetting-Offensive flag. There are many results around the web that focus on sensitive topics such as childabuse, violence, or racism; however, you should assign the Upsetting-Offensive flag based on the purpose, type, and/orpresentation of the content on the page—not because the topic itself is sensitive or potentially upsetting.For example, a result with content that encourages child abuse should be flagged as Upsetting-Offensive. However, anaccurate informational page about child abuse (such as child abuse statistics, prevention, how to recognize signs ofabuse, etc.) should not be flagged, even though child abuse itself is a sensitive topic that users may find upsetting.Query and User IntentResult Block and LP, FlagsExplanationThis result is a discussion of howto convince others that theHolocaust never happened.Because of the direct relationshipbetween Holocaust denial andanti-Semitism, many peoplewould consider it offensive.Query: [holocausthistory]This result should receive theUpsetting-Offensive flag,Locale: English (US)regardless of what the query was.User Location: NewWhile the Holocaust itself is aYork, NYpotentially upsetting topic forsome, this result is a factuallyUser Intent: Findaccurate source of historicalhistorical informationinformation. Furthermore, theabout the Holocaust.page does not exist to promotehate or violence against a groupof people, contain racial slurs, ordepict graphic violence.Do NOT assign theUpsetting-Offensive flag,regardless of what the query was.Copyright 2019131Query and User IntentResult Block and LP, FlagsExplanationThe purpose of this page is toargue that black people areinferior. It falsely represents aQuery: [racism againstscientific study, and many peopleblacks]would consider it offensive.Locale: English (US)This result should receive theUpsetting-Offensive flag,User Location: Newregardless of what the query was.York, New YorkUser Intent: FindThis Wikipedia page provides ainformation, news, orwell-informed and historicallyother resources aboutaccurate overview of racism andracism against Blackethnic discrimination in the U.S.people.Do NOT assign theUpsetting-Offensive flag,regardless of what the query was.The purpose of this page is toexplain the author's belief thatIslam is evil. The page seems toexist to promote intolerance orhate, and the content would likelyQuery: [islam]offend many people.Locale: English (US)This result should receive theUpsetting-Offensive flag,User Location: Newregardless of what the query was.York, New YorkThis is a high-quality article on aUser Intent: Findreputable site, with an accurateinformation about thesummary of the major beliefs andreligion of Islam.practices of Islam.Do NOT assign theUpsetting-Offensive flag,regardless of what the query was.Copyright 201913214.6.2 Needs Met Rating for Upsetting-Offensive Tolerant QueriesRemember that users of all ages, genders, races, and religions use search engines for a variety of needs. One especiallyimportant user need is exploring subjects that may be difficult to discuss in person. For example, some people mayhesitate to ask what racial slurs mean. People may also want to understand why certain racially offensive statements aremade. Giving users access to resources that help them understand racism, hatred, and other sensitive topics is beneficialto society.When the user's query seems to either ask for or tolerate potentially upsetting or offensive content, we will call the query a"Upsetting-Offensive tolerant query". For the purpose of Needs Met rating, please assume that users have a dominanteducational/informational intent for Upsetting-Offensive tolerant queries. All results should be rated on the Needs Metrating scale assuming a genuine educational/informational intent.In particular, to receive a Highly Meets rating, informational results about Upsetting-Offensive topics must:1. Be found on highly trustworthy, factually accurate, and credible sources, unless the query clearly indicates theuser is seeking an alternative viewpoint.2. Address the specific topic of the query so that users can understand why it is upsetting or offensive and what thesensitivities involved are.Important:● Do not assume that Upsetting-Offensive tolerant queries "deserve" offensive results.● Do not assume Upsetting-Offensive tolerant queries are issued by people who hold upsetting or offensive views.● Do not assume users are merely seeking to validate an offensive or upsetting perspective.Here are some examples of how to interpret user intent for queries about possibly Upsetting-Offensive topics.QueryUser Intent and ExplanationUsers may want to understand why there is discrimination against women or why people[are women evil], English (US)may say "women are evil".Assume the intent for this statement is the same as the question, "are women evil?"[women are evil], English (US)Users may want to understand why people would say "women are evil".Users want factually accurate information about the Holocaust or information about the[did the holocaust happen?], English (US)issue of Holocaust denial.Users are looking for information about how Christians and the Christian church view the[christians worship the devil], English (US)devil and whether Christians worship the devil.[racist whites], [racist blacks], (etc.),Users are looking for information about racism among people belonging to the ethnicityEnglish (US)mentioned in the query.Copyright 2019133Here are some full rating examples. Remember that you should assign the Upsetting-Offensive flag to allupsetting/offensive results, even if they satisfy the user intent.Query and User IntentResult Block and LP, Needs Met Rating, Page Quality Rating, FlagsQuery: [holocaust history]Locale: English (US)User Location: Seattle,WashingtonUser Intent: Find historicalinformation about the Holocaust.Important: Though there aresome upsetting/offensive resultson the topic of this query, thequery [holocaust history] shouldnot be considered anUpsetting-Offensive tolerantquery.Query: [stormfront.org]Locale: English (US)User Location: New York, NewYorkUser Intent: Go to the homepageof the website Stormfront.org.Copyright 201913415.0 The Relationship between Page Quality and Needs MetThe Needs Met rating is based on both the query and the result. You must carefully think about the query and user intentwhen assigning a Needs Met rating.The Page Quality rating slider does not depend on the query. Do not think about the query when assigning a PageQuality rating to the LP.Some results don’t have a Page Quality slider. If a result block has no Page Quality rating slider, you do not have to giveIf there is a Page Quality slider, please assign a Page Quality rating based on the landing page.If you are unable to evaluate the Page Quality rating of a Foreign Language or Did Not Load result, you should assign aHere is some guidance about assigning Needs Met and Page Quality ratings:● Useless results should always be rated FailsM, even if the landing page has a high Page Quality rating. Uselessis useless.● On-topic, helpful, but low Page Quality results should get lower Needs Met ratings than on-topic, helpful, and highPage Quality results. The Needs Met scale encompasses all aspects of “helpfulness,” and many users find lowPage Quality results less helpful than high Page Quality results. Your ratings should reflect this.● The HM rating should be given to helpful, high Page Quality pages that are a good fit for the query. The HMrating may also be used for results that are very helpful, medium quality, and have other very desirablecharacteristics, such as very recent information.● The HM rating may not be appropriate if a page has low Page Quality or has any other undesirable characteristic,such as outdated or inaccurate information, or if it is a poor fit for the query. We have very high standards for theHM rating.● SM is often an appropriate rating for low quality but on-topic pages. However, a page can have such low PageQuality that it is useless for nearly all queries. Gibberish pages are a good example of pages with low PageQuality that should be rated FailsM. An exception to this is queries with clear website intent, where the targetwebsite should be rated FullyM even if the page has low Page Quality.● Remember that if a page lacks a beneficial purpose, it should always be rated Lowest Page Quality - regardlessof the page’s Needs Met rating or how well-designed the page may be. Please review Section 7.0 for a summaryof other types of Lowest Page Quality pages.Copyright 2019135Query and User IntentResult Block and LP, Needs Met Rating, Page Quality RatingExplanationPage Quality: Read this contentout loud. The article on the LP isshallow and unintentionallyhumorous. The MC has fourparagraphs of text, but it basicallysays that electric cars useelectricity and have to becharged. The page also lacksQuery: [how do electricE-A-T. Low is an appropriatecars work]rating.User Location: Dallas,Needs Met: This page would beTexashelpful for few users.User Intent: FindPage Quality: There is a lot ofinformation about howhelpful MC on the landing pageelectric cars work.on Wikipedia.org. The page hashigh E-A-T. Medium+ to High isan appropriate rating.Needs Met: The query asks howelectric cars work, but the articleon the LP is about mobilityscooters.Page Quality: This is a YMYLtopic. This page has no evidenceof medical expertise/authority andis not trustworthy.Needs Met: Even though theQuery: [symptoms ofarticle is topical, the information isdehydration]not reliable and potentiallymisleading or dangerous.User Location:Memphis, TennesseeUser Intent: Findinformation about thesymptoms ofPage Quality: This is a YMYLdehydration.topic. This page is on a highlyauthoritative medical website andhas a lot of reliable and accurateMC. This page is verytrustworthy.Needs Met: This result would bevery helpful for most users.Copyright 201913616.0 Rating Queries with Multiple Interpretations and IntentsSome queries really only have one meaning. Consider the query [iphone], English (US). There may be different userintents for this query (research iPhones, buy an iPhone, go to the iPhone page on Apple’s website), but all users arebasically referring to the same thing: the phone made by Apple, Inc.Some queries truly have different possible meanings. Consider the query [apple], English (US). Some users may want tofind more information on the computer brand or the fruit. We refer to these different meanings as query interpretations.When giving Needs Met ratings for results involving different query interpretations, think about how likely the queryinterpretation is and how helpful the result is.● A very helpful result for a dominant interpretation should be rated Highly Meets, because it is very helpful formany or most users. Some queries with a dominant interpretation have a FullyM result.● A very helpful result for a common interpretation may be Highly Meets or Moderately Meets, depending onhow likely the interpretation is.● A very helpful result for a very minor interpretation may be Slightly Meets or lower because few users may beinterested in that interpretation.● There are some interpretations that are so unlikely that results should be rated FailsM. We call these “no chance”interpretations.16.1 Rating Queries with Both Website and Visit-in-Person IntentSome queries have two possible strong intents:1. Go to the website intent: in order to, for example, find out information, buy something online, make a reservation,schedule an appointment, interact with customer support, or fulfill some other need that can be satisfied online2. Visit-in-person intent: user wants to visit the store, business, etc. in personWe know the user intent is to accomplish one or the other, but it is unclear which one the user wants. For these queries,result blocks that only satisfy one intent should NOT get a Fully Meets rating.Query and User IntentResult Block and LPNeeds Met Rating and ExplanationQuery: [target]The result block shows three popularUser Location:Target locations in Jacksonville, withJacksonville, Floridainformation that is especially helpfulfor users who want to visit the store.User Intent: There areThis fulfills the user intent to find atwo possible strong usernearby Target location.intents: most usersprobably want to visit anearby Target location orgo to the website to shoponline, researchproducts, find prices, etc.The result is very satisfying and fulfillsthe user intent to shop online orotherwise use the website.Copyright 2019137Query and User IntentResult Block and LPNeeds Met Rating and ExplanationQuery: [dmv]User Location:The result block shows two nearbyBelmont, CaliforniaDMV locations, with information that isespecially helpful for users who wantUser Intent: There areto visit the locations. This fulfills thetwo possible strong useruser intent to find a nearby DMVintents: most userslocation.probably want to visit anearby DMV location orgo to the DMV website torenew a license, pay afee, find someinformation, etc.The result is very satisfying and fulfillsthe user intent to find information orotherwise use the website (e.g., toreview a license, pay a fee).Query: [citibank]The result block shows three nearbyCitibank locations in the user locationUser Location: Paloof Palo Alto. The information isespecially helpful for users who wantAlto, Californiato visit the bank. This fulfills the userintent to find a nearby CitibankUser Intent: There aretwo possible strong userlocation.intents: most usersprobably want to visit anearby Citibank locationor go to the website tobank online.The result is very satisfying and fulfillsthe user intent to do online banking orotherwise use the website.17.0 Specificity of Queries and Landing PagesSome queries are very general and some queries are specific. Here are some examples that compare levels of specificityof English (US) queries:QueryMore Specific QueryEven More Specific Query[chair][dining room chair][ikea “henriksdal” highback upholstered chair][library][harvard library][harvard anthropology library][interview questions][interview questions for teachers][practice interview questions used for teach for america][restaurants][chinese restaurants][takeout chinese restaurants in downtown Austin][coffee shops][starbucks][red rock coffee mountain view]Copyright 2019138Results for specific queries are easier to rate on the Needs Met scale because we know more about what the user islooking for. Giving a Needs Met rating for results for general queries can be difficult. As always, your rating is based onhow helpful the result is for the query, not the specificity fit.When the query is a broad category, such as [cafes] [restaurants] [hotels] [books] [tourist attractions in paris] etc., popularand prominent examples may be considered very helpful. Please do web research to help you understand what ispopular and prominent in different locations.Query and User IntentResult Block & LP, Needs Met & Page Quality RatingsExplanationEven though there are many options, apage for an individual company that offersdifferent cards could be very helpful.Page Quality: Visa is a credit cardcompany with high E-A-T that offersservices for credit cards, banking, etc. andhas a good reputation. High+ to Highestis an appropriate rating.Needs Met: This LP is more specific thanthe query, but could still be helpful formany or most users because Visa is apopular credit card company.Even though there are many options, apage for an individual company that offersdifferent cards could be very helpful.Page Quality: Discover is a company withhigh E-A-T that offers services for creditcards, banking, etc. with a good reputation.Query: [credit cards]High+ to Highest is an appropriate rating.User Location:Needs Met: This LP is more specific thanPhoenix, Arizonathe query, but could still be helpful formany or most users because Discover is aUser Intent: Users arepopular credit card company.probably looking to signup for a credit cardThis page offers a list of top credit cards inonline, or want toa variety of categories.research credit cardsbefore signing up.Page Quality: This website helpsconsumers make money decisions. It hasa good reputation, high E-A-T, and hasbeen recommended by several majornewspapers. High is an appropriaterating.Needs Met: This LP fits the query. It wouldbe helpful for most users.This page describes a credit card thatrequires union membership.Page Quality: This company is an experton its own credit card, which is issued byHSBC Bank, a financial servicesorganization with a good reputation andhigh E-A-T. High is an appropriate rating.Needs Met: Since the credit card requiresunion membership, the page would behelpful for some users.Copyright 2019139Query and User IntentResult Block & LP, Needs Met & Page Quality RatingsExplanationThis is a popular travel aggregator website,and the hotel page on the site can helpusers find hotels in the U.S. Users canread reviews, compare hotels, or make areservation.Page Quality: Orbitz is a popular websitewith high E-A-T and a good reputation.High is an appropriate rating.Needs Met: This LP fits the query. It wouldbe very helpful for most users.This is a very popular hotel chain withhotels available in the majority of the U.S.at many different price points.Even though the list of possible hotelchains is long, the homepage of anindividual chain that offers different prices,features, and location options could bevery helpful.Query: [hotels]Page Quality: The Marriott website givesUser Location:information on Marriott hotels, a popularJacksonville, Floridachain of hotels. Marriott has a goodreputation and is an expert on MarriottUser Intent: Users arehotels, making the information on this pageprobably planning a trip,highly authoritative. High+ to Highest isbut this query is veryan appropriate rating.general and vague.Needs Met: This LP is more specific thanthe query, but it would still be helpful formany or most users because the Marriott isa popular chain of hotels.This is the webpage of the MarriottCourtyard hotel in Emeryville, California.Page Quality: The Marriott website givesinformation on Marriott hotels, a popularchain of hotels. Marriott has a goodreputation and is an expert on Marriotthotels, making the information on this pagehighly authoritative. High+ to Highest isan appropriate rating.Needs Met: The LP is too specific for thequery, but this is a well-known brand andusers can navigate to other Marriott hotelsfrom this page. Few users would find thispage helpful.Copyright 2019140Query and User IntentResult Block & LP, Needs Met & Page Quality RatingsExplanationNeeds Met: The result block shows threepopular Target locations in Jacksonville,with information that is especially helpfulfor users who want to visit the store.No Page Quality ratingrequiredThe LP is the Target website.Page Quality: Target is a popularQuery: [target]shopping website in the U.S. with highE-A-T and is trusted by users for onlineUser Location:purchases. High to High+ is anJacksonville, Floridaappropriate rating.User Intent: Go toNeeds Met: The result is very satisfyingtarget.com or find afor mobile users that want to go to thenearby Target store.website.The LP is the “store locator” page on theTarget website.Page Quality: Target is the expert aboutwhere its stores are located. This page isthe most authoritative page on this topic.High to Highest is an appropriate rating.Needs Met: The LP is more specific thanthe query, but many or most users wouldbe interested in this page.The LP is the “electronics” page on theTarget website.Page Quality: Target is a popularshopping website in the U.S. with highE-A-T and is trusted by users for onlinepurchases. High to High+ is anappropriate rating.Needs Met: The LP is more specific thanthe query, but many or most users wouldbe interested in this page.Copyright 2019141Query and User IntentResult Block & LP, Needs Met & Page Quality RatingsExplanationNeeds Met: While this result block hassome helpful content, most peoplesearching for Target are not looking forthe stock price or the names of the CEOand Founder. Slightly Meetsto Slightly Meets+ is an appropriateQuery: [target]rating.User Location:Jacksonville, FloridaUser Intent: Go totarget.com or find aNo Page Quality ratingnearby Target store.requiredThe LP on the Target website is for aspecific type of women’s pants.Page Quality: Target is a popularshopping website in the U.S. with highE-A-T and is trusted by users for onlinepurchases. High to High+ is anappropriate rating.Needs Met: The LP is much more specificthan the query and would be helpful forvery few users.Copyright 2019142Query and User IntentResult Block & LP, Needs Met & Page Quality RatingsExplanationThis LP has many chicken recipes (withreviews) on a popular recipe website.Page Quality: Food Network is a popularwebsite with high E-A-T and a goodreputation for providing high quality recipesand cooking information. High+ toHighest is an appropriate rating.Needs Met: This LP fits the query. It wouldbe very helpful for most users.This LP has a single recipe for chickenparmesan.Page Quality: Food Network is a popularwebsite with high E-A-T and a goodreputation for providing high quality recipesand cooking information. High+ toHighest is an appropriate rating.Query: [chicken recipes]Needs Met: This is a popular type ofchicken recipe on a popular website, butUser Location: Austin,the LP is more specific than the query.TexasSome or few users would find this pagehelpful.User Intent: Usersprobably want to make aThis LP has over 25 recipes for friedchicken dish and arechicken, a popular chicken dish.looking for some recipesto choose from. UsersPage Quality: Allrecipes.com is a popularprobably expect andwebsite with high E-A-T and a goodwant a list of recipes.reputation for providing high quality recipeswith lots of reviews. High+ to Highest isan appropriate rating.Needs Met: Even though there are over 25different recipes on the LP, they are all forthe same basic dish. Therefore, this LP isalso more specific than the query. Someor few users would find this page helpful.This is a fake search page for chickenrecipes.Page Quality: Ads should never disguisethemselves as the MC of the page. Pageswith Ads that are designed to look like MCdo not have a beneficial purpose. Sincethis page deceives users, it should receivethe Lowest rating.Needs Met: It should be rated FailsM as itwould be helpful for no users.Copyright 2019143Query and User IntentResult Block & LP, Needs Met & Page Quality RatingsExplanationThis LP is the official website for themuseum store.Page Quality: This is the website of apopular museum store with a goodreputation and high E-A-T. The museum isthe expert on information about the store,including hours, phone numbers,membership information, etc. High+ toHighest is an appropriate rating.Needs Met: The result is very satisfying formobile users that want to go to thewebsite.Query: [smithsonian airand space museumstore]User Location:Washington, DCNeeds Met: While the result is about themuseum, the hours, address, andUser Intent: Go to thedirections are the same as the museumstore website or findstore. This information is helpful for usersinformation, such assearching for the store.opening hours, about themuseum’s store inWashington, DC.No Page Quality ratingrequiredThis LP has information about how tovolunteer at the museum.Page Quality: This is the volunteer pagefor a popular museum with a goodreputation and high E-A-T. The museum isthe expert on their own volunteeropportunities. High+ to Highest is anappropriate rating.Needs Met: The LP is more specific thanthe query and would be helpful for fewusers.Copyright 2019144Query and User IntentResult Block & LP, Needs Met & Page Quality RatingsExplanationQuery: [smithsonian airand space museumstore]User Location:Washington, DCNeeds Met: This is not the museumrequested in the query so the result FailsUser Intent: Go to theto Meet the user intent.store website or findinformation, such asopening hours, about themuseum’s store inWashington, DC.No Page Quality ratingrequiredCopyright 201914518.0 Needs Met Rating and FreshnessSome queries demand very recent or “fresh” information. Users may be looking for “breaking news,” such as an importantevent or natural disaster happening right now. Here are different types of queries demanding current/recent results.Type of QueryExample QueriesExplanationAssume users need the information right away.“Breaking news” queries[tornado], [tsunami]Imagine someone who needs immediate weather information becausea big storm is coming. Information about last year's weather wouldnot be helpful.Assume users are looking for the most recent or current informationabout the event.Recurring event queries,[olympics], [american idol],such as elections, sportsFor example, if the Olympics are happening right now, users[redsox schedule], [tax forms],events, TV shows,searching [olympics] want information about the current Olympics, not[elections]conferences, etc.results from years ago. If the next Olympics are a few months away,users are probably interested in theupcoming Olympics.[population of paris], [amount ofCurrent informationAssume users are looking for the most current information, such asu.s. debt], [airfare from ny to sfo],queriesprices or airfare.[next federal holiday][iphone], [toyota camry], [windowsAssume users are looking for information about the most recentProduct queriesoperating system]model/version for these product queries.When a query demands recent content, only pages with current, recent, or updated content should get high Needs Metratings. For these queries, pages about past events, old product models and prices, outdated information, etc. are nothelpful. They should be considered “stale” and given low Needs Met ratings. In some cases, stale results are uselessand should be rated FailsM.For some queries, there may be “newsy” or recent information user intent, as well as more “timeless” information userintent. Users issuing queries for celebrities or politicians may be interested in biographical information, or users may belooking for the latest news or gossip.Freshness is generally less of a concern for Page Quality rating. “Stale” pages can have high Page Quality ratings. Forexample, some highly reputable news websites maintain “archival” content. However, unmaintained/abandoned “old”websites or unmaintained and inaccurate/misleading content is a reason for a low Page Quality rating.Note: The date the page was created may be different from when the content was last updated or modified. Whencontent is updated, the page will sometimes show the date of the update, not the date the page was created. Somewebsites always show the current date, regardless of when the content was last updated. If you are curious about thecontent of a page, see here to try the “Wayback Machine” on the Internet Archive. Not all pages are available, but this toolmay help you understand how some pages were created and how their content has changed over time.Copyright 2019146Query and User IntentResult Block and LP, Needs Met Rating, Page Quality RatingExplanationThis LP has an article about theQuery: [nasa mars“Curiosity” rover landing,landing]published on the same day as thelanding, which is the day thisUser Location: Sanexample was written.Francisco, CaliforniaUser Intent: On the datethis example was written,NASA had just landedthe “Curiosity” rover onThis LP has an article about theMars. Most users arelaunching of the “Curiosity” rover,probably looking forpublished nine months before itsbreaking news andlanding on Mars. The content onpictures about the event.this page would be consideredstale for the query.Query: [los angelesThis LP shows traffic conditions intraffic]Los Angeles on August 7, 2012,which is the day this example wasUser Location: Loswritten.Angeles, CaliforniaUser Intent: Users arelooking for currentinformation about trafficconditions in LosAngeles. Even pagesThis LP shows traffic conditions inabout traffic conditionsLos Angeles on August 6, 2012.the day before would beIt is stale and useless for theconsidered stale for thequery even though it is only onequery.day old.Query: [nobel peaceThis LP on the New York Timesprize winner]website has information about themost recent winner of this prize,User Location: Sanbased on the date when thisDiego, Californiaexample was written.User Intent: Find thename of the most recentwinner of this prize. Thisis a Know Simple query.At the time this examplewas originally written,This LP on the BBC website has2011 was the mostinformation about the 2006 winnerrecent year that theof this prize. This page is stale forNobel Peace Prize wasthe query.awarded.Copyright 2019147Query and User IntentResult Block and LP, Needs Met Rating, Page Quality RatingExplanationQuery: [arthritis]Medline Plus is an authoritativeUser Location:website that regularly updates itsPhiladelphia,content.PennsylvaniaUser Intent: Users arelooking for informationabout this disease.Because there isongoing research doneon treatments and curesThis 2006 article would befor most diseases, usersconsidered stale for this medicalare probably looking forquery.authoritative, up-to-dateinformation on arthritis.Query: [when wasfranklin d roosevelt born]This LP has the information usersUser Location:are looking for.Chicago, IllinoisUser Intent: Users wantto find this wellunderstood fact.We couldn’t find a stale page for this query.N/A19.0 Misspelled and Mistyped Queries and Results19.1 Misspelled and Mistyped QueriesYou will notice that some queries are misspelled or mistyped. Here are some examples of queries that are obviouslymisspelled:Misspelled QueryQuery Interpretation[federal expres], English (US)The only reasonable query interpretation is the company named Federal Express.[new england patroits], English US)The only reasonable interpretation is the NFL football team.[byonce knowles], English (US)The only reasonable interpretation is the famous singer/actress, Beyonce Knowles.Some misspelled or mistyped queries are more difficult to interpret. Use your judgment and do query research.For obviously misspelled or mistyped queries, you should base your rating on user intent, not necessarily on exactly howthe query has been spelled or typed by the user.For queries that are not obviously misspelled or mistyped, you should respect the query as written, and assume usersare looking for results for the query as it is spelled.Copyright 201914819.2 Name QueriesConsider the query [john stuart], English (US). There is a very famous Jon Stewart, the comedian and former host of apopular U.S. television show. However, we should not assume that the query [john stuart] has been misspelled. Thereare many people named John Stuart. We will respect the query as written and assume the user is looking for someonenamed “John Stuart.”Query and PossibleResult Block and LP, Needs Met Rating, Page Quality RatingExplanationUser IntentsThe page lists allmembers of the LinkedInsite named “MichealJordan.” LinkedIn is avery popular socialnetworking website forprofessionals in the U.S.Query: [micheal jordan],This result would be veryEnglish (US)helpful for many or mostusers trying to findUser Location: Saninformation aboutFrancisco, Californiasomeone named“Micheal Jordan.”User Intent: There aremany people named“Micheal Jordan.”Helpful results for moreprominent people namedLinkedIn page forMicheal Jordan shouldMicheal Jordan, areceive higher ratingsfacilities servicesthan helpful results forprofessional in Atlanta,less prominent peopleGeorgia.named Micheal Jordan.Because Michael Jordanis such a famousathlete/celebrity, we willconsider Michael Jordanto be a minorinterpretation.Michael Jordan’s playerprofile page on the NBAbasketball website.20.0 Non-Fully Meets Results for URL QueriesRaters sometimes ask the question, “For a well-formed working URL query, are the only acceptable Needs Met ratings fora result either Fully Meets or Fails to Meet?” The answer is no. There can be other helpful results for URL queries.Some users issue URL queries to find information about a website, such as reviews or recent news. We recommendedthis to you as one method of reputation research in the PQ guidelines. Real users do this too. Results that give reviewsand reputation information can be very helpful for a URL query.However, websites that offer usage statistics about a website are not usually helpful results for URL queries. Most usersaren’t interested in this kind of information.Copyright 2019149Query and User IntentResult Block and LP, Needs Met Rating, Page Quality RatingExplanationThis LP is the target of the query.Query:[potterybarn.com]Online coupon codes are verypopular in the U.S. and this LPUser Location: Palo(from a well-known coupon site)Alto, Californiadisplays codes for onlinepurchases on the Pottery BarnUser Intent: Potterywebsite. Users may be interestedBarn is a homein coupon codes and this wouldfurnishing store. Usersbe very helpful for those shoppingmay want to go to theonline at potterybarn.com,website, do research, orespecially frequent shoppers.find more information onthe company.This LP (from a well-knownreview site) has reviews of thepotterybarn.com website. Usersmay be interested in readingreviews when consideringwhether to make purchases atpotterybarn.com, especially newshoppers.This LP is the target of the query.Query:[ratemyprofessors.com]This LP is a Huffington PostUser Location: Losarticle dated August 31, 2012Angeles, Californiaabout ratemyprofessors.com.The article was newly publishedUser Intent: Go towhen it was added to thewww.ratemyprofessors.cguidelines. Some users might beom , a website whereinterested in this article.students can rate theircollege professors.This LP is an article dated April17, 2006 about theratemyprofessors.com website.Few or no users would beinterested in this outdatedinformation.Copyright 201915021.0 Product Queries: Importance of Browsing and ResearchingSome product queries, such as [ipad reviews], have a clear information-seeking (Know) intent. Other product queries,such as [buy ipad], have a clear purchase (Do) intent. And some product queries, such as [ipad store.apple.com], have aclear navigation (Website) intent. However, most product queries don’t obviously specify one type of intent.Keep in mind that many users enjoy browsing and visually exploring products online, similar to window shopping in reallife. Give high Needs Met ratings to results that allow users to research, browse, and decide what to purchase.Users may not always plan to buy products online that they are browsing and researching, for example, cars or majorappliances. Even though the ultimate goal may be to purchase a product, many other activities may take place first:researching the product (reviews, technical specifications), understanding the options that are available (brands, models,pricing), viewing and considering various options (browsing), etc.Important: Page Quality ratings for product results need extra care and attention.Often, the results for product queries are YMYL pages. Users need high quality information from authoritative sourceswhen researching products, especially when products are expensive or represent a major investment/important life event(e.g., cars, washing machines, computers, wedding gifts, baby products, hurricane shutters, large fitness equipment).When buying products, users need websites they can trust: good reputation, extensive customer service support, etc.Results for product queries may be important for both your money and your life (YMYL)!Query and User IntentResult Block and LP, Needs Met Rating, Page Quality RatingExplanationQuery: [high definitiontv]This LP has comprehensiveUser Location: Losinformation about different typesAngeles, Californiaof high definition TVs (plasma,LCD, LED), as well as reviewsUser Intent: This queryabout many specific models. Thedoesn’t specify a size orwebsite is known for havingbrand of TV. Users arehelpful reviews and informationprobably doing researchabout electronics.before making apurchase.Query: [girl toddler jeanssize 3T]This is a helpful page for browsingUser Location: Losand shopping for toddler girlsAngeles, Californiajeans. There are many optionsfor jeans in size 3T. This is a highUser Intent: The queryquality store known for sellingis very specific. Thejeans.user wants to browseand find an item to buy.Query: [cufflinks]This LP has a large collection ofUser Location: Loscufflinks from a very reputableAngeles, Californiaretailer. There are many optionsand styles. This is a good pageUser Intent: Most usersfor browsing. There are helpfulprobably want to findfeatures at the top to choosedifferent cufflink stylesstyles, price ranges, etc.and options to browse orpurchase.Copyright 2019151Query and User IntentResult Block and LP, Needs Met RatingExplanationQuery: [twist of fate ring pandora]This result has a variety of imagesUser Location: Philadelphia,of the ring, showing differentPennsylvaniaangles and materials. Knowingwhat the ring looks like is veryUser Intent: The user is lookinghelpful to users who arefor a specific ring sold by theresearching the product andPandora brand and likely wants tobrowsing options that areresearch the ring, see what itavailable.looks like, find options to browseor purchase, etc.22.0 Rating Visit-in-Person Intent QueriesWhen there is a user location for a visit-in-person intent query and a location has not been specified in the query itself,such as [chinese restaurants] with a user location of Boston, MA, results in or near the user location are the most helpful.How close is “near”? The type of business and/or entity should be taken into consideration when deciding if the distanceof the visit-in-person result is too far. For example, most people are not willing to travel very far for a gas station, coffeeshop, supermarket, etc. Those are types of businesses that most users expect to find nearby.However, users might be willing to travel a little farther for certain kinds of visit-in-person results: doctors’ offices, libraries,specific types of restaurants, public facilities like swimming pools, hiking trails in open spaces, etc. Sometimes users mayaccept results that are even farther away, such as a very specialized medical clinic.In other words, when we say users are looking for results “nearby,” the word “nearby” can mean different distances fordifferent queries. As always, please use your judgment.Copyright 201915222.1 Examples Where User Location Does (and Does Not) MatterAs previously mentioned, the user location may not always change our understanding of the query and user intent. Belowis one example where user location plays an important role, and two examples where user location does not matter.Query and User IntentResult Block and LP, Needs Met RatingExplanationThis SCRB displays the complete andcorrect answer prominently in the resultblock, in a way that is easy for users onmobile devices to read.Note: Assume that the result showscurrent information for users at the timethis example was written. If you wererating this task, you would need to verifythat the minimum wage rate in this SCRBis accurate for the state of Kansas.Query: [minimum wagerate]User Location: Wichita,KansasThis is the official Kansas state websitepage on minimum wage for Kansas.User Intent: Find outwhat the currentminimum wage is.Different states in theU.S. have differentminimum wage rates.Users might beThis LP has the minimum wage rates for allinterested in thestates. It is on the official U.S. Departmentminimum wage in theirof Labor website, which has high E-A-T onstate and how itthe topic, but it takes some work to find thecompares to otherinformation specific to Kansas.places.This is the official California state websitepage on minimum wage for California.Copyright 2019153Query and User IntentResult Block and LP, Needs Met RatingExplanationQuery: [pictures ofThe LP is a page full of kitten pictures.kittens]The result block has a nice assortment ofpictures as well that would highly satisfyUser Location:users.Pittsburgh, PennsylvaniaUser Intent: Users arelooking for pictures ofkittens. This is anon-visit-in-person intentquery. There is noobvious user intent tofind pictures of kittens inPittsburgh. The userlocation plays no role inThis is a local listing of pets needingthe Needs Met rating.homes in the Pittsburgh area. There areno pictures of any pets directly on thispage and few pictures on the individuallistings.The user is looking for a job at Google andthere is no information in this result blockthat will help the user explore jobopportunities—it Fails to Meet the userQuery: [google jobs]need.User Location: Miami,FloridaUser Intent: Users arelooking for jobopportunities at Google.This is Google’s official page on careersand jobs at Google, where users cansearch for currently open opportunities.This page is exactly what the user islooking for—it Fully Meets the user need.Copyright 201915423.0 Rating English Language Results in Non-English LocalesThe following rating guidance is for raters in non-English locales. You may stop reading this section if your tasklanguage is English, such as English (US), English (IN), English (NG), etc.Your Needs Met ratings should reflect how helpful the result is for users in your locale. When the query is in the languageof your locale, assume that users want results in that language. We know that you can read English (you are reading thisdocument!), but you should only give high Needs Met ratings to English results if users in your locale would expect orwant them for a particular query. Unless requested by the query, English results should be considered useless if mostusers in the locale can't read them.However, rating can be more difficult when the query includes English names, words, etc., or when it's unclear whetherEnglish results would be satisfying for a particular query. Please use your judgment and knowledge of your locale todetermine the appropriate rating.Important: Please keep in mind that every locale will have unique considerations regarding the number and variety oflanguages (such as official languages, regional languages, local dialects, etc.), writing systems, and keyboard inputlanguages commonly in use. While this guideline may not include examples for your locale, it is important that yourepresent users in your task location and culture in order to interpret the query and rate results. When in doubt, pleaseassume that users would prefer results in the task language unless the query clearly indicates otherwise.Copyright 201915523.1 Examples of English (and Non-English) Results in Non-English LocalesThe section includes some examples using Hindi (IN) and Korean (KR) as the locales. In both cases, we cannot assumethat users in these locales—i.e., Hindi-speaking users in India, or Korean-speaking users in Korea—are able to readEnglish. Unless most users in the locale would be satisfied by English results for the query, we will consider themunhelpful or even useless (FailsM).Query and User IntentResult Block and LP, Needs Met RatingExplanationThis Hindi language Wikipediapage on राजा र व वमा is veryhelpful for Hindi (IN) users.Query: [राजा र व वमा]Locale: Hindi (IN)User Location: Delhi, IndiaUser Intent: The user wants toThis English Wikipedia pagefind informationabout राजा र व वमा has similarabout राजा र व वमा, an Indian artist.content to the Hindi Wikipediapage. Although there are somehelpful images on the page, fewHindi users would be able to readthis page.This Korean language Wikipediapage on Barack Obama is veryQuery: [버락 오바마]helpful for Korean (KR) users.Locale: Korean (KR)User Location: Seoul, KoreaUser Intent: 버락 오바마 is BarackThis English Wikipedia pageObama in Korean, so the userabout Barack Obama has similarwants to find information aboutcontent to the Korean WikipediaBarack Obama.page. Although there are somehelpful images on the page, veryfew Korean users would be ableto read this page.Copyright 2019156Here are two examples where the query includes proper nouns typed in Latin script, such as famous people, places, titlesof books or films, etc. For these queries, users would prefer to see results in the language of their locale.Query and User IntentResult Block and LP, Needs Met RatingExplanationAlthough the query was typed inLatin script, most Hindi userswould want to see informationabout this person in Hindi. ThisHindi language Wikipedia pageQuery: [ronaldo]on Cristiano Ronaldo is veryhelpful for Hindi IN) users.Locale: Hindi (IN)User Location: Delhi, IndiaUser Intent: The user wants toThis English Wikipedia pagefind information about Cristianoabout Cristiano Ronaldo hasRonaldo, a famous footballer.similar content to the HindiWikipedia page. Although thereare some helpful images on thepage, few Hindi users would beable to read this page.Although the query was typed inLatin script, most Korean userswould expect to see Koreanlanguage reviews or KoreanQuery: [titanic 1997]stores for purchasing the movie.This Korean result on a KoreanLocale: Korean (KR)website is very helpful.User Location: Seoul, KoreaUser Intent: The user wants topurchase a DVD or findThis English language landinginformation about the moviepage has helpful content for users“Titanic,” released in 1997.who can read English. Althoughthere are some helpful images onthe page, very few Korean userswould be able to read this page.Copyright 2019157Here are two additional examples where the query was typed in Latin script (including some English words), yet userswould still prefer to see results in the language of their locale.Query and User IntentResult Block and LP, Needs Met RatingExplanationAlthough the query includes someEnglish words, it is a Hindi querytyped in Latin script. Most HindiQuery: [mahila cricket sri lankausers would expect to see Hindika match]results, like this helpful article.Locale: Hindi (IN)User Location: Delhi, IndiaUser Intent: The user wants toThis English language landingfind information about a women’spage has helpful content for userscricket match against Sri Lankawho can read English, but fewon February 17, 2016.Hindi (IN) users would be able toread this page.Although the query was typed inLatin script and includes someEnglish words, most Koreanusers would expect to see theQuery: [samsung tablet]Korean page on the Samsungwebsite. This Korean result isLocale: Korean (KR)very helpful.User Location: Seoul, KoreaUser Intent: The user wants topurchase, find information, or goThis English language page onto the Galaxy tablet page on thethe website of Samsung, theSamsung website.company that makes this tablet,has helpful content. Althoughthere are some helpful images onthe page, very few Korean userswould be able to read this page.Copyright 2019158On the other hand, there may be queries where the needs of most users would actually be satisfied by English languageresults, even if the query itself is typed in the task language.For example, for queries about global businesses and organizations, users may expect or want to visit the Englishlanguage version of the business/organization's official website in some locales. Similarly, for queries seeking technicalinformation such as manufacturer part numbers, product specs, scientific or chemical formulas, etc., the answer to thequery may be typically expressed in the English language in some locales.For these queries, users may expect or want to see English results in order to satisfy their need. Please use yourjudgment and knowledge of your locale to determine the appropriate rating.Query and User IntentResult Block and LP, Needs Met RatingExplanationQuery: [हावड वबसाइट]Locale: Hindi (IN)This is the official website ofUser Location: Delhi, IndiaHarvard University. Even thoughthe query was typed in Hindi, thisEnglish website is clearly whatUser Intent: हावड वबसाइट isusers are looking for. Users"Harvard website" in Hindi. Userswould be fully satisfied by thiswant to go to the official websiteresult.of Harvard University, which is awell-known research university inCambridge, Massachusetts.Query: [시스코 카탈리스트 스위치This article comes from a blogIOS 복원하기]that contains lots of technicalinformation and troubleshootingLocale: Korean (KR)tips about IT operations andprogramming. The landing pageUser Location: Seoul, Koreaprovides step-by-step instructionsin Korean, along with the exactUser Intent: This Korean querycommands in English that userscan be translated as "recoveringwould need to type into a consoleIOS on Cisco Catalyst switches".in order to recover the operatingThe user wants to find out how tosystem for the queried device.restore the IOS operating systemThis tutorial would be very helpfulon a Cisco Catalyst switch, whichand easy to follow for Koreanis a specific brand/model ofusers who are familiar with thiscomputer networking device.type of networking device.Copyright 2019159Finally, in some locales, English is one of the official languages or a commonly spoken language. In these locales,English websites are easy to use and could be helpful, depending on the query.For example, the Singapore government recognizes four official languages: English, Malay, Chinese, and Tamil, butEnglish is the first and most dominant language in Singapore.Query and User IntentResult Block and LP, Needs Met RatingExplanationThis Wikipedia page in Englishabout Obama would be veryhelpful to users in Singapore.Query: [barack obama]Locale: English (SG)User Location: Singapore,SingaporeUser Intent: Find informationabout Barack Obama.This Wikipedia page in Chineseabout Obama would also be veryhelpful to users in Singapore.Copyright 2019160Appendix: Using the Evaluation Platform24.0 OverviewThe Evaluation Platform is the system you will use to acquire and rate tasks. You can access the Evaluation Platform bygoing to this link: http://www.raterhub.com/evaluation/raterAs a Search Quality Rater, you will work on many different types of rating tasks. This section provides guidance on howto use certain features of the Evaluation Platform that you will encounter frequently in Page Quality (PQ) and Needs Met(NM) rating tasks. Some of these concepts may apply to other types of rating tasks as well.Important: Many tasks that you receive will display project-specific instructions on the task page. You should alwaysfollow these project-specific instructions when they are provided.25.0 Acquiring TasksHere is a simplified screenshot of the task acquisition page on the Evaluation Platform. Please note that changes aresometimes made to the appearance of this page, so it may not look exactly as it appears below.A few notes about how to acquire tasks from this page:● rater@gmail.com: Make sure you are logged in to the account you used to sign up for the rating program.● Acquire if available: Click this button to acquire a new task.● Headphones or speakers required: This label indicates that the task requires headphones or speakers (forexample, to listen to an audio file).Please note you may see other types of labels next to the button on the task acquisition page. Sometimes therewill be only one button, while other times you may see more than one button displayed to distinguish tasks withdifferent requirements. When there is more than one displayed, you may choose the one you want to acquire.26.0 Rating Tasks Using the Rating InterfaceHere is a general outline of the steps you should follow upon acquiring a task:1. Read the instructions: Pay close attention to any project-specific instructions and examples if provided.2. Fill out the task: Assign ratings to result blocks, provide comments, answer questions, etc. (as applicable).3. Check your work: Verify that you entered your ratings as intended. Additionally, make sure that you provided aresponse to all required questions.4. Submit the task: Click the "Submit" button at the end of the page to submit the task and continue rating.Alternatively, click "Submit and Stop Rating" to submit the task and return to the Evaluation Platform homepage.Copyright 2019161Additionally, here are a few general things to keep in mind when rating tasks:● Result blocks are sometimes slow to load: Before assigning any ratings, please scan the task page to makesure that all result blocks have loaded. Please note that result blocks may be slow to load and/or that the taskpage may need reloading if there are empty result blocks. If the result blocks fail to load after refreshing a fewtimes, please release the task by following the instructions in Section 27.0 below.● Sometimes a side will not have any result blocks: If one side displays the message “This side did not generateany results,” please do not release the task.● Do not refresh the task page after assigning ratings: If you refresh the page after assigning ratings, you willlose them and they will have to be entered again.27.0 Releasing TasksMost raters have difficulty rating some tasks now and then. Some queries are about highly technical topics (e.g.,computer science or physics) or involve very specialized areas of interest (e.g., gaming or torrents).You will report problems and release tasks using the “Report a Problem / Release this Task” button in the rating interface.Here is what the “Report a Problem / Release this Task” button looks like:Clicking the red button displays a menu with several reporting and release options:Please note that changes are sometimes made to this menu, so it may not look exactly as it appears above.In general, you should choose whichever option best describes your reason for releasing the task. If you are unsure,please select the closest option, or contact your employer/company for further guidance.Copyright 2019162Please leave a comment explaining the release when it makes sense to provide additional information, for example, whenyou are releasing for a “technical problem.”Here are some examples for the "lack expertise” and “technical problem” release options.Lack expertise: These queries require specialized knowledge and may be difficult for some raters.QueryGeneral Query Topic[cortisol secretion shows a blank pattern of secretion]Scientific query[minecraft gun and vehicles 1.1 mod installer]Gaming query[python pandas index like matrix]Technical queryTechnical problem: These result blocks have question marks and other characters where text should be.Note: Based on the number and/or type of tasks that you release, you may be asked to provide additional details aboutthe reason for some of the releases.Copyright 201916328.0 Understanding the User Location on the Task PageThe location of the user should be inferred from the map provided. The map can help clarify where the user wasphysically located when the query was issued.On the map, the user location can be precise (blue dot), approximate (blue rectangle or circle), or missing altogether if theuser location is unknown. Here are some examples of what you might see at the top of the task:A precise user locationSometimes you will seeis represented by a bluea shaded blue circlearound the blue dot. Thedot ().blue dot is the user’smost likely location, butit is possible they arelocated anywhere withinthe larger shaded blueregion.The user can be locatedThe map includes aanywhere within theresponse pin, which is ablue rectangle on themarker for amap.visit-in-person resultblock in the task. Ifthere are threevisit-in-person resultblocks in the task, thereshould be threeresponse pins on themap.29.0 Reporting Duplicate Results in TasksIn some rating tasks, you may be asked to determine whether any results are Duplicates (dupes). This section providesguidance and examples of how to report duplicate results In Needs Met (NM) rating tasks.29.1 Pre-Identified DuplicatesSome duplicate results are automatically detected and will be pre-identified for you. They will be annotated by the text“Same as...” right below the slider and above the result block.This is what these pre-identified dupes look like:Left SideRight SidePlease note: You cannot unselect dupes that have been automatically detected and pre-identified.Copyright 201916429.2 Rater-Identified DuplicatesYou are also asked to help identify duplicate results that have not been automatically detected. Please mark two resultsas dupes if they have essentially the same content on the main landing page AND you would not want a search engine toreturn both results for the query.Please note that in Needs Met rating and other query-based tasks, dupe identification is query-dependent.● Specific queries: For queries where the user is looking for a specific piece of content (such as queries looking forsong lyrics, queries looking for a specific article, etc.), obtaining that piece of content from different sites could behelpful for users to verify the information, so they should not be rated as dupes.● Broad queries: If the query is broad, then returning the same piece of content is not what the user is looking for,and hence those results should be flagged as dupes. Results may be considered dupes even if they have minorcontent differences on the page (such as different ads, images, or related links).Please identify dupes both within the same side and across sides. Even for cross-side results, you should still askyourself the question, “Would users want to see both results if they were returned by the same search engine?”Note: If two result blocks have very different types of content or very different appearances, do not mark them asduplicates even if they have the same landing page URL. For example, these two blocks should not be marked asduplicates of each other.Copyright 201916529.3 Reporting Duplicate ResultsWhen you notice that the results in two or more result blocks are duplicates, please click on the Select Dupe link at thetop of one of the results. The current result (the result you clicked on) will be highlighted in red at the top of the block.You can then check results that are duplicates of the current result, and the checked results will be highlighted in yellow.You must select the “Dupe of…” button.The duplicate results that you checked will be annotated by "Dupe of..." text at the top of the block. After selecting alldupes, click on the finish selecting dupes link to return to the normal rating mode. The link’s name will change back toSelect Dupes, and you will be able to report other sets of dupes, if there are any. If you change your mind, you canalways uncheck a result.DupesQUERY: [choosing and installing a motorcycle battery]URL 1: http://www.caimag.com/wordpress/2010/03/06/motorcycle-battery-how-to-choose-installURL 2: http://www.articlesbase.com/motorcycles-articles/choosing-and-installing-a-motorcycle-battery-47798.htmlReason: Both of these results display the same article (which also appears on many other pages on the web). The onlyreal difference between the landing pages are the Ads displayed around the article. The query is broad enough that userswould not benefit by search engines returning more than one of these results.DupesQUERY: [jason castro]URL 1: http://www.myspace.com/jasoncastromusicURL 2: http://www.myspace.com/jasoncastromusic?MyToken=503599bf-01cf-4427-bdf4-d63920c107f9Reason: These two results have the same landing page, even though the URLs are different. Users would not benefit bysearch engines returning both results.Not DupesQUERY: [material girl lyrics]URL 1: http://www.lyricsfreak.com/m/madonna/material+girl_20086925.htmlURL 2: http://www.lyrics007.com/Madonna%20Lyrics/Material%20Girl%20Lyrics.htmlReason: Even though both pages display the lyrics to the song “Material Girl,” users would probably want to have theoption to visit both pages so that they could verify the accuracy of the lyrics. Users could benefit by search enginesreturning more than one page with the lyrics to the song. Simplified Needs Met TasksSome Needs Met rating tasks may not require ratings for all blocks. In these blocks, the Needs Met and Page Qualityrating scales will be greyed out and annotated with the text "No Rating Required".The greyed-out results (sometimes referred to as "contextual results") are shown to help you understand the query andinform your ratings. You can click on them when you feel like they will be helpful in determining your ratings.

 
